title,is_mommajoke,selftext
What does porn and Organic Chemistry have in common?,0,Butanal
What did Zimbabwe have before candles?,0,Electricity.
"Guys, the term ""anti-vaxxer"" sounds inconsiderate.",0,"The proper term is ""very stupid""."
How many Freudians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?,0,"
Two. One to screw the lightbulb and one to hold the penis.

I mean the mother!
I MEAN THE LADDER!"
I looked in the mirror today and saw something I never noticed before,0,A joke
What's the one office supply you never want to ask Chuck Norris to give you?,0,The Three-Hole Punch...
Why do native Americans hate the snow?,0,...because it is white and settles all over their land.
What does one call a wandering caveman?,0,A Meanderthall.
What do you call it when a Mexican refinances his mortgage?,0,[deleted]
How do you circumcised a red neck,0,[removed]
I finally did it! I got the COVID-19 homemade haircut!,0,I went to the mirror to check the great job I did but my girlfriend turned the lights on! Completely ruined my mood. At least this good police officer is giving me a free ride to town.
Making a flat-earther angry is murder,0,You'll push him/her over the edge
My girlfriend and I just aren't compatible,0,I'm a Pisces and she's a cheating whore.
What did silver say to gold?,0,AU
Why do women sound like they're having orgasms when the play tennis?,0,"And, why does my mother play tennis in the bathroom?"
Funny new YouTube channel. I promise it's not too annoying. Please check us out and Subscribe if other channels suck more!,0,[removed]
Lady brings Muffy to the Vet,0,"Lady goes to the vet with Muffy, who has a large hairy growth emanating from her posterior.

""Doctor, can you do anything about that big hairy growth there?""

Vet says, ""No problem, here's a prescription for some ointment, just rub it on the hairy growth and it'll be gone in no time at all!""

Next day, the lady goes to the Pharmacy and presents the prescription to the Pharmacist. He looks at it and says. 

""Wow! this is pretty powerful stuff. You'll have to be very careful when you apply this ointment"".

""If it's for your underarms, make sure you don't use any deodorant for at least 2 days, otherwise you'll get a huge rash"". 

Lady says, ""Ah but it's for"" and before she could finish the pharmacists says:

""Well, if its for your legs, make sure you don't wear any tights for at least 3 days!"".

Lady says. ""No, No, you don't understand!""

""It's for my Schnauzer!""

""Well then lady, in that case you'd better not ride any horses for at least a week!"""
I made a shitty joke in Chemistry.,0,It got no reaction.
Irishman walks into a bar and orders 2 whiskeys,0,"Irishman walks into an Irish bar in New York. 

""2 Whiskeys, please!""

Bartender pours the 2 whiskeys, which are quickly consumed.

""2 more, please!"",

Bartender says. ""Ye don't mind me asking, but why the 2 whiskeys?""

""Ah sure, when I left Kerry, me brother and I decided that each time we went to the pub we would order 2 whiskeys like we were both there together and we would drink the other whiskey on behalf of the other""

Bartender says, ""Ah that's a very brotherly thing to do, and how long are you going to keep doing that?""

""Ah sure, we'll continue doing that till we meet again, or until one of us dies"".

&amp;#x200B;

Sure enough, for the next while, the Irishman comes in every night and drinks the 2 whiskeys""

Then one night he walks in looking very solemn and sits down at the bar very teary-eyed.

""One Whiskey, please!""

The bartender knowingly nods and brings the one whiskey. 

""Ah sure, this one's on me. I didn't know your brother, but it's sad I am that he has passed!""

&amp;#x200B;

""What the hell are ye talking about. Me brother's fine, but me, I'm on the wagon!""."
I threw a boomarang 3 years ago.,0,"Now i live in constant fear.

&amp;#x200B;

If Tesla is a fake

 Do they call it an Edison?"
The gecko and the koala,0,"There was a koala on a tree smoking a joint. A little gecko appears and told him ""gosh, koala, you look high af"", and the koala replied with ""yepppp, wanna join me??"", ""of course"" said the gecko.

After several minutes, the gecko said ""hey, you know what, I'm kinda thirsty"", then the koala said ""there's a river down there, go drink some water and then come back here"".

The gecko walked down to the river and mr. crocodile passed by him saying ""yooooo, gecko!!! look at your eyes! where did you get that pot?"", ""heyyy mr. crocodile, i got this from koala, ask him for some, he will sure gave you!""

After a few minutes, koala saw mr. crocodile coming on his way, his eyes popped out and he yelled ""the fUUUUUCK gecko, did you drink the whole water from the river????"""
My new Thai girlfriend said a small penis shouldn't stand in the way of our love.,0,"Still, I wish she didn't have one."
Some philosophers can do martial arts. These philosophers are called...,0,So-karate-s
Why are African memes the easiest to steal?,0,"Well, none of them have a watermark..."
"In an old, medieval town there was a bell-ringer who got tired of his job.",0,"Every day he went up the steps in the local bell tower  and rang each bell to signify the start of the afternoon. He got tired of doing this all his life and wanted something more, so he put out flyers asking for new, aspiring bell-ringers.

After some time, a boy came up the bell tower and happily said, ""I want to become the new town bell-ringer!""

The man was ecstatic, but noticed that the boy didn't have any arms. So he responded, ""Well how are ya going to ring the bells if you can't hit them?""

And the boy said, ""Watch this.""

And he swung by his feet around the bell tower from the ropes hanging above him, hitting each bell in the tower perfectly with his head. He did this for some time as the man watched in awe - until he came upon the final bell, located next to a large window. 

He gave one final swing but he missed the bell and fell to his death out the window.

The man quickly ran down the stairs and saw a crowd had formed around the boy's body. One man asked, ""Does anyone know who he was?"" and the man responded, 

""I don't know, but his face rings a bell."""
"On June 6, 1944, Americans landed on Normandy beach.",0,Guess you could say Hitler did Nazi that coming
"Me in court: This hereby proves women are not humans, but things",0,"Female lawyer: I Object!   
Me: Yes, you object"
That girl said she faked orgasm last night when she was with me,0,"Jokes on her, i faked my life and personality to get laid."
What did the Chernobyl victim name his balls?,0,"Bill, Kevin, Tom, and Steve"
Who lives in the pineapple under the sea?,0,[deleted]
A priest and a rabbi walk into a bar,0,[removed]
"If you’re Divine and you want to stop a river, what do you do?",0,"You God Dam it!


-I thought this up after hearing mom say her 2nd favorite curse"
All terrorists want the same thing,0,"And its fucking disrupting. 

Im sorry if someone else said this before me i thought of it myself and hopefully i didn’t repost."
What's the difference between COVID and a Karen?,0,[removed]
What do you call the seat behind shotgun,0,The Kurt Corbain
What's the difference between a redditor's want for validation and their willingness put in the effort to get it?,0,[deleted]
Why was Robin Hood not happy with the redditor?,0,They would always hit up his arrow for Karma
Two British officers are sitting having dinner.,0,"Two British Officers are sitting having dinner, one officer notices two weevils crawling on their dinner table. One short and one long, he asks the other officer which one would he take given the choice. The other officer is unsure and after a brief thought chooses the longer weevil. The others officer shakes his head and says “don’t you know you should always choose the lesser of two weevils."
Two guys are headed to a friend's house.,0,"""Not sure we should go there now. Something messed up happened to him. He needs to let off some steam.""

The other friend says while eating a bag of candy

""Choo choo"""
Classic,0,"A woman goes to the doctors complaining about her partner.  ""I just keep thinking he's only with me because I'm gullible and stupid"" she sobbed ""Could there be something mentally wrong with me?""  ""I'm sorry Miss Jones"" said the doctor, taking off his glasses.  ""I'm going to have to take a look at your vagina."""
FUCK SALT,0,[deleted]
Early Retirement,0,"Had this around since retirement.  Hadn't see it on r/Jokes since I joined.

To: all staff

   
Due to the current financial situation, management has decided to give all workers with over 25 yrs service an early retirement. 

This scheme will be known as 

RAPE (Retire Aged Personnel Early).  
Persons selected to be RAPED can apply to Management to be eligible for 

SHAFT scheme (Special Help After Retirement). 

Persons who have been RAPED &amp; SHAFTED will be reviewed under 

SCREW. (Scheme For Retired Early Workers). 

A person may be RAPED only once, SHAFTED twice and SCREWED as many times as management deems appropriate.  Persons who have been RAPED can apply to get 

AIDS (Additional Income for Dependant or Spouse) or 

HERPES (Half Earnings for Retired Early Personnel Scheme). 

Obviously persons who have AIDS or HERPES will not be SHAFTED or SCREWED any further 

Persons staying on will receive 

SHIT (Special High Intensity Training) 

Management has always prided itself for the amount of SHIT it gives.

Sincerely. 

I. M.  Not responsible

Human Resources Manager"
Why could you see the astroids willy?,0,He'd left his belt at home
I was just making my own bread because the store by me was all sold out..,0,"I finished mixing the dough and left it in a bowl to rise for an hour or so.. I was about to put the flour away, but then I decided to leave it out... I’ll probably kneed it later.."
A pair of newly weds go to see a fertility expert,0,[removed]
A priest and a rabbi run out of a burning church and the Priest says “what about the children” the rabbi says “fuck the children”,0,[removed]
I have noticed one thing during this lock down and I am getting rid of Google and Wikipedia.,0,My wife knows fucking everything.
Humour's all about expectations for me.,0,There's nothing funnier than a well mannered person defying expectations with a good 'fuck'.
What do you call a crazy Spanish train driver's reason to commit murder ?,0,A Loco-motive!
I bought a bad thesaurus the other day,0,It was so bad that it was... bad
Kim Jong-un has unfortunately died and the North Korean subordinates gathered for a serious meeting.,0,"After hours of discussion, they decided it'd be best to replace him with a look alike to fool the foreign leaders.  A Kim Jong-un look alike contest was organised and the winner was to be selected to rule Korea.

 Fliers and posters of the contest was all over North Korea and a majority of the people took interest in dressing up as their supreme leader. 

Meanwhile the news of Jong's death reached American Intelligence and it was conveyed to President Trump. He decided he'd participate in the contest and take control of North Korea. The best prosthetic makeup team was assembled and Trump was made to look alike Kim Jong-Un after tiring hours. 

The President traveled to North Korea and took part in the contest. The officials were pleased with the participants and decided to short list Trump with 2 other contestants. Since all 3 had striking resemblance to their previous leader, they decided to select the winner based on intelligence. 

The 3 contestants were asked how Korea could be recognised as a great country. The first person said, ""Increase the budget towards education and research."" Disappointed with his answer, the Korean officers moved on to the next. ""Make an alliance with Russia and become a supreme power"", said the second in a familiar tone. The officials were still not pleased and moved on to the last person. ""We can become the first country to land on the Sun"" said Mr Trump with a huge grin on his face. The officials said the Sun is too hot and he'd die if he gets anywhere close. Annoyed by their ignorance, he said ""Just land during the night."""
I didn’t believe it when my friend told me he was a blacksmith,0,He was white and his name was John Baker.
Before guns were invented,0,"armies had to throw bullets at each other and if a bullet touched you, you had to sit this one out until the next war"
The Velocity of Money,0,"
It is a slow day in the small Saskatchewan town of Pumphandle, and streets are deserted. Times are tough, everybody is in debt, and everybody is living on credit.A tourist visiting the area drives through town, stops at the motel, and lays a $100 bill on the desk saying he wants to inspect the rooms upstairs to pick one for the night. As soon as he walks upstairs, the motel owner grabs the bill and runs next door to pay his debt to the butcher.The butcher takes the $100 and runs down the street to retire his debt to the pig farmer.The pig farmer takes the $100 and heads off to pay his bill to his supplier, the Co-op.  The guy at the Co-op takes the $100 and runs to pay his debt to the local prostitute, who has also been facing hard times and has had to offer her ""services"" on credit.  The hooker rushes to the hotel and pays off her room bill with the hotel owner.  The hotel proprietor then places the $100 back on the counter so the traveler will not suspect anything.  At that moment the traveler comes down the stairs, states that the rooms are not satisfactory, picks up the $100 bill and leaves.


No one produced anything. No one earned anything...  However, the whole town is now out of debt and now looks to the future with a lot more optimism.


And that, ladies and gentlemen, is how a Stimulus package works.  

****
 Actually Some Truth Here....."
The spider sued the internet for copying it....,0,Web designs
I believe that overweight people need more space in our society,0,Literally.
My friends laughed when i mentioned i wanted to be a comedian.,0,Nobodies laughing now.
Have you heard the new band Gender Neutral Asshole?,0,[deleted]
BREAKING NEWS: France has began to sue every company that creates Whiteboards,0,"When asked why in a Press Conference, France stated that Whiteboards were clearly modeled after their National Flag."
You know what's fun about being sober?,0,[removed]
What did the elephant ask the nudist?,0,How do you breathe through that trunk?
What do the Italians call the NRA?,0,Prosciutto
What is the highest potion in government?,0,Ombudsman
"Professor Moriarty bought a cabin on a couple dozen acres, which he plans to cultivate and, generally, dabble in self-reliance. He thinks this might lure his arch nemesis into a false sense of security...",0,"Ultimately, he’s interested in Holmes deading."
"I am a guitarist and i was thinking of posting some music covers on Facebook. My friends questioned me, ""why do you want to post it on the Facebook as its too outdated ?""",0,"Well, i thought to myself that how can i make them understand that i owe to people behind and using dark web and i want them to enjoy some good music too!"
Why do walruses love a Tupperware party?,0,They're always on the lookout for a tight seal.
If an ice cream shop had 69 flavours. It would be called a ...,0,... nice cream shop.
What's the difference between a hooker and a drug dealer?,0,A hooker can wash her crack and resell it.
"I heard when you put your mobile phone into the microwave, put it on 600 or so and call the number, you can see radioactivity!",0,I tried that and now I can't reach it at all. What did I do wrong?
"Maybe the joke ""How do you disable a soldier from the USA?"" holds true after all. ""Remove his toilet paper.""",0,[removed]
My friend of mine saw my Penis accidentally. He said to me it has a nice shape,0,"I said: Thanks, I grew it myself."
"A monk, a friar, and a rabbit walk in to a bar.",0,"The rabbit says,
""Damn autocorrect."""
An attractive young woman got on an elevator with me,0,"She proceeded to take off all of her clothes and said ""make me feel like a woman,"" to which I agreed. I took off all my clothes and put them on the floor and said ""fold them."""
We shouldn't trust China on Coronavirus numbers,0,"I mean, there are a bunch of red flags."
Would you trade a Politician's life to end the Covid-19 outbreak?,0,"If the answer is 'Yes', please provide answer the following questions:

Which one would be your choice?

And why Trump?"
Why did Kim Jong Un die?,0,"Kim Jong ill

ksorrybye"
"What word starts with 'm' , ends with 'arriage' and is a man's favourite thing?",0,[deleted]
what do you do when you are stuck in a sewer with no hope of escape?,0,you commit sewer-side
I think Chris pratt likes his potatoes chris-p (crispy),0,[removed]
I have no problem following these stay at home and social distancing orders...,0,"...after being on house arrest and being ordered to stay 500 feet away from someone, it's a piece of cake!"
"One night, Donald Trump is visited by three ghosts",0,"Early in the night, the ghost of FDR appears.
Trump asks him, ""How can I make America great again?""
FDR says, ""Think only of the people; don't promote hate &amp; bigotry.
Trump sneers and goes back to sleep.


A few hours later, he is awakened by George Washington’s ghost
Trump asks, “How can I make America great again?”
Washington replies, “Never tell a lie.”
Trump laughs and goes back to sleep.


At 3 in the morning, he is visited by the ghost of Abraham Lincoln.
Again, Trump asks, “How can I make America great again?”
Lincoln responds, “Go to the theatre."""
I cut ties with someone who was dragging me down...,0,Mountain climbing with a friend is hard
What do you call a friend who skies,0,[removed]
"My son, its finally home to talk about sex...",0,"Sex is great, and I have it ALL THE TIME.

Just don't tell your mother"
"So, If a tesla is stolen",0,Do they call it an Edison?
How does Uber deliver food during COVID-19 social distancing?,0,Uber yeets
To everyone who was born on April 22,0,Happy Earth day!
Just finished my online course on creative writing.,0,The feeling in undiscribable.
The funny thing about reddit mods,0,\[deleted\]
Coronavirus joke,0,[removed]
"While at the bakery, I couldn't figure out why this one loaf of bread was so much more expensive than the others...",0,"...I asked the baker and he said, ""Because that one is pure bread."""
Dropped my earbuds in the toilet this morning,0,Man am I pissed off...
What do you call a woman with no arms and no legs in a swamp?,0,Marsha.
What’s the difference between a nuclear button and a hospital call button?,0,Kim Jong Un won’t ever use the nuclear button again
A husband and wife are eating at a restaurant,0,"The wife spills a bit of wine on her white top, and exclaims, ""Oh no, I look like a pig!""

The husband turns away from the TVs, nods, and says, ""And you spilled some wine!"""
It's a poor workman who blames his tools.,0,Because he can't afford new tools.
It a poor workman who blames his tools.,0,[deleted]
Here's why it's perfectly fine to sleep with your cousin more than twice,0,[removed]
20 Most Hilarious Jokes Have Some Fun,0," 

1. To an overly cautious security guard: “Ain’t no sniper looking for me at no Applebee’s. I’m not at the sniper level in my career. I’m not there yet.”
2. How he thinks dads supervise their kids: “We sit on the couch and listen for (expletive). That’s how we watch our kids. Kids do whatever they want when they’re with dad.”
3. On his family’s fighting chops: “When I saw my dad get knocked out and I saw my brother get knocked out, it made me feel like, as a family, we’re not good at this particular activity.”
4. His son’s anger tactics: “My baby is weird man…when he get mad, he gets in the oven.”
5. On expensive living: “You ever get a bill so high, you try to put it in the light, like it’s gonna change?”
6. While roasting **Justin Beiber**: “You not a gangster Justin… accept that! **Orlando Bloom** took a swing at you—that’s not gangsta Justin, it’s not! He has a perfume called ‘Girlfriend’—that’s not gangsta, Justin!”
7. His view of modern dating: “Considering today’s relationships = First week: I love you baby. Second week: Together forever. And third week: Single.”
8. On the importance of clear pronunciation: “If I still cannot hear what you have to say after you have repeated it three times, I will just laugh and hope it was not a question.”
9. How much he hates hangovers: “Whoever invented liquor should be shot dead immediately, hangovers are the worst. I swear it feels like a very fat baby is kicking me repeatedly in the head.”
10. On his divorce: “She’s happy. She’s moved on. I’m happy. I’ve moved on. I’m happier than she is, though.”
11. Justified assault: “I think if you get kicked in the face you deserved it because that means that you watched the foot come to your face.”
12. On defending his family: “I’m so protective of my kids. Me and this boy got into it at Chuck E. Cheese’s. It wasn’t a fight – it was an altercation.”
13. Weeding out the fake fans: “The day **Rick Ross** dives into the crowd, is the day we find out who his true fans are.”
14. On his short stature: “Height is a perception…Someone told me the other day, ‘You’re a lot smaller than I thought you were.’ I was like, ‘Well, that means you’re thinking wrong.’”
15. On catching **Lady Gaga** after she took a spill at the Golden Globes: “I had to catch her, and while I caught her, I said, ‘I just want you to realize how big my arms are.’ …I didn’t let her \[fall\] down that far because I’m a hero.”
16. How he viewed his high school accomplishments: “You never know your level of underachieving until you see what overachieving looks like.”
17. On comedy slang: “I’m surprised the government’s wiretapping programs haven’t sent a lot of innocent comedians to Guantanamo: You going to the club? Yeah, I’m gonna kill there. I’ll probably bomb.”
18. His lying habits: “I’m a (expletive) liar. If I’m late, something drastic happened. ‘Yo, dude, sorry I’m late. I was on the highway, and this (expletive) baby started running on the highway. Yeah, I know right, (expletive)’s crazy. So I got out of the car and started chasing the baby.'”
19. On his anger issues: “It’s my mom’s funeral. I’m on the right side, I’ve got the casket….I’m crying, I’m a mess….My dad sees me crying, my dad stood up, punched me in the back of the head. ‘Man up. She gone.’ I forgot where I was, I threw the casket.”
20. On the flux of life: “Sometimes you got to take three steps back to know that there’s a lot more steps you can still take backward.”"
Human: The fight against environment pollution is a lost battle,0,[removed]
Human: The fight against environmental pollution is a lost cause,0,[removed]
What's the difference between a G-spot and a golf,0,A guy will actually search for a golf ball.
Cigarettes are so good for the environment,0,They kill humans.
"""Is it crude to make oil jokes now?"" She asked.",0,"""No its oilright"" I replied"
Why did the duck become broke and homeless?,0,Because he smoked to much quack
the cardiologist,0,"if a cardiologist robs a bank, and the police catch him, you are technically allowed to call it cardiac arrest"
Preparations for parenthood - getting groceries.,0,"New parents:  going to the grocery store with a small child takes some preparation.  Here is a tip, to get some practice before you try it for real.   
   
  Go to a local farm or petting zoo and ask them to borrow a fully grown goat (If you intend to have more than one child, take a equal number of goats). Give each of them an extra large espresso and release them into the store.     
  Now, buy your week's groceries without letting any the goats out of your sight. Walk through the candy isle to the check-out line. Pay for everything the goats eat or destroy. Get your grocies to the car and into the trunk without losing the goat. Until you can easily accomplish this while looking cheerful and fulfilled, do not attempt to children shopping."
"A guy walks into a bar, sits at a table and orders a beer.",0," He then proceeds to pull out hundreds of pink valentine's day cards, write inside them and stamp them with ""Love"" stamps. He then pulls out a bottle of expensive perfume and spritzes each envelope. 

The bartender finally can't contain his curiosity and approaches the man. ""You must have 500 or more cards there,"" the bartender says. ""I've got to admit I'm curious what you're doing.""

 ""Oh, every year at Valentine's Day I send out 500 cards, each one signed 'Guess Who?'"" the guy says. 

""But why?"" the bartender asks. 

""I'm a divorce lawyer,"" the guy replies."
The Welsh invented the condom using sheep's guts,0,But the English improved upon the idea by taking them out of the sheep
Told my friend I just accidentally bent my (newly rolled) joint 90° by mistake,0,He said most joints are supposed to do that
You're gonna have to get in line...,0,"Long funeral procession of men were walking down the street, all being led by one guy and his dog.
   ""So, who died?"" asked a bystander.
   ""My mother-in-law.  She got bit by my dog"".
   ""Hey, can I borrow that dog?""
   ""You're gonna have to get in line.""

..."
Kim Jong Un is now Kim Jong Unhealthy,0,or Kim Jong Ill
"Me, to my neighbour: Sorry I ran over your cat when I was trying to back out. Here, I baked a cake for you.",0,"My neighbour: You did WHAT?

Me: Baked a cake."
A soprano and an alto are performing a duet.,0,"After the performance, they meet up to talk about how they did.

After some time, they come to a conclusion that they weren’t on the same wavelength."
Just so everybody's clear.....,0,I'm going to put my glasses on
My mate and I went to the local quarry to play football.,0,I won 3-2 on aggregate.
What’s the difference between a fridge and a gay man,0,A fridge doesn’t fart when you pull out meat
Why don't scammers carry wallets?,0,Because they don't keep cache.
A man walks into Drs. Office...,0,"           So a man walk into his Drs office because he can't stop saying the same 2 phrases over and over and says he's losing his mind . ""I'm A teepee I'm A wigwam  I'm A teepee I'm A wigwam. I don't get it doc. I just can't stop saying I'm A teepee I'm A wigwam I'm A teepee I'm A wigwam..""
           After some time of poking, prodding and testing, the Dr. finally says to the man ""Well according to the results, it appears that your two tents."""
Did you hear about the guy with two butts?,0,Turns out he was a little biased.
If World War 3 is not coming anytime soon,0,then why are so many fish in tanks.
This one time a Persian guy tried to fight me,0,Iran
Why did the blonde invest in a company that makes 2-metre long double-ended butt plugs?,0,Because the news reported that sex workers were having a difficult time these days making ends meet.
I wondered why the baseball was getting bigger.,0,Then it hit me.
"The girl who was refusing to show me her boobs, today I found her breastfeeding 😂😍",0,Lol patience pays 🤗🤗
Whom do you think will Kim jong un's death affect the most and why Trump?,0,[removed]
Amish Farmer,0,"An Amish farmer, walking through his field, notices a man kneeling down and drinking from his farm pond. 

The Amish farmer shouts: 
'Trink das wasser nicht. Die kuhen haben dahin gesheissen.' (Which means: 'Don't drink the water, the cows have sh-t in it.') 

The kneeling man shouts back: 
'I'm a Muslim, I don't understand you. I speak Arabic and English. If you can't speak in the sacred tongue of Islam, speak in English.' 

The Amish farmer says: 'Use two hands, you'll get more"
THE BACK PEW,0,"
There was a preacher whose wife was expecting a baby so he went before
the congregation and asked for a raise. After much discussion, they
passed a rule that whenever the preacher's family expanded, so
would his paycheck.
After 6 children, this started to get expensive and the Congregation
decided to hold another meeting to discuss the preacher's salary.

There was much yelling and bickering about how much the clergyman's
additional children were costing the church. Finally, the Preacher got
up and spoke to the crowd, ""Children are a gift from God,"" he said.
Silence fell on the congregation.

In the back pew, a little old lady stood up and in her frail voice said,
""Rain is also a gift from God, but when we get too much of it, we wear rubbers.""

And the congregation said, ""Amen""."
Donald...,0,Trump
NSFW Do you guys ever suffer from being in your thots too much?,0,*thoughts
Hospital worries,0,"A suspected Covid-19 male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen mask over his mouth and nose. A young student female nurse appears and gives him a partial sponge bath.  
""Nurse,""' he mumbles from behind the mask, ""are my testicles black?"".  
Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, ""I don't know, Sir. I'm only here to wash your upper body and feet.""
He struggles to ask again, ""Nurse, please check for me. Are my testicles black?""
Concerned that he might elevate his blood pressure and heart rate from worrying about his testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment and
pulls back the covers.
She raises his gown, holds his manhood in one hand and his testicles gently in the other.
She looks very closely and says, ""There's nothing wrong with them, Sir. They look fine.""
The man slowly pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her, and says very slowly,
""Thank you very much. That was wonderful. Now listen very,
very, closely:
""Are - my - test - results - back?"""
The better Sex,0,"A little girl and boy are fighting about the differences between the sexes, and which one is better. Finally, the boy drops his pants and says, “Here’s something I have that you’ll never have!” The little girl is pretty upset by this, since it is clearly true, and runs home crying. A while later, she comes running back with a smile on her face. She drops her pants and says, “My mommy says that with one of these, I can have as many of those as I want!”"
A British man is visiting Australia.,0," The man at customs asks him  


""Do you have a criminal record?""  


The British man replies  


""I didn't think you'd need one to get into Australia any more."""
2020 joke,0,A man walks into a bar.
"I think we should cancel 2020, have 2021 to recover then call the year after",0,2020 two
A new health-tracking service is keeping flab at bay during this lockdown.,0,Fatbit
"A man was gunned down at a playground by gang members who mistook him for making gang signs, while singing a nursery rhyme to his son. Guess what song it was?",0,The Itsy Bitsy Spider.
OIL IS NOW CHEAPER THAN COLA,0,"Now oil is cheaper than cola

&amp;#x200B;

SO DONT BUY COLA BUY OIL (to drink)"
What is a Freudian slip?,0,It’s when you say one thing and mean a mother
What is a Freudian slip?,0,[removed]
Kim Jong-un's doctors...,0,Probably fancy a Korea change
"Me: Repeat what I say then say what, okay?",0,[removed]
"A politician walks into the bar with their mouth covered in bullshit. The bartender offers him a napkin. The politician takes it and says ""Thank you. Do you know what party I belong to?"" The bartender says ""No, but it doesn't matter. You all wear the same makeup.""",0,[removed]
The Grian dilemma,0,"Everyone: *spells Grian as Grain*

Grian: “Am I a bread to you?”"
Whats the gathering of Covidiots called ?,0,Covfefe
Hear about the new restaurant called Karma?,0,[removed]
How were the pyramids built?,0,The dinosaurs did it.
Staying at home during this covid-19 pandemic has forced me to relearn a few things,0,[removed]
A man who just won £100m on the lottery is being interviewed on TV news.,0,"Interviewer : What are you planning to do with your winnings?

Winner : I’m going to spend half of it on expensive sports cars, women of dubious morals, strong drink, drugs and gambling.

Interviewer : And what will you do with the other half?

Winner : I’ll probably just waste it."
I met my wife in the 4th grade,0,"well, she was in the 4th grade, I was graduating high school."
A guy carrying a lizard walks into a bar,0,[removed]
Where does a muslim man drop off his wife before going to work?,0,[removed]
I started a summer camp for kids with add/adhd to teach them to manage their symptoms.,0,"It didn’t do so well, people kept telling me “concentration camp” was a bad name."
What bust?,0,"A young man went to the drug store and asked for a package of condoms.

""We have something new, colored condoms,"" said the clerk. ""Special introductory price!""

So the young man bought a package of colored condoms.

Ten months later he was back at the drug store, and asked for a maternity bra.

The same clerk was on duty, and he asked, ""What bust?""

""The yellow one."""
Have you all heard of Trump's Stimulus Rewards Program?,0,You just have to vote for him in November.
What’s the best thing about having sex with forty three year olds?,0,There are 40 of them
For his full life the supreme leader of North Korea has tried to emulate his father and he has finally done it now.,0,He is now Kim Jong-ill.
After considering Florida peeps trying to shoot at a hurricane incident...,0,Shocked they're not trying to shoot at the coronavirus...
Gay terrorists strike Laguna Beach!,0,They’ve been breaking into houses and rearranging the furniture.
"My wife got suspicious when I went back home after sleeping with the clown,*ILTC*",0,she said I was smelling funny.
what's the difference between a Lambo and a pile of bodies,0,[removed]
I blocked a girl for correcting my grammar,0,It feelded good
I used to be a boy stuck in a girl's body,0,Then I was born
I farted in an apple store.,0,Not my fault they didn't have Windows.
What’s black and dangerous?,0,A crow with a machine gun
"""Bit windy up here.""",0,"A coworker and I were fixing a light a couple dozen feet off the ground. It was dark, cold, and we were getting chilled to the bone.

Jerry said, ""Bit windy up here.""

I said, ""You bit *Wendy* up here??""

He said, ""Yeah, right on the tit!""

&amp;#x200B;

HAHAHA! This cracks me up every time I think about it!"
"So this one time, I kicked a pregnant lady.",0,The punishment was a life sentence.
What's small green and smells like bacon?,0,Kermits finger
What happens when the CIA goes to sleep?,0,The go undercover!
Covid-19,0,"Good, that’ll make me go viral."
How do you keep 330 million idiots in suspense ?,0,You leave out the punchline
"All my life I thought air was free, until I bought a bag of chips",0,[removed]
"I made it into my school’s honor band, and we had to try on suits to see which ones fit.",0,"I went late in the order, and my suit didn’t fit, so I had to change into a different suit. That one fit, so I went to the bathroom to change out of it. In between taking my dress pants off and putting my regular pants off there was a fire drill.

It really caught me with my pants down."
Why'd the simp cross the road?,0,To get to Simpleton
A man’s last meal,0,"So a prisoner is about to be executed and the guards ask him, 
“What do you want your last meal to be?”
“Strawberry’s”, he responds. 
“But it’s winter. We can’t get strawberries until spring”
“Eh. I’ll wait”"
What makes salamanders so annoying?,0,They axolotl questions
Did you hear about the kidnapping at school?,0,It’s ok he woke up.
My life.,0,No punchline. My life is literally a joke. Fuck you.
"BREAKING NEWS: The leader of North Korea, Kim Jong-un, is brain-dead following an invasive medical procedure.",0,Officials praise the regime for finding common grounds with the US.
Why did the frog dive head first into the water,0,becase the frog was trying to eat a flie and the flie landed on his eye. the frog was scared......
A man stands in front of a food truck and reads the menu:,0,"Cheeseburgers: $5

Fries: $3

Handjobs: $10

He walks up to the window and asks the beautiful blonde working behind the counter, ""Are you the one that gives the handjobs?""

""Yes, I am,"" she replies seductively.

""Well, wash your hands, I want a cheeseburger."""
A teacher asked her students to use the word 'fascinate' in a sentence.,0,"Little Johnny raised his hand. The
teacher hesitated because she had
been burned by Johnny before. She
finally decided there was no way he
could damage the word 'fascinate', so
she called on him. Johnny said, ""My
Aunt Gina has a sweater with ten
buttons, but her boobs are so big she
can only fasten eight."""
I was hangin' with a couple of buddies,0,"We got really toasted &amp; for some reason we got on the subject of porn. Weird porn. Incest porn, furry porn. Just some kinks. One of my buds pulls up a weird incest/furry porn that was really unwatchable for me. We scrolled through some thumbnails and I said ""stop, go back, that one."" He clicked on it we were watching someone in a large chicken suit fuck someone in an egg suit. My bud was like ""WTF!, Fuck this! This is lame"". He went to stop the video &amp; I said ""wait, we have to see the end, we have to see it""! The other guy was like ""why? You couldn't watch that other shit &amp; this is worse"".  I stood up and said ""Jesus Christ man, don't you see""? ""We get to see which came first!"""
What do you get when you cross a male human with a turkey?,0,A stupid turkey.
Ok here's one,0,whats the difference between a good joke and a bad joke punctuation
A gay deer walks out of a bar...,0,"Then he said, ""I can't believe I just blew fifty bucks!"""
My father says I'm dumb but I know...,0,Dad jokes
Here's one,0,[deleted]
What’s the difference between a hoedown and a hootenanny?,0,"It takes a bunch of people to have a hootenanny, but one strong man can hold a hoedown..."
Two inmates were caught having sex and the deputy jailer was furious.,0,"The lawyer representing the inmates told the jailer

""Why can't you let bi-cons be bi-cons and move on"""
During the stay-at-home lockdown a couple are having a conversation in their apartment,0,"Man: Honey let's go drive to the overlook and watch the sunset.

Woman: We can't. It may be legal but it's safer if fewer people go out because of the Coronavirus.

Man: Let's go to the market and get some food.

Woman: I know you like to be around people but we already have plenty of food and it's safer if fewer people go out because of the Coronavirus.

Man: Aww come on honey can't we have any fun?

Woman: How about shopping online for clothes? Can I use your credit card? Mine's tapped out.

Man: I am sorry for the inconvenience but responses to requests make take longer because of the Coronavirus."
👨🏿‍💼👨🏿‍💼👨🏿‍💼 👨🏿‍💼⚰️👨🏿‍💼 👨🏿‍💼👨🏿‍💼👨🏿‍💼,0,[removed]
How has there not been a class action lawsuit against the major diaper companies?,0,Those things have never held the 22-37 pounds they advertise.
A mysterious German ghost gives a young man directions.,0,"“Make another Reich.”

“This is the fourth right in a row, you sure you know where we’re going?”

“Ja.”"
Why did the gay man leave his hotel so early?,0,He got his shit packed the night before.
"My son screeched, ""Daaaaaad, you haven't listened to one word I've said, have you!?"" What a strange way to start a conversation with me...",0,Lmao I’m not actually a dad I just thought this was a really good joke.
I must be Asian,0,[removed]
One day a man went to an auction.,0,"While
there, he bid on a parrot.
He really wanted this bird, so he got caught
up in the bidding.
He kept on bidding, but kept getting outbid, so
he bid higher and higher and higher.
Finally, after he bid way more than he intend-
ed, he won the bid - the parrot was his at last!
As he was paying for the parrot, he said to
the Auctioneer, ""I sure hope this parrot can
talk.
I would hate to have paid this much for it, only
to find out that he can't talk!""
""Don't worry,"" said the Auctioneer. ""He can
talk.
Who do you think kept bidding against you?"""
How can you spot a Chemist in the bathroom?,0,"They wash their hands
before they use the toilet."
"This robot was being mean to me, so I started clubbing him.",0,I was arrested for battery.
The best thing about working from home is...,0,...I can masturbate at my desk and no one calls HR and the police.
"If Oil gets much lower, oil companies might have to lay off some members of Congress.",0,[removed]
Announcer: It's time for everyone's favorite gameshow...,0,#WHAT THE FUCK ARE WE GONNA MAKE FOR DINNER TONIGHT?!
"Original: So finally despite all his mishaps, Paddy gets to knock on the pearly gates",0,"There St. Peter welcomes him, tells him they have been expecting him for some time now but first he must answer the usual questions.

Paddy knowing he hasn't been living the purest of lives, to put it gently, is a bit suspicious and so he   
asks St. Peter if this really is the gates to heaven, and not just a prank or some kind of virtual reality thing?  
   
No, says St. Peter. This really is the gates to heaven.   
Well if so says Paddy, before I start to answer any of those interview questions, maybe I could ask you two small questions? Just two tiny ones, so I could verify it, so to speak?  
Sure, go ahead says St. Peter.

Well, says Paddy. Have you ever seen God drinking and eating any food, you know like a having a pint with some bacon and cabbage?

No, I don't think I have ever seen him eating any food, he is God after all and I don't think he needs any food. Did you have any more questions?

Just two more, says Paddy, who is still a bit skeptic.   
Can I get to see God almighty himself. You know, just to be sure. Used to watch all these prank videos and you never know. Don't want this to be some kind of prank.

St. Peter: That is the first time anyone asks. I can't promise you he will have time.   
But I will see what I can do.  
After a while St. Peters comes back, and lo and behold, with an old tall man, with long white glittering beard, dressed in a white gown, and radiating with light.

Paddy, puts on his sunglasses.   
Paddy: I must say your prank is quite impressive.

St. Peter: No, this is not a prank. You are lucky, God almighty here just finished answering some prayers from someone asking for a Mercedes Benz. You may ask him your question now.

Paddy: Hey ""God"" could ya pull up that white dress of yours and bend over, so I can see your bottom?

Paddy immediately finds himself in what looks like a stylish lawyer office, standing first in a long line of people, many of whom looked like Reddit atheists, leading up to a sexy secretary with fiery red hair, red lipstick, two horns and a tail sitting behind a desk.   
Next to her is a door with the label. Welcome to Hell.  


The secretary: You must have really upset God, being transferred first in line! Never seen that happen before. Can't wait to hear what you did! But before you may enter, we must see if you qualify.  
Don't worry, it's just formalities.   
Paddy explains what happened. That he: ""Only asked God to pull up his shirt and bend over"".  


The secretary: Did you ask God to bend over? 

Paddy: Sure did. 

The secretary: The Devil got to hear this. He is gonna love it. He will probably give you his best treatment.   
You know it's not so bad as they say. You will get to have all the charcoal grilled barbecues you like.   
If I call him now, can you tell him what you did?   
She pics up a not yet released model of the coming IPhone, made of pure gold.   
Dials a video call to the Devil, and tells him he really need to hear what this Paddy guy just did and hands the phone over to Paddy.  


The devil: So you are...Paddy?   
Paddy: Yes, last time I checked that's me Paddy alright.   
The devil: This better be good. I was just about to grill this Zuckerberg and a bunch of reddit atheist.  
Paddy proceeds to tell him that he ""only asked God to pull up his shirt and bend over"".   
The devil turns all pale, as pale as a devil can turn, which is rather more yellowish.  
The devil: Just to make sure I got this right. You Paddy ask God, the almighty, to bend over?  
Paddy: Sure did!

Paddy immediately finds himself teleported back to the Pearly gates.  


St. Peter: What, are you doing here? You are supposed to be in hell.  
Paddy: Yes, I'd love to, but apparently they wouldn't accept me.  
St. Peter: Is that so? He picks up his phone and calls the devils secretary.   
St. Peter, a bit upset trying to keep his dignity: Can I please get to talk to the devil?   
St. Peter: Ok, he says he absolutely refuse to take in someone with bigger balls than himself.   
I guess than there is no other available option than to let you in. Just tell me one thing before you enter.   
Why did you ask God to pull up his gown?  
Paddy: You see, whenever anything bad happened and I cursed God. I was always told by me friend that: ""God is not an asshole Paddy"". So I figured, the only way I can be sure he is the real God is if he don't have an asshole, because you can't be an asshole if you don't have one."
My girlfriend had this weird fetish...,0,[removed]
Have you ever heard about a reverse exorcism?,0,It's when a demon tells the priest to leave the child's body.
Funny,0,[removed]
Get the FACTS: COVID-19 FAQ,0,[removed]
What’s the cheapest type of meat?,0,"Deer balls, they’re under a buck."
I heard Joe Biden was kissing babies,0,with tongue.
Have I ever told you guys about the time I stopped a rape ?,0," Yea , I just stopped following the bitch"
Gorilla Removal Service.,0,"  A guy looks in his backyard and sees a gorilla in his tree. He googles 'gorilla removal service' and gives them a call. The service guy says that he needs know if it's a male or female gorilla. The man runs outside, checks and tells him it's a male gorilla. The service guy says, ""OK, I'll be right over.""

A short time later the service guy shows up with a long stick, a Chihuahua, a shotgun, and a pair of handcuffs. He then gives the man some instructions: ""I'm going to climb the tree and poke the gorilla with the stick until he falls. When he does, this specially trained Chihuahua will attack the gorilla's testicles. When the gorilla reaches down to protect himself, then you snap the handcuffs on him.""

""OK, the man says, but what do I do with the shotgun?""  The service guy replies, ""Well, if I fall out of the tree before the gorilla does, shoot the Chihuahua."""
A man goes to a doctor and says,0," ""Doctor doctor! I can't eat food through my mouth cause it hurts"" The doc says ""Try eating through your bum, it might help"" A few weeks later the doctor sees the man walking down the road in a very weird way, he asks ""Why are you walking like that? Are you hurt?"" The man replies ""No you fool! I'm chewing a toffie""

I found this and knew I had to share"
What's different about a bulimic birthday party?,0,The cake jumps out of the girl
The news about what happened to Kim Jong Un just reached America,0,[deleted]
A hedgehog learned how to breathe through his ass,0,then he sat down and suffocated.
My 6 year old just told me this,0,One day four men and four women and four kids were walking around and they died.
What do you call a church shooter?,0,Mass murderer
Why are redneck murder victims the hardest to identify?,0,Because there are never any dental records
A duck walks into a bar,0,"""Not this shit again, I don't have any fucking grapes!"" yells the bartender."
Why are most cop cars Chevy?,0,Because Chevy Chase
"Blue, Red, Yellow, or Orange...",0,Asked the color blind man.
Why does Dr. Pepper come in a bottle?,0,Because he doesn’t have a wife
What's the best thing about Switzerland,0,I don't know but their flag is a huge plus
Just started a business selling birds. The profits are brilliant.,0,So far I have sold some homing pigeons 25 times this week already.
BREAKING NEWS,0,Man cures depression with **MINDBLOWING** technique!
A man dies and arrives at the pearly gates where St. Peter greets him.,0,"He asks St. Peter to let him enter.

**St. Peter**: You can enter only at one condition.

**Man:** What condition my lord?

**St. Peter:** You have to spell one world correctly and only then you can enter.

**Man:** What word?

**St. Peter:** Love!

**Man:** L-O-V-E

**St. Peter:** Ahh! Very good. You can enter now.

The man gets inside when suddenly St. Peter's mobile rang up.

**St. Peter:** ....God is calling me, you stay here and watch the gate. I will be back soon.

**Man:** As you wish my lord.

**St. Peter:** If any person reaches here in my absence then ask them to spell the world 'Love' before letting them in. If they spell it correctly, then let them enter the pearly gates otherwise send them straight to the door of hell right in front of you.

**Man:** Understood!

After saying this, St. Peter leaves and the man starts to guard the gates.

After some time a woman arrives there. The man is astonished by seeing his wife there.

So he asks, ""Emily, what are you doing here?""

**Woman:** After your funeral, when I was returning home, a bus came raging by and crushed me. When I got my conscious, I found myself here. Now get aside and let me in.

**Man:** No. Not like this. God has some rules here. First, I will ask you to spell a word. If you spell it correctly then I will let you in otherwise you have to knock on the door of hell.

**Woman:** What word?

**Man:** Hydroxychloroquine"
A young man goes into a bar and asks for several shots.,0,"The girl bartender asks him ""What're you celebrating with so many shots.""He says "" Well I just got my first blowjob.""She says ""Oh really?""He says ""Yep gotta wash the taste down."""
Jokes about Hitler are Nazi funniest thing I’ve ever seen.,0,[removed]
Took an exam on the crucifixion the other day.,0,Nailed it.
Like is like a bag of pickles,0,[deleted]
I found a traffic cone next to my sleeping son,0,Should not have slept on the road
I'm on a seafood diet,0,When I seafood I eat it.
I am on seafood diet,0,[deleted]
Are you guys alright?,0,No you’re all left
I wish I didn’t have to deal with her breath,0,"I’m glad I don’t have to clean the litter box any more but Jesus Christ, my dog is disgusting."
Local dairy stores are open from 10am to 12 pm,0,"Damn, must be a long queue because dad hasn't returned since 16 years."
"A wise squirrel once said ""you are what you eat"".",0,"Don't believe him, he was a nut."
A single sperm has 37.5 mb of DNA data encoded,0,"The average ejaculate carries about 1,500 terabytes.

That's a lot of information to swallow"
"With everyone in lockdown, cases of Stuckhome syndrome are significantly increasing.",0,[removed]
Bikes,0,[removed]
Doctor: checking my x-rays,0,"Doctor: this is exactly what I was afraid of 

Me: what

Doctor: skeletons"
I once tried to make a joke about a botched lethal injection...,0,...but the execution failed.
I get why everybody hates Kim Jong Un,0,[removed]
A Jewish girl comes back home at night,0,[removed]
Hol upp,0,"If plastic is made of dinosaur fossils, so does that make a plastic dildo a dinosaur dick?"
What were his last words?,0,[removed]
The Black Rider Cometh!,0,[removed]
"So, the doctor in the insect hospital wants to speak with the patient's sister",0,"He tells her  that her sister gave birth to a beautiful baby .


The sister is so  excited so she starts shouting happily ""I am gonna be an ant !I am gonna be an ant !"""
I was trying to self diagnose my skin condition by using WebMD...,0,"...then I thought, without professional advice its best not to make any rash decisions."
An officer pulls over a man and a woman for driving their car 20 miles per hour over the posted speed limit.,0,[deleted]
My friend's personality is so negative,0,"that when he walks into a party, the guests look around and ask, ""Who left?"""
What’s worse ?,0,[removed]
What did the bartender say to the scrap lumber?,0,Your cutoff
So I had an interview last year,0,"The interviewer: You answers should be quick
Me: Ok
Interviewer: what is 1490/52?
Me:quick"
A demolition company recently made the decision to demolish a stable.,0,[removed]
How do you instantly break up an anti-quarantine rally?,0,Cough.
Put to good use..,0,"I have a friend who's a pilot for EasyJet.
But, because of this lockdown, he's off work,
So l asked him if he fancied doing a bit of decorating for me while he's at a loose end, and he jumped at the chance.
l must say, he made a lovely job of the landing."
My wife and I have been fighting for 5 years,0,"We are both huge Star Wars fans, but Star Wars alone cannot save a marriage.

I finally got the courage to tell her I didn't think we were right for each other.

Wife - ""OK""

Me - ""OK? OK???!!! After five years that's all you have to say???""

Wife - ""May diforce be with you."""
Why was the Soviet Union so good at Geometry?,0,Because they had a Supreme Ruler.
Me and my buddy Jack got a job at a warehouse...,0,Things got slow and the boss called me into the office.He told me that he was going to have to either lay me or Jack off. I told him to jack off. He's not my type.
My boyfriend is called Juan Sebastian.,0,I can't wait to blow his Bach out.
What does a woman’s pussy and a chainsaw have in common?,0,Miss by a few inches and you’re in deep shit
"Which came first, the chicken or the egg?",0,The chicken. You can't fuck an egg.
What's the difference between a white man with a vasectomy and a black man with a vasectomy?,0,[deleted]
Joke no 2051,0,You are welcome.
A man is driving down the highway and the car hits a deer.,0,[removed]
I wasn't in jail 5 minutes before I got raped.,0,[deleted]
What do a bag of chips and a gun have in common?,0,When you pull them out in class suddenly everyone wants to be your friend
My mom left my dad when she found out he was into drag,0,"they used to share a king sized bed, now my dad sleeps on a queen."
"Creating multiple AI’s is hard, especially with slow internet. I asked one of my prototypes how he was feeling. His response was",0,“Why are we still here? Just to buffer?”
What do you call two gays having sex in a cartwheel position?,0,[removed]
Why couldn't the dinosaur lay an egg?,0,it was fucking dead
What’s Austrian and took over France?,0,Croissants
All countries eventually got corona,0,[deleted]
What do you call it if a cow gets struck by lightning?,0,Ground beef.
Corona,0,[removed]
"People tell me to stop making puns, but I can't",0,"Every time I try to swallow my words, I joke on them."
The pot calling the kettle black can't be hypocritical because pot is actually green.,0,[removed]
I used to be poor. Then I started singing on streets for donations.,0,Now I get donations to not sing on streets
I finally got 5 million followers,0,[removed]
Nuts!,0,"What do you call a nut in Brazil?
A Brazil nut.

What do you call a nut on a wall?
A walnut

What do you call nuts on your chest?
Chestnuts

What do you call a nut on a horses chest?
A horse chestnut

What do you call nuts in your pee?
Peanuts

What do you call nuts on your chin?
A good blowjob"
"A man walks in a bar and says: 'I'd like 7 double wiskeys, please.'",0,"The bartender nods and starts pouring 7 glasses of wiskey.

As soon as the first glass is ready the man starts chugging, one glass after another.

The bartender, dumbfolded, asks the man: 'Why are you drinking so fast?'

The man awnsers: 'well, you would do the same as me, if you had what I have,' while chugging the last glass of wiskey.

'So, what is it that you have?' asks the bartender.

The man: 'not a single penny'"
I asked my Roman friend for a HI FIVE.,0,He gave me  HI V.
How do you catch a polar bear?,0,"Cut a hole in the ice and put some peas around it. When the polar bear comes to take a pea, you kick him in the ice hole."
Did you hear Georgia will be reopening massage parlors?,0,It will not result in a happy ending
Mr. Rogers the biology teacher called on Mary,0,"""Can you tell me the part of the body that, under the right conditions expands upto 6 times it's normal size?""

Mary gasped and said in a huff, "" Mr. Rogers! That is a very inappropriate question. The principal will be hearing of this. "" She sat down red faced.

""Susan, can you tell me the answer?"" asked Mr. Rogers.

""The pupil of the eye, under dark conditions."" said Susan.

""That is correct. Now Mary, I have three things to say to you, Firstly, You have not studied your lesson.
Secondly, You have a dirty mind. And Third, boy are you going to be disappointed someday."""
Where do babies always fall asleep?,0,inside a hot car
How do you find a blind man at a nude beach?,0,It’s not hard
Whats the difference between me and cancer?,0,My dad didn’t beat cancer
Parker seeks the help of International Rescue for something out of the ordinary...,0,"""You have to help me, Mr. Tracy. It's Lady Penelope. She has gone crazy! ""

""Gone crazy, Parker? What do you mean by that?""

""It's her drinking....She cannot restrain herself. Every evening for five months she's been in the bar, drinking heavily, disturbing everybody and being utterly uncontrollable!""

""Well, Parker, that does sound terrible I suppose...""

""...But that's not all. Before she orders anything, she goes to the jukebox and plays Surfin' Bird by The Trashmen, ten times! It hardly fits the ambience.....Oh you have to help me. I'm worried her reputation will be in tatters and she might even reveal International Rescue's secrets!""

""Well it's not our usual case, but....."" Jeff Tracy furrowed his brow. ""Does she always play that number?""

""Oh yes. Only Surfin' Bird. She says it's her favourite right now, but...""

""I've got it! All we need is to remove that record from the jukebox, and her audacious behaviour will be over for good!""

""Mr. Tracy, I'm not sure if....""

Before Parker could interject, Jeff  was already making calls. ""We'll get Scott to take Thunderbird 1. We will be there in no time.""

Later, at the bar, Jeff was busy tinkering with the jukebox while Parker watched on apprehensively.

""Mr. Tracy, maybe we should try something else, like....""

""Hush, Parker. I'm concentrating. Besides, this plan is foolproof.......Hmmm...Ah! Got it!"" Jeff held the LP up high before flinging it out of a window. ""And now, we wait.""

Like clockwork, Lady Penelope entered the bar and scrolled through the Jukebox looking for Surfin' Bird. On discovering it was no longer there, she casually raised her eyebrow before nonchalantly walking over to the bartender and getting started on a bottle of Pernod Anise.

""What on Earth....?"" gasped Jeff. ""I thought that strategy couldn't fail! Where did things go wrong, Parker???""

""You see, it is as I feared, Mr. Tracy.....

......The song is gone, but M'lady lingers on."""
What did the electrician say to reassure his apprentice?,0,You conduit!
I wanted to finally have a six-pack so girls would like me so I hired a personal trainer to work me out...,0,...I quick after two days because I couldn't take the ab use.
People who go out of their way to find the same joke 3 years ago just to make someone feel bad that their joke wasn’t original despite the OP just wanting people to laugh,0,To those people: you are the joke
Why did the Astronomer bring a slab of ribs into the bathroom?,0,He wanted to witness a meatier shower.
There's no such thing as a stupid question,0,only stupid people
"Parenting 101: I couldn't believe my ears! My daughter just told me to, and I quote, ""Get off my *%&amp;"" and stormed out...",0,I thought she liked anal...
"To restore a sense of normalcy, Governor Cuomo has declared the Mets must start the MLB season mathematically eliminated from playoff contention",0,[removed]
I hate having explosive diarrhoea...,0,[removed]
TIL the government has a minimum height requirement for workers to receive Coronavirus relief payments. I was so angry...,0,but I'm over it
Squirrels have a habit of storing food in the winter,0,Isn't that nuts?
"What is something that is supposed to be peace and tranquility but is actually painful, numb and the reason you feel the loss in your legs?",0,[removed]
What's the difference between Usain Bolt and Hitler?,0,Usain Bolt can actually finish a race...
"And the Lord said unto John, ""come forth and you will receive eternal life."" But John came 5th and won a blender.",0,[removed]
How do you make one dissapear?,0,Add a G an it's gone
http://chng.it/t2xPDtWK,0,we need change.
A suicide bomber instructor addressing his class said.....,0,"""Alright everyone, watch me closely because I'm only going to do this once"""
What did the one rabbit say to the other rabbit when they saw the carrot field?,0,Must be a buffet
What's the difference between a pigeon and a Texas oilman?,0,The pigeon can still put a deposit on a new Mercedes.
Vegans? People who hate plants.,0,[removed]
Let’s just agree that the worst thing you’ll have to put up with in this quarantine is this:,0,the fact that you opened this post and there’s literally no joke thanks byee
!NSFW! What is the difference between pimples and a catholic priest?,0,Pimples don't come on your face before the age of 13.
How to make a baby,0,"
There is not one dirty word in this, and it is funny.

The Smiths were unable to conceive children and
decided to use a surrogate father to start their family.

On the day the proxy father was to arrive, Mr. Smith kissed his wife goodbye and said, ""Well, I'm off now; the man should be here soon.""

Half an hour later, just by chance, a door-to-door baby photographer happened to ring the doorbell, hoping to make a sale.

Good morning, Ma'am"", he said, ""I've come to..''
Oh, no need to explain,"" Mrs. Smith cut in, embarrassed, ""I've been expecting you.""

""Have you really?"" said the photographer. ""Well, that's good. Did you know babies are my specialty?""

""Well that's what my husband and I had hoped Please come in and have a seat""

After a moment she asked, blushing, ""Well, where do we start?"" 

""Leave everything to me. I usually try two in the bathtub, one on the couch, and perhaps a couple on the bed. And sometimes the living room floor is fun. You can really spread out there.""

""Bathtub, living room floor? No wonder it didn't work out for Harry and me!""

""Well, Ma'am, none of us can guarantee a good one every time. But if we try several different positions and I shoot from six or seven angles, I'm sure you'll be pleased with the results.""

""My, that's a lot!"" gasped Mrs. Smith.

""Ma'am, in my line of work a man has to take his time. I'd love to be in and out in five minutes, but I'm sure you'd be disappointed with that."" 
""Don't I know it,"" said Mrs. Smith quietly.

The photographer opened his briefcase and pulled out a portfolio of his baby pictures. ""This was done on the top of a bus,"" he said.

""Oh my God!"" Mrs. Smith exclaimed, grasping at her throat.

""And these twins turned out exceptionally well - when you consider their mother was so difficult to work with.""

""She was difficult?"" asked Mrs. Smith.

""Yes, I'm afraid so I finally had to take her to the park to get the job done right. People were crowding around four and five deep to get a good look."" 
""Four and five deep?"" said Mrs. Smith, her eyes wide with amazement.

""Yes"", the photographer replied. ""And for more than three hours, too. The mother was constantly squealing and yelling - I could hardly concentrate, I had to rush my shots. Finally, when the squirrels began nibbling on my equipment, I just had to pack it all in.""

Mrs. Smith leaned forward. ""Do you mean they actually chewed on your, uh ...equipment? ""

""It's true, Ma'am, yes.. Well, if you're ready, I'll set-up my tripod and we can get to work right away.""

""Tripod?""

""Oh yes, Ma'am. I need to use a tripod to rest my Canon on. It's much too big to be held in the hand very long.""

Mrs. Smith fainted..... ..."
She kept her promise!,0,"
There was a man who had worked all his life, had saved all of his money, and was a real 'miser' when it came to his money.

Just before he died, he said to his wife...'When I die, I want you to take all my money and put it in the casket with me. I want to take my money to the afterlife with me.' 

And so he got his wife to promise him, with all of her heart, that when he died, she would put all of the money into the casket with him.

Well, he died. He was stretched out in the casket, his wife was sitting there - dressed in black, and her friend was sitting next to her. When they finished the ceremony, and just before the undertakers got ready to close the casket, the wife said, 'Wait just a moment!'
She had a small metal box with her; she came over with the box and put it in the casket. Then the undertakers locked the casket down and they rolled it away. So her friend said,

'Girl, I know you were not fool enough to put all that money in there with your husband.'

The loyal wife replied, 'Listen, I'm a Christian; I cannot go back on my word. I promised him that I was go ing to put that money into the casket with him.'

You mean to tell me you put that money in the casket with him!?!?!?'
'I sure did,' said the wife. 'I got it all together, put it into my account, and wrote him a check.... If he can cash it, then he can spend it.'"
Imagine if Americans had to switch from pounds to Kilograms overnight,0,There would be mass confusion !!
statistically 9/10 people Enjoy gangrape.,0,[removed]
Sum of numbers from 1 to 100 = 5050.,0,Neat. I'm almost 100 and got the same answer from a doctor based on the sum of my life
Excuse me?,0,"I was super tired and was at work having a conversation with my father about compliance. 

I meant to say either, ""I don't want to throw him under the bus"" or "" I don't want to blow the whistle on him.""

What I actually said was 

"" I don't want to blow him under the bus."""
It is ironic that Virgin airlines got screwed over.,0,[removed]
Who is smarter: your average college graduate or a crackhead?,0,Obviously the crackhead
In the small village the 5G transmitter was built.,0,"Some time after building, the villagers started being angry about it. Soon, they made a petition against it. A secretary comes to the director of the project to inform him about the whole situation.
- Director, you may want to look at this.
- What is this?
- A petition against placing our transmitter. They say it's causing them erectile disfunction, sickens their cows, and causes their hens to produce less eggs.
- I see. Now, imagine what will happen when we turn it on!"
Everyone's always going on about it being dangerous to feed bread to ducks because it's bad for their digestive system or something...,0,[removed]
Met some nice gentle men at the bar and they invited me to a house party.,0,"They told me they were going dressed as wizards.

 I thought I’d fit right in but, by golly, they invited me to a Halloween party!!

Now what the hell am I supposed to do with all these damn minorities?!"
I gave that movie 3.14 stars!,0,Cause I pi-rated it.
If God was a woman.,0," Not only am I going to hell, I'll never know why."
Why couldn’t the molecule split up?,0,It was in a legally bonding contract.
The only thing I blaze up this 4/20 is my ex's house. Amarite fellas?,0,Fuck you jessicca.
"There's a flood. A guy has retreated all the way up to his roof. Another guy, in a boat, comes along.",0,"
""Hop in, I'll take you to safety."" Says the guy in the boat.

""Nonsense! I have faith in God. He will bring me salvation."" replies the guy on the roof.

A few hours later, the same guy returns, this time in a police speedboat

""Get in! The water's rising!"" He yells to the guy on his roof.

""My faith in God will save me!"" Yells back the guy trapped on his roof.

Two days pass and a helicopter with a rope hovers over the guy's house.

""Grab onto the rope, I'll lift you to safety!"" The pilot calls out to the man through a loudspeaker.

""I have faith in my Lord! God will save me!"" The man yells back. Reluctantly, the pilot flies away.

The waters rise above the guy's roof and he's swept away. When he gets to heaven, he confronts God.

""Why did you not save me? Were my prayers not answered? I don't understand!"" He says to God, who looks at him quizzically and replies.

""I sent you a rowboat, a motorboat and finally a helicopter. I don't know what more you expected of me."""
An old joke,0,[removed]
What’s the difference between me and cancer?,0,My dad didn’t beat cancer
How do you reward a shoe cleaner for a job well done?,0,[removed]
"I caught my uncle paying prostitute for sex, i was shocked",0,Never knew people get paid for sex.
What has two butts and can kill people?,0,An Assassin
Funny how things are still tagged NSFW,0,As if any of us still have jobs
Men and women have never been so united..,0,Now we both have to cover our lips.
Virgin Australia is in crisis,0,Will any of you be moving downunder and helping out?
"Help, I keep shit in my pants.",0,"Damn autocorrect,

I keep shittin my pants!"
Daddest Joke[nsfw],0,"*scrubs my toe against the table*
Me: Aghh Motherfucker!
Dad from across the hall: You called?"
Jokes,0,An Opera singers favorite beverage after her show?
A good euthanization never hurt anyone.,0,[removed]
I hate coronavirus jokes,0,They make me sick.
Food enters from a pair of cheeks,0,Comes out from a pair of cheeks too!
How tf do pizza deliveries work? Pizzas don’t have a liver?,0,[removed]
My life,0,[removed]
I asked a librarian if she had a book about Pavlov's dog and Schrödinger's cat...,0,[removed]
Did you know cucumbers improve your memory?,0,My uncle put one in me when I was a kid and I still haven't forgotten.
I asked my friend what life was like in North Korea,0,He said he couldn't complain.
Wood fired pizza?,0,"Wood fired pizza? How is pizza going to get a job now?

im sorry dont hurt me"
What do you call a short Mexican researcher in Antarctica?,0,"a burrito  
First joke I ever came up with.  My Hispanic wife laughed her butt off."
Someone’s so high right now at the same thing as you at reading this!,0,"Hey, Someone!"
"Dirty Johnny is in Sunday School when the teacher asks the class,",0,"""What happened when Jesus went to Mount Olive?""

Johnny's hand shot up.  Since Johnny never raised his hand, the teacher called on him.

Johnny knowingly grinned and yelled, ""Popeye kicked the shit out of him""."
A cat walks into a bar,0,"The bartender say “Get out, no cats allowed”"
An Alabama girl was found with symptoms of the COVID. On testing she was found positive.,0,"Authorities tested her father, mother, 3 brothers and 2 sisters. All were found COVID positive. The family has been quarantined.

On further investigation, it was found that the girls 3 boyfriends, her sister also had 3 boyfriends. Her 3 brothers had 2 girlfriends each. The authorities had to quarantine them as well.

Luckily enough, the authorities only had the quarantine the whole family."
A construction worker on the 5th floor of a building needed a handsaw.,0,[removed]
Last night I had a dream that I weighed leas than a thousandth of a gram.,0,"I was like, omg."
What did the fish say when it hit the wall?!,0,Dam!
Did you hear about the surgeon who botched Kim Jong Un surgery?,0,"Yeah, me neither."
Pirates are famous for:,0,[removed]
"LPT: If you have lower back pain, try applying a 50/50 mixture of olive oil and salt to the area.",0,"Once the mixture is applied, your back will immediately feel saltier and greasier."
"Proof-reading is vital - for example, you may accidentally type ""I helped my uncle Jack off a horse.""",0,"When in reality, all you did was sit and watch."
Pirates are famous for,0,[removed]
You know what's humany style?,0,"Doggies fucking and never seeing eachother again.

*I need a drink*"
Do you guys ever get your fingers stuck in beer bottles?,0,It happened to me once in a blue moon.
I just realized today is my cake day,0,I Must of been high to Join Reddit
TIfu by giving my dog roofies,0,To help with his barking.
5G infects people with COVID-19,0,[removed]
You know those kids who promised a whole bunch of free stuff if they were elected class president?,0,"Yeah, they’re all Democrats now."
"Patient: Doctor, I need medical marijuana!",0,"Doctor: What condition do you have that medical marijuana might help you with?

Patient: Marijuana addiction!"
Is it a crime to take a joke's punchline hostage?,0,[removed]
Is it terrorism to take a joke's punchline hostage?,0,[removed]
Why can't you get from Ollivander's to Gringott's in one straight line?,0,[removed]
What do you call a nun in a wheel chair?,0,Virgin mobile.
"Pete: hi, I'm Pete",0,"**Peter:** hi, I'm Peter

**Me, super competitive:** I'm Petest"
I ivented a new word today,0,Playjurism
In these uncertain times I think of what my grandfather wouldsay if he were still alive,0,Get me the fuck outta this box! I can't breathe!
Have you heard the new hipster joke?,0,Of course you haven't.
Why are chameleons good in smoothies,0,Because they blend in well
Hitler was a hero,0,"He was the only one able to kill Hitler

Happy birthday!"
AddThis Social Bookmarking Sharing Button Widget,0,[removed]
"A man walks into a bar,",0,Lucky bastard!
Whats the opposite of cinnamon?,0,Cinemax.
A man came in to give his application to the manager,0,"But the manager asked, “Why is there a four-year gap in your application?”

And the man responded, “Yale.”

The manager hired him and the guy said, “Thanks. I needed a yob.”"
"Fauci...”good news mr president, we’ve just received one thousand Brazilian face masks “. Trump....”that’s fantastic. How many is a Brazilian “?",0,[removed]
Jokes are like babies,0,You can only deliver them once
"To be, or not to be, that is the question",0,[removed]
Two cannibals are eating dinner,0,"One says, ""I hate my mother in law.""

The other replies, "" Well, just eat your noodles then."""
What do you call a Jewish man who makes his own beer?,0,Hebrew
Abraham lincoln’s 4/20,0,[removed]
Wife to dad and kids: What are you guys doing?,0,"Dad: Playing Hopscotch. 

Wife: But your drinking and the kids are jumping around.

Dad correcting wife: I am drinking scotch and the kids are hopping around."
"Guy Sits At The Bar. Guy Next To Em Says “Hey Jackass, Pour Me A Drink.” Bartender Pours A Drink. Little While Later “Hey Jackass, Pour Me A Drink”...Bartender Pours Drink. Guy Leaves. Other Guy Says Why Do You Let Him Call You Jackass All The Time...",0,[removed]
Scientists have found some planets to be edible,0,I guess now I can eat Uranus
Are my test results back?,0,[removed]
"The pastor who wants stimulus money from his congregants reminded me of this joke. It is a re-post, but I felt it was appropriate today. enjoy if you haven't read before.",0,"A religious mans house is starting to flood. A police car shows up and offers to take the man to safety he says ""god will save me"" and sends them away.

Later this man is on his roof as the flood waters continue to rise and a boat comes by again with an offer to help evacuate this older gentleman who says again ""god will save me"" and sends them away.  Then the man gets swept away and drowns in the storm. 

When he gets to heaven he asks ""God why didn't you save me"" God responds with Well my son I sent a police car and a boat what more could I do."""
What do you get when you cross an octopus with a cow?,0,A reprimand from the Scientific Integrity and Professional Ethics Committee and immediate withdrawal of your grant funding.
"If a bucket of fog was stolen, would it be mist?",0,[removed]
"Ah, kids...",0,"A wise man once said as follows:
Kids are something.  When they are small,  they're just so cute you want to eat them. And when they become teenagers...


... you wish you had."
I really like clever word-play jokes ...,0,"I consider myself a cunning linguist, so to speak.   
   
.   
   
   
--credit :  Moneypenny to James Bond, Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)"
I was gonna make a jump rope joke,0,But decided to skip it. It's not good
"You know why people dont make ""your dad"" jokes?",0,Because they cant see him behind your mom.
"I thought I wouldn't be able to repair the broken desk I set my Apple tablet on, but it's fixed!",0,iStand corrected
"Now that I've lived during the time of plague, I totally get why renaissance paintings are mostly of woman lying around with their boobies out",0,[removed]
"A horse walks into a bar and orders a pint. The barkeeper says ""You're in here pretty often. Do you think you might be an alcoholic?"". To which the horse says, ""I don't think I am."" and vanishes from existence.",0,[deleted]
"- My new hearing aids are so good, they've restored my hearing to its full potential",0,"- That's awesome, how long have you had them?
- About 200$"
My wife got mad at me for selling our Elantra and buying a Subaru,0,But she's the one that's always telling me I have bad Hyundai coordination
This is not a joke.,0,But at least it's new.
"A 40 year old woman gave an advertisement for husband with 3 conditions. Conditions were- No domestic violence, He should always follow me and my command &amp; Should be amazing in bed.",0,[removed]
People ask me where I see the world in the year 4040,0,And I respond “ I don’t know! I don’t have 2020 vision!”
The Job Interview,0,"Three equally qualified applicants apply for a job. The interviewer decides to test their powers of observation.

He asks all three of them the same question. Look at me closely and tell me what you notice.

Applicant 1: If you don't mind me saying, one of your ears is higher than the other.

Well done!

Applicant 2: Are your ears uneven?

Yes, well done!

Applicant 3: Are you wearing contact lenses?

How'd you know that?

Well, you'd never wear glasses with ears like that."
Why do black people only have nightmares?,0,[deleted]
I keep lying about being uncircumsized,0,I feel bad about my falsehood.
The only joke here is me,0,[removed]
"Some people HATE Dad jokes , but this used to kill mine",0,Cancer
The Court Jester (1955),0,[removed]
What did one testicle say to the other testicle?,0,"“Don’t talk to the guy in the back, he’s an asshole.”"
"I'm a 5G installation engineer and people are constantly accusing me with bizarre conspiracy theories, such as how 5G is giving them headaches, or killing their sperm. I think they are completely crazy.",0,4G must've fried their brains.
A businessman once told me gibberish..,0,"I told him “hey dude, that does not make cents.”"
What did one ballsack say to the other ballsack?,0,"“Don’t talk to the guy around back, he’s an asshole.”"
What’s 3 words for small,0,Is it in
I taught my son about gravity by throwing pasta and sauce at the ceiling,0,"He didn't get it at first, but it wasn't long before the penne dropped."
What's the difference between Light and Hard?,0,You can fall asleep with a light on.
What did the executioner say to the man who's sentenced to death.,0,"""Hang in there, buddy."""
The part about censorship on the Internet...,0,[removed]
Did you hear about the person who kept eating his watches?,0,It was a very time consuming process.
Hahahah haha ah 69 funny secks number hahahahaghdhsh,0,[removed]
Trump's lawyer,0,"Lawyer: President Trump, you must give them a sperm sample.

Ivanka: where do I spit, Daddy?"
Today a girl kissed me,0,I wish I could post it in another subreddit
"Somebody asked me if I support gay marriage. I said ""Of Course!""",0,I think everyone deserves the right to be equally miserable
A genie came out of a lamp and granted me one wish. I wished for my cock to touch the floor.,0,So the genie ripped of my cock and threw it on the floor.
“What’s 3 9 in Japanese?”,0,"“san kyu”

“You’re welcome”"
Two superintelligent AI played chess,0,They both won easily
Don't forget to leave out milk and cookies for Snoop Dogg tonight.,0,Merry 4/20
Pretty sure the president has the virus since one of the symptoms is having no taste,0,[removed]
Lets get this bread,0,**I made my wife a sandwich but she says she no longer eats gluten. Ciabatta be kiddin' me!**
I made my wife a sandwich but she says she no longer eats gluten. Ciabatta be kiddin me!,0,[removed]
"So, a dyslexic guy walks...",0,...into a bra.
Canada V America 16 - 57 best in the West baby,0,If the Olympics ever takes up mass shooting as a sport America is gonna fucking crush it
What do you get when you have more than 2 kids in China?,0,Youth in Asia.
I don’t know why people are saying self isolation is so hard...,0,I can do it in my sleep!
Donald Trump is a state visit to Israel. He has a heart attack and dies.,0,"The funeral director explains to his entourage of diplomats that to fly the body back to the U.S. would cost $50 000 and to have him buried in Israel would cost just $100. The diplomats discuss amongst themselves. They then return to the funeral director and say they prefer to fly him back. 

“Why?” asks the confused funeral director, “for less than a fraction of the cost you can have him buried in the Holy Land”. The diplomats respond, “A long time ago another man died and was buried here, and three days later he came back from the dead. That’s a risk we simply cannot take.”"
The UK public are being too rough on Matt Hancock..,0,"It’s not his fault, being a wanker’s in his name."
"Last time I was working in Dallas, I had picked up these two girls on Uber.",0,"They were talking about sight seeing and various landmarks when we pulled up next to a older brick building that had huge windows at a red light. I noticed the building was empty inside, like it had been cleared and renovated but not occupied. So I pointed it out and told the girls it was the Dallas Air and Space Museum."
My friends keep calling me the hunchback of Notre Dame,0,"Its not about my posture though, it's cuz my house burned down."
I have many jokes about unemployed people.,0,Sadly none of them work.
How many flies does it take to screw in a lightbulb?,0,Two... but I don’t know how they got in there
I showed up late for a Zoom meeting...,0,"...when asked for a reason, I confessed: ""You wouldn't believe the network traffic""."
A skeleton walks into a bar,0,and orders a beer and a mop.
Why can't a bike can't stand on it's own,0,Because it's two-tired
Why do hackers prefer a blocked nose?,0,Because then they have a code
What's the worse thing about having sex with twenty one year olds,0,Prison
There was a question in exam asking what is the past tense of think,0,"And I thought, and I thought, and thought but ended up writing thinked"
Once i saw a kidnapping,0,So i  decided not to wake him up.
Noice FBI,0,[removed]
"If mass and energy are the same thing,",0,"how come the fatter you get, the lazier you become?"
"My dad told me, ""Stop making hindsight is 2020 jokes on reddit and get downstairs, doubletime!""",0,but When I arrived it was 4040.
Sometimes having butterfly in stomach doesn't mean it's good,0,especially if it's sharp and pointy
"If you smoke pot and forgot what day today is, don’t worry. You can celebrate again on the 25th of May.",0,Because 4/20 = 5/25
"Robert E. Lee once said: ""I like whiskey. I always did. And that is why I never drink it.""",0,"Robert E. Lee once said:
""I like whiskey. I always did. And  that is why I never drink it.""

Generally speaking."
"In the long run, it's Australia that will dominate the galaxy",0,"&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

They're the only ones with a Spice program."
"My daughter was inspecting our seedlings this morning: ""The tomato is catching up with the other plants! But I shouldn't be surprised...""",0,"""Of course a tomato would ketchup.""

She's only five and already a dad..."
Is Coronavirus ruining all your plans for 2020? Save them for 2022.,0,"As you know, 2022 is 2020 too."
What does a thesaurus eat for breakfast?,0,Synonym rolls
A man's life involves three rings. The first ring is the engagement ring.,0,"The second ring is the wedding ring. And then, after the wedding ring comes the suffer ring."
Happy 4/20 eb boddy!!,0,Let's burn one for the Gipper.
Happy 4/20/20.,0,[removed]
Karen wanted to speak to the manager,0,"Unfortunately, there was no **man**ager. Instead, there was this woman."
Get off your high horse!,0,[removed]
Where do police go to use the bathroom?,0,The copy room
Canada versus America 16 - 58,0,"If we can ever get mass shootings into the Olympics, America would own that shit"
007 hates name guessing game,0,He always ruins it everytime someone wants to play with him.
"""Have you heard about two guys that stole a calendar?""",0,"""Yeah, they got six months each."""
"When my ex knew l joined r/jokes, she told me out of the blue, ""I love jokes!""",0,"Almost surprised by her approach, I replied,  ""Good for you, self-love is important."""
Friend of mind murdered two innocent and the judge put him in jail for two weeks.,0,Then they dragged him out and electrocuted him.
Superman was cruising the stratosphere,0,"...when he spied Wonder Woman apparently sunbathing nude, lying on her back on a remote beach.  Admiring her stunning beauty, he thought to himself,  ""I bet I could fly down and with my super speed, have my way with her and be gone before she noticed a thing.""  So he flew down and 10 milliseconds later was gone. Wonder Woman opened her eyes, raised her head a little and said, ""What the Hell was that?""
The Invisible Man said, ""I don't know but it sure tore up my ass."""
Why don’t people like eating intestines?,0,It’s offal!
Media players,0,"Teacher: so kids basically an mp3 and an mp4 is a device you can play music on!
Kids: cool!!!
Another kid: so then what’s an mp5?
Quiet kid in the back:"
What does a sparrow of 50 kg say?,0,"#CHIRP


^it ^works ^better ^if ^you ^say ^it ^out ^loud ^with ^a ^deep ^voice..."
"If you were to get rid of one state in the US, which would it be and",0,Why Florida?
Why does Dr Pepper come in a bottle?,0,Because his wife died.
What part of the brain regulates elk-like behaviour?,0,The hypothalamoose.
If you masturbate with your feet you should probably get help.,0,Things have obviously gotten out of hand.
You know what borders on stupidity?,0,Canada and Mexico.
Did you know that the deaths of Gene Clark and Michael Clarke were assasinations orchestrated by their record company and carried out by Mick Jagger?,0,The record company managed to kill two Byrds with one Stone.
What do you call the combination of a retired politician and a failed candidate?,0,"Chelsea. 

. 
.

Sorry had to repost it because spelling."
I got served a pear that was really disgusting but I was too scared to complain to the waiter and just complained to my wife.,0,She told me to grow a pair.
"After picking her son up from school one day, the mother asks him what he did at school.",0,"The kid replies, ""I had sex with my teacher."" She gets so mad that when they get home, she orders him to go straight to his room. When the father returns home that evening, the mother angrily tells him the news of what their son had done. As the father hears the news, a huge grin spreads across his face. He walks to his son's room and asks him what happened at school, the son tells him, ""I had sex with my teacher."" The father tells the boy that he is so proud of him, and he is going to reward him with the bike he has been asking for. On the way to the store, the dad asks his son if he would like to ride his new bike home. His son responds, ""No thanks Dad, my butt still hurts."""
What do you call a rally of people with a total IQ of 0?,0,  An anti-lockdown rally
"A little girl and boy are fighting about the differences between the sexes, and which one is better.",0,"Finally, the boy drops his pants and says, “Here’s something I have that you’ll never have!” The little girl is pretty upset by this, since it is clearly true, and runs home crying. A while later, she comes running back with a smile on her face. She drops her pants and says, “My mommy says that with one of these, I can have as many of those as I want!”"
Why did I get divorced?,0,"Well, last week was my birthday. My wife didn't wish me a happy birthday. My parents forgot and so did my kids. I went to work and even my colleagues didn't wish me a happy birthday. As I entered my office, my secretary said, ""Happy birthday, boss!"" I felt so special. She asked me out for lunch. After lunch, she invited me to her apartment. We went there and she said, ""Do you mind if I go into the bedroom for a minute?"" ""Okay,"" I said. She came out 5 minutes later with a birthday cake, my wife, my parents, my kids, my friends, &amp; my colleagues all yelling, ""SURPRISE!!!"" while I was waiting on the sofa... naked."
"Reporter: ""Excuse me, may I interview you?""",0,"Man: ""Yes!""
Reporter: ""Name?""
Man: ""Abdul Al-Rhazim.""
Reporter: ""Sex?""
Man: ""Three to five times a week.""
Reporter: ""No no! I mean male or female?""
Man: ""Yes, male, female... sometimes camel.""
Reporter: ""Holy cow!""
Man: ""Yes, cow, sheep... animals in general.""
Reporter: ""But isn't that hostile?""
Man: ""Yes, horse style, dog style, any style.""
Reporter: ""Oh dear!""
Man: ""No, no deer. Deer run too fast. Hard to catch."""
A man walks into my bar with 2 black eyes,0,"So I ask what happened? He says ""well  I was in church and when we all stood to sing the hymn, the lady in front of me had her dress stuck up in the crack of her ass. So I decided to reach up and pull it out for her. She turned around and punched me in my right eye."" So  I asked ""what happened to you left eye?"" ""Well thought, maybe she wanted it there. So l shoved it back in."""
Posting OC before bed is like waiting for the tooth fairy,0,You're always disappointed when you wake up
Did you hear about the OC on r/jokes?,0,"No, of course you didn't."
A judge asks a defendant to stand...,0," ""You are charged with murdering a school teacher with a chain saw."" From out of the audience a man shouts ""You lying maggot!""

""Silence in the court!"" the judge shouted back. He turns to the defendant again and says, ""You are also charged with killing a paperboy with a shovel.""

""You Goddamned tightwad!"" blurted the spectator.

""Quiet!"" yelled the judge. ""You are also charged with killing a mailman with an electric drill.""

""You cheap son of a..."" the man starts to shout when the judge thunders back ""If you don't tell me the reason for your outbursts right now, I will hold you in contempt!""

""I've lived next to that lying maggot for ten years now, but do you think he ever had a f*****g tool when I needed to borrow one!""

I found this and knew  I had to post"
My work replaced our regular toilet paper with single ply. Everybody hates it...,0,...Its really tearable.
Little Johnny At The Park,0,"Little Johnny sees his Daddy's car passing the playground and going into the woods.

Curious, he follows the car and sees Daddy and Aunt Jane kissing.

Johnny is this so exciting and can hardly contain himself as he runs home and begins to tell his mother excitedly.""MOMMY, MOMMY, I WAS AT THE PLAYGROUND AND DADDY AND....""

Mommy tells him to slow down, but that she wants to hear the story.

So Johnny tells her. ""I was at the playground and I saw Daddy's car go into the woods with Aunt Jane. I went to look and Daddy was giving Aunt Jane a big kiss, then he helped her take off her shirt, then Aunt Jane helped Daddy take his pants off, then Aunt Jane laid down on the seat, then Daddy....""

At this point, Mommy cut him off and said, ""Johnny, this is such an interesting story, suppose you save the rest of it for supper time. I want to see the look on Daddy's face when you tell it tonight.""

At the dinner table, Mommy asks Johnny to tell his story.

He describes the car into the woods, the undressing, laying down on the seat, and, ""Then Daddy and Aunt Jane did that same thing Mommy and Uncle Jeff used to do when Daddy was in the Army."""
Made my account about a year ago...,0,Well fuck.
What did the notary do during his PTO?,0,He went on verification
Why is Chris Brown is the ultimate gamer ?,0,Because he beat women and minority simultaneously
"Why do British people say, ""I'm Bri ish""?",0,Because they love to drink the t.
"Way down upon the Mississippi, two tugboat captains who had been friends for years, would always cry ""Aye!"" and blow their whistles whenever they passed each other",0,"A new crewman asked his boat's mate, ""What do they do that for?""   


The mate looked surprised and replied, ""You mean that you've never heard of an aye for an aye and a toot for a toot?"""
My friend has halitosis and Tourette's,0,His language stinks
Trump,0,Once Trump was thinking!
The average male ejaculate contains about 1000TB of information,0,That's one way to clear up your mind
"""Son, I wanted to let you know you were adopted,"" my dad told me.",0,"""Are you kidding? Really?"" I cried.""Yup, get ready,"" he said. ""They'll be picking you up in about an hour."""
I wonder If the receptionist at the sperm bank has ever used the phrase,0,Thanks for coming
Man quarentine man..yea man fuck that,0,"Man women am'iright man haha yea
 this quarentine is some shit, yea man lotta bad stuff out here
Thats what I WOULD say if I was uninteresting cuck who sympathized with legitimately everyone else on the planet, but I dated a chick who made dream catchers out of doll legs.. which makes me in some which way superior to someone somwhere who knows someone who dident know how to make dream catchers out of doll legs, ya know someone somewhere saw some doll legs, laying around..somewhere i dont know maybe in india or some shit and said HEY, thatd make a good dream catcher..and they dident do it cause theyre like.. no why the fuck would I do that? Ya know But not MY ex girlfriend she was a fuckin keeper..yea she was a working women who did alotta things ya know, like make dreamcatchers from doll legs..yea what a fuckin woman, shame she got busted for killing all those goddamn hookers tho way to waste abuncha dream catchers sitting in some fuckin evidence locker"
I get why people don’t like procrastinators,0,"We haven’t done anything, but we might, eventually..."
Is this some bisexual joke...,0,That I'm too straight to understand?
When do white people meet?,0,Caucasionally.
"Billy saw the barn was ablaze, sprinted down the street, burst into a bar room full of gunslingers and shouted ""Fire! Fire!""",0,And they did.
People always ask me why I’m always so shy and quite.,0,It’s Cos I’m a capitalist and not a socially
My wife is a professional at social distancing.,0,"Doesn't speak much, never answers when i call, stays home when i go out to the tavern, grinds her teeth at night and makes me sleep on the couch all for the last 24 years."
"Little Emily went home from school and told her mum that the boys kept asking her to do cartwheels because she's very good at them. Mum said, ""You should say ""No"", they only want to look at your knickers.""",0,"Emily said, ""I know they do.  That's why I hide them in my bag""!"
What is the biggest waste of money?,0,A 2020 planner
"Today I donated my watch, phone, and $300 to a poor guy.",0,You wouldn’t believe the immense happiness and relief I felt as he slid the pistol back into his waistband.
wife and husband,0,[removed]
why couldn't the homeless man order food?,0,[removed]
How do you get the attention of a pervert?,0,A Not Safe For Work Tag.
"I wish I was ""Adenine"", so I could be paired with ""U"".",0,[removed]
Work Smart Not Hard,0,"Wife : Hey, Can you go to supermarket while coming from office and bring groceries. Also Karen said hi! 
Husband: Karen?
Wife: Nothing! Just making sure you read total sentence so you don't make excuses 😉
Husband: No, I meant which Karen. Office Karen or Neighbour Karen, since I am already shopping with office Karen here.
Wife: What??? 
(Goes to supermarket to catch him)
Wife: where are you and that bitch Karen
Husband: No I was kidding, since you already at Market buy groceries and also bring ice cream for me if you can 😆"
Naked painting,0,"The head nun tells the two new nuns that they have to paint their room without getting any paint on their clothes. 

So the one nun says to the other, ""Hey, let's take all our clothes off, fold them up, and lock the door."" 

So they do this, and begin painting their room. Soon they hear a knock at the door. They ask, ""Who is it?"" ""Blind man!"" 

The nuns look at each other, then one nun says, ""He's blind, he can't see. What could it hurt."" 

They let him in.

 The blind man walks in and says, ""Hey, nice tits. Where do you want me to hang the blinds?"""
An elderly man in Louisiana ...,0,"... had owned a large farm for several years. He had a big pool in the back. It was properly shaped for swimming, so he fixed it up nice with picnic tables, horseshoe courts, and some apple and peach trees.

One evening the old farmer decided to go down to the pond, as he hadn't been there for a while, and look it over. He grabbed a five-gallon bucket to bring back some fruit. As he neared the pond, he heard voices shouting and laughing with glee. As he came closer, he saw it was a bunch of young women skinny-dipping in his pond.

He made the women aware of his presence and they all went to the deep end. One of the women shouted to him, 'we're not coming out until you leave!'

The old man frowned, 'I didn't come down here to watch you ladies swim naked or make you get out of the pond naked.'

Holding the bucket up he said, 'I'm here to feed the alligator...'

Some old men can still think fast...."
Communist jokes aren’t funny unless everyone gets it,0,[removed]
Why are people so angry at lazy people?,0,We haven't done anything???
All about that weed,0,"If you people like weed. Come to me, I have a ton of garden weed you
Guys can eat"
What do flags and pedophiles both have in common?,0,[removed]
My new Fleetwood Mac satnav is useless.,0,"It just keeps telling me I can go my own way.

&amp;#x200B;

&gt;!(Also, you can enjoy the earworm)!&lt;"
How do you scare someone on this sub?,0,"Copy and paste this and reply to them:

 

You have been permanently banned from participating in [r/jokes](https://www.reddit.com/r/jokes/).

You have been permanently banned from participating in [r/jokes](https://www.reddit.com/r/jokes/). You can still view and subscribe to [r/jokes](https://www.reddit.com/r/jokes/), but you won’t be able to post or comment.

If you have a question regarding your ban, you can contact the moderator team for [r/jokes](https://www.reddit.com/r/jokes/) by replying to this message.

Reminder   to Reddit staff: If you use another account to circumvent this   subreddit ban, that will be considered a violation of the Content Policy   and can result in your account being suspended from the site as a   whole."
What's a good age to have kids?,0,Financially stable years old.
I've never understood why kids feel responsible when their parents divorce.,0,"When I was 14, my parents divorced, and they couldn't have convinced me it was my fault if they tried. And honestly, I was such a bad kid, that if any child were ever responsible...

...wait"
One last blow job,0,"Some soldiers are deep in enemy lines and life's luck looks like it's about to run out. ""Hey fellas before I die, I want one last blow job. Will one of you guys help me out?"" The other soldiers are stunned. ""No!"" ""Absolutely not!"" ""Go jack off or do what ever but we don't want any part of it!!"" ""Fine, I'll find some one who will."" He climbs out of the trench, bullets raining past him as he runs forward into a another trench. Time passes and the soldiers think for sure he must have got hit and was dead, but just then, they see him stick his head out of the trench smoking a cigarette. He jumps out and casually strolls back to them. Once again bullets flying by. He jumps back down in the hole with the soldiers. ""What the hell happened to you!?"" The soldiers ask. ""Fellas you wouldn't believe it. There was a nurse up there in that trench! We had sex in every position you can think of! It was glorious!!"" One of the soldiers asks, ""Well did you get your blow job then?"" ""No, I could not find his head!"""
If theres one silver lining to the corona virus pandemic,0,"Is that america will finally make the changes necessary to health care, just like how school shootings made an impact on gun laws"
A guy walks into a pub...,0,"...And sees a sign hanging over the bar that reads: CHEESEBURGER: $1.50 CHICKEN SANDWICH: $2.50 HAND JOB: $10.00 He walks up to the bar and beckons one of the three exceptionally attractive blondes serving drinks. ""Can I help you?"" she asks. ""I was wondering,"" whispers the man. ""Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?"" ""Yes,"" she purr. ""I am."" The man replies, ""Well, wash your hands. I want a cheeseburger."""
"An Englishman, Irishman and Scotsman walk into a bar...",0,Lucky bastards
How did you find out I was pregnant?,0,"Ah-hah! I knew it! I know your husband travels around the world fairly regularly. His comedic timing rivals today’s greats. I’ve been to some of his shows myself. In fact, I’m always keen to find out what he’s up to. Even follow him on Reddit. Everyone on r/jokes knows him. All his posts are highly upvoted. I even follow him.

But something hasn’t been quite right. I found out that he has a throwaway Reddit handle. I couldn’t believe my eyes when I saw his posts on r/dadjokes."
"I always have a hard time answering ""what race do you identify with"" questions.",0,ist is never an option
Soviet joke about marxism,0,"Soviet times. A guy asks his friend, who travels a lot:

\- So how's Europe?

\- Not much. But England, France and Germany I hate the most.

\- But why?

\- England for classical political economy, France for Utopian socialism and Germany for German idealism."
Why arr there never more than 239 beans in a can of Boston baked beans?,0,Addling another being and it's 240
"A man asks the doctor: -""Have you got the results of my tests? I'm dying of curiosity!""",0,"And the doctor replies: -""It's not just curiosity..."""
The best Moth joke,0,"
A moth goes into a podiatrist’s office, and the podiatrist’s office says, “What seems to be the problem, moth?”

The moth says “What’s the problem? Where do I begin, man? I go to work for Gregory Illinivich, and all day long I work. Honestly doc, I don’t even know what I’m doing anymore. I don’t even know if Gregory Illinivich knows. He only knows that he has power over me, and that seems to bring him happiness. But I don’t know, I wake up in a malaise, and I walk here and there… at night I…I sometimes wake up and I turn to some old lady in my bed that’s on my arm. A lady that I once loved, doc. I don’t know where to turn to. My youngest, Alexendria, she fell in the…in the cold of last year. The cold took her down, as it did many of us. And my other boy, and this is the hardest pill to swallow, doc. My other boy, Gregarro Ivinalititavitch… I no longer love him. As much as it pains me to say, when I look in his eyes, all I see is the same cowardice that I… that I catch when I take a glimpse of my own face in the mirror. If only I wasn’t such a  coward, then perhaps…perhaps I could bring myself to reach over to that cocked and loaded gun that lays on the bedside behind me and end this hellish facade once and for all…Doc, sometimes I feel like a spider, even though I’m a moth, just barely hanging on to my web with an everlasting fire underneath me. I’m not feeling good.

And so the doctor says, “Moth, man, you’re troubled. But you should be seeing a psychiatrist. Why on earth did you come here?”

And the moth says, “‘Cause the light was on.”

[—Norm McDonald](https://youtu.be/jJN9mBRX3uo)"
Do you like white rice? Or brown rice? Or yellow rice?,0,I love all rice equally. You're just Ricest.
"If you speak three languages you are trilingual, two languages bilingual and if you speak but one language you are...",0,An American
V,0,"V

Edit: I think my CTRL key broke."
"A person sat by a stream, then his friend called him",0,"Friend: Hey, wanna come over ?
Person: Sorry man, I’m watching a live stream."
With this pandemic going on we really have to give props to all the doctors...,0,I know I'd lose my mind if I had to test my patients this often
I want to be the first one to get the coronavirus vaccine.,0,It can’t give me autism twice
What do you call a dead blonde in a closet?,0,1984 hide and go seek champion of the world
What do you call a Nazi with no hair?,0,Bald!
Three nuns are at the pearly gates of heaven...,0,"Three nuns die, and line up at the pearly gates of heaven. St. Peter is there waiting for them, and wants to make sure they are holy and free from sin before they enter eternal life.

St. Peter asks the first nun, ""Have you ever touched a penis?""

She hesitates, and replies, ""Yes, I did one time in my youth. I touched a penis with my bare hands.""

St. Peter says, ""Not to worry! We all make mistakes. Just rinse off your hands in this holy water here and you may enter heaven.""

Then, abruptly, the third nun shoves aside the second nun and stands in her place.

St. Peter asks, ""What's the rush? Please don't cut in front of her, wait in your rightful spot in line.""

The third nun bows and says, ""I'm so sorry, please forgive me. It's just that...no way am I gargling that shit after she sticks her ass in it!"""
Marty McFly and Doc Brown are carry a piano up the stairs,0,"""Whoa Doc, this is heavy."""
A racist non-Asian man asks an Asian man if he eats cats and dogs.,0,"The Asian man replies: ""The only cat I eat is your girlfriend's pussy and the only dog I put my tongue on is your bitch."""
Two fish,0,"Two fish swim into a concrete wall. One turns to the other and says ""Dam""."
Two fish,0,"Two fish swim into a concrete wall. One turns to the other and says ""Dam""."
"Hey guys, don't you just hate it when you're woken up in the middle of the night for sex?",0,can not wait to get out of prison.
Red Bull equates energy to wings,0,"If Red Bull equates energy to wings, does it mean that we are caterpillars when we go to bed, which use a blanket as a cocoon? We undergo metamorphosis, turn into butterflies with energy for wings whenever we wake up. We also kick the cocoon out before getting out of bed."
I was accused of plagiarism by my professor...,0,[removed]
What type of shoes does an artist wear?,0,Sketchers.
An ugly man walks into a bar and a beautiful woman approaches him...,0,"... the woman asks the man, ""How would you like to get out of here?"" and the man is stunned. He never thought a woman like her would ever approach him so he agrees. They both get into his car and drive really far. He stops at a cliff with the view of the entire city. Within seconds they start taking off their clothes. After 15 minutes of vigorous sex they finally finish. They both put their clothes on and they both just sit there awkwardly. The woman speaks up and says ""I'm a prostitute and its going to be 100 dollars for my service."" The man is stunned and saddened that she didn't really like him. He gives her the money and they both sit there awkwardly. The woman tells him that she is ready to leave and the man replies ""I'm a taxi driver and its going to be 150 dollars for the ride here and back."""
What do you call a serious of dots and dashes that Vikings used to communicate with?,0,Norse Code
Road work Ahead..,0,UH YEAH I SURE HOPE IT DOES!
#8467,0,[removed]
A blonde chic &amp; a dr are seated next to each other on a flight from HI to NYC...,0," A blonde chic  and a dr are seated next to each other on a flight from HI to NYC.  


The doc asks if blondie would like to play a fun game. The chic, tired, just wants to take a nap, so she declines and rolls over to the window to a small nap. The doc asks again and explains that the game is easy and a lot of fun. She might even enjoy herself  


He says, ""If I ask you a question, and if you don't know the answer, you pay me $10 bucks, and vice versa.""  


Again, she again politely declines and tries to get a nap.  


The dr, now a little heated, says, ""Okay. Fine, if you don't know the answer, you pay me $10, and if I don't know the answer, I'll pay you $1000.""  


This catches the woman's attention and, figuring there will be no end to this, agrees to the game. She rolled eyes with a sigh and says, ""Go for it.""  


The dr. asks the question: ""What's the distance from the Sun to the Neptune to the nearest million miles?""  


The blonde thinks long and hard. She stated a few times to say a number but each time stops herself. Suddenly without saying  a word, reached into her bag, pulls out $15.00 in bills, and hands it to the doc. She smiles back and waits,  


""Okay,"" says the dr, ""your turn. I mean if youre ready. But take as much time as you need.""  


She takes a few minutes and then asks, ""What goes up a tree with 7 legs and comes back down with four legs. 3 fingers and 12 toes, and a hairy nose?"" Smiling she also tells him to take his time.  


The dr, puzzled, takes out his laptop and searches all of his encyclopedia set on the laptop... no answer. He taps into the air phone with his laptop's modem and searches Google and the Library of Congress ... still no answer. Flustered, he sends e-mails to many of his friends and others but to no avail.  


After half an hour, he notices the blonde had fallen asleep. He waits another hour and a half still looking and emailing. Now its his pride that has taken over. He gently wakes the chic and hands her $1000.  


The blonde thanks him, smiles and turns back to get some more sleep. ""Maybe we'll play s'more later, Like after my nap,""  


The dr, who is more than a little upset, stirs the blonde about an hour before landing and asks, ""Do you wish to continue our little game?  Nodding and adjusting herself in her seat and knowing she had been not disturbed and was now well rested looked towards the dr. He impatiently asked her ""Well, what's the answer?""  


Without a having to say a single word, the blonde reaches into her bag, hands the lawyer two new and crisp $5 bills , and goes back to sleep for the remainder of their flight."
Want to hear a sick joke?,0,I’m calling out of work tomorrow.
In a Halloween Party,0,"There were many costumed characters found. There were people dressed up as Dracula, sexy nurses, Frankensteins.. well you know, all the famous ones. Then one girl entered, she was very beautiful, and also.. very naked. She had doused her entire body in white paint, and that’s it. 

People, rather amazed, yet confused, asked her what she came in as. 

She said “I’m The Mint with a hole”"
Why is internet dating wasted on vegetarians?,0,They never meet
British people be like YouChube,0,[removed]
What is a scientists favorite lunch?,0,fission chips
"You've got a friend called Ed, his girlfriend eloped with another man. What do you tell him?",0,"Ed, she ran."
Burglar was robbing his own house. When asked what are you doing ?,0,"He said ""working from home"""
I was opening my Mexican beer and it spewed into my eye. Now I think I have corona iris,0,[removed]
Burglar kicking his own door,0,"Just seen a burglar kicking his own door in.

I asked: “What are you doing?”

He said: “Working from home.”"
Good pickup line.,0,"Two male flies are buzzing around the farmyard when they spot a female fly landing on a fresh pile of cow dung.
  The one fly says, ""Wow, she is cute!  I'm going to try to talk to her, wish me luck.""
  He swoops down, lands right next to her and says, ""Excuse me Miss, is this stool taken?"""
A story about kinks and boobs,0,"I started dating this girl with a really weird fetish -- she's got a very nice pair of knockers, and she loves having it smacked loudly. She really gets off from the pain and from the really loud POP sound that the slap of skin-on-skin can make. Recently, she's been getting more kinky about it, and she's escalated to asking me to hit her rack with more and more painful objects. It started with a ruler, then the flat of a large bread knife. The past few weeks, she's been asking me to use a pair of sharp scissors, but I lost them last night and I've been looking for them all day.

I apologized, but she's really upset that I lost her rack popper scissors."
Where do West Coast rappers get put down?,0,Tha Dogg Pound
Would y’all like to know my pronouns?,0," I identify as nothing 

Don’t address me ✌️

Goodbye human interactions"
"So, this Strava app",0,Does it come from Iran?
You guys wanna hear a joke about china?,0,[removed]
Girlfriends and Boyfriends,0,"What's the difference between a girlfriend and a wife.     
  ..... about 45lbs.

What's the difference between a boyfriend and a  husband.     
  ..... about 45mins."
"If we run out of food due to COVID-19 and have to revert to cannibalism, remember to eat organic...",0,That means Vegans first because they’re the closest to grass fed.
"What‘s the difference between a philosopher, a metaphysician and a theologian?",0,The philosopher is looking for a black cat in a dark room. The metaphysician is looking for a black cat in a dark room where there is no cat. The theologian is looking for a black cat in a dark room where there is no cat and he yells out:  I‘ve got the cat!
What did the skeleton say after meeting his arch nemesis?,0,“I’ve got a bone to pick with you!”
"The son asks his mother: ""Hey mom, have you seen my parrot?""",0,"Mom: *""No, but I now understand why the cat started talking.""*"
What is long and hard...,0,"My six-year-old niece likes to stick it between her legs and give it a good ride.

A pogo stick"
Hindsight is 20/20...,0,"Because this year there's nothing to look forward to.


Credit: u/IveyRoney"
I bought my son a fridge for Christmas.,0,"I can not wait to see his face light up when he opens it.^([I stole this from imgur comments, but I am posting it here so that you can use it today and tomorrow on people you dislike. Merry Christmas.])"
You can't spell MOSQUE WITHOUT MOSQUITOES,0,[removed]
I had sex with my bike once.,0,"It was tiresome, but nothing I couldn’t handle."
I HATE when homeless people shake their cans of change at me.,0,"





I get it, you have more money than me, you don't have to show off."
"What goes clippity-clop bang, clippity-clop bang, clippity-clop bang?",0,An Amish drive by.
USA only has 4% of the worlds population,0,"But has more than 33% of all the worlds covid cases. We all knew USA what a shithole, now Americans know too"
why don’t adults get school shooter jokes?,0,Cause they’re aimed at a younger audience
What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea?,0,I wouldn't pay $100 to have a lentil on my face
What's the best thing about sleeping with twenty-eight year olds?,0,The fact that there are 20 of them.
How many roaches does it take to screw in a light bulb?,0,"Can't tell, as soon as the light comes on, they scatter!

(Thanks A Bug's Life)"
Why did the black guy steal the tv?,0,Because he’s black.
Bored during quarantine!,0,"I have overdone things that would usually qualify as distraction!
I was daydreaming when I got distracted and ended up thinking nothing, this is the first time I ever meditated..."
What's the useless skin around a vagina called?,0,The woman
What does mafia and a pussy have in common,0,One slip of the tongue you're in deep shit
I was never really into one night stands...,0,[removed]
"Three people having sex is called a Threesome, and four people having sex is called a Foursome",0,"Man, that really brings new meaning to handsome."
"Three people having sex is called a Threesome, and four people having sex is called a Foursome",0,[removed]
"A 30 year old jobless, homeless, broke guy went to a palm reading fortune teller to know when will his life be better.",0,"Guy: How will my future be?

FT: Till you're 42, you'll suffer thinking about getting ruined, cleaned out, agonized, strapped, tortured, penniless, distressed, dirt poor, tormented,  wasted, unproductive, exhausted, dried up and living a lifeless life.

Guy: So what happens after 42.

FT: You'll stop thinking about it."
How many failed tests does it take to kill a student?,0,"Failed tests don’t kill students, obviously"
Who would be the mascot against racism?,0,"A panda! 
 
He's black 
He's white
Hes Asian!"
Yell Fire,0,[removed]
How do you make a hormone?,0,"
Don't pay her. (Whore moan)"
What do Reddit and Wikipedia have on common,0,The letter i as their second to last letter
USA has,0,"Over 750,000 covid cases lmfao"
Why did the heavy metal group rent a wrecking ball for their upcoming concert?,0,They wanted to bring the house down
English Teachers only want one thing and it’s fucking disgusting,0,[removed]
"One day on his way to work Tom got into an accident. He was passed out for 2 months at the hospital,When he finally started to wake up, and saw his nurse.",0,"Tom: were am? Who are you?

Nurse: I'm your nurse Tom, you were out for 2 months but im here if you need anything.

With that Tom passed out again, and woke up the next day to see the nurse once again in his room.

Tom: Nurse you said you would be here if I need anything right.

Nurse: yes, What's wrong Tom?

Tom: Nurse I've been out for a couple of months, and I'm feeling horny, can you help me?

Nurse: Sorry Tom there is nothing I can do for you. You have...

Tom: Please I will give you $1000 for a handjob.

Nurse: Okay but you can't tell anybody, and you have to put this cover over your head.

Tom: deal!!

The Nurse gave Tom a handjob,then went home to her husband to tell him the news.

Husband: Hey babe how was work?

Nurse: Great, I gave this dude a handjob for $1000.

Husband:How is that great!?

Nurse: I think the guy suffers from phantom lamb. His penis was chopped of because of a car accident."
Virgins only want one thing,0,And it's fucking.
A man kissed his best friend’s girlfriend while they were all out at the club one night.,0,"Feeling guilty the next day, he decides to call his best friend and tell him what had happened.

When his friend answers, he goes, “Hey buddy, I have to tell ya something.”

“Yeah, what’s up?”

“There’s no easy way to tell you this, so I’m just gonna rip the Band-Aid off and say it. Remember last night, when we went out with your girlfriend to that club down the street?”

“Yeah, that was fun: what about it?”

The man sighs. “I ended up alone with your girlfriend at one point, and we were both drunk, and we ended up kissing while you weren’t looking. I’m really sorry, but I felt like I had to tell you.”

The line is silent for a good two minutes until his friend says “Oh, alright then.”

The man, confused, goes “So you’re not mad at me?”

His friend simply goes, “Nope.”

The man, now bewildered out of his mind, asks “But are we still friends?”

His friend once again says, “Nope.”

The man then says “What are we then?”

A few seconds pass by before his friend goes “Even” and hangs up the phone."
What were the bra sizes of five of Henry VIII's wives?,0,"D, B, D, D, B"
Good question,0,What would happen if you ate popcorn kernels then got into a hot tub?
Don't make fun of fat people with lisps...,0,They are heavy and tired of it
I hate it when Autocorrect happens on PornHub,0," No, I don't want to watch ""farming"" porn."
Why was the anti-vaxxer‘s child crying?,0,They were going through a midlife crisis
"when i die, i want to die like my grandmother did: peacefully, in her sleep.",0,not like the people who were in her car screaming.
Everyone got quarantined at my campsite the other day.,0,You could say it was pretty in-tents.
The Titanic was built to last,0,let that sink in.
Terrible news. My wife has been diagnosed with OCD and depression.,0,"But on the upside, she can't be bothered to stop cleaning the house."
"After Adam and Eve arrived in Eden, he stayed out late a few nights wandering the garden.",0,"
Eve became suspicious.
“Are you running around with another woman?” Eve fired off.
“What other woman?” Adam exclaimed “ You’re it!” 
That night, Adam was awakened by Eve poking him in the chest.
“What are you doing?”
“Counting your ribs.”"
Two blondes walk into a building,0,You would've thought one of them would've seen it first
I didn't fight my way to the top of the food chain,0,to be a vegetarian.
"""We are the champions, we are the champions. No time for losers, 'cause we are the champions...""",0,"Ok, cool. So far, I'm with you.

""... of the world!""

Now, hold on. Champions of the world? That's a little much. When did this competition take place, after all? I must've slept through it. If I was there, representing team ""the world"", I guarantee it would have gone a lot differently. Just sayin'."
Why do blondes wear underwear?,0,To keep their ankles warm.
A man goes into a Chinese restaurant and sees people dressed like vikings,0,"""Excuse me, ladies and gentleman. I am a well traveled man and the atmosphere of my excursions must be perfect. I must kindly ask you to leave.""

A big, muscular man dressed in Viking armor walked up to the man and said

""Norway"""
If you had to sacrifice,0,"One state to Corona virus, which state would it be?  And why California?"
Ordinary sex can make your day,0,But anal will make your hole weak.
Okay guys I've got an original one:,0,Why did the chicken cross the road?
What do dogs and redditors have in common?,0,I assume they're male unless specified otherwise.
A clock shop owner decide to try and break a world record,0,"He found one to attempt: Most battery powered devices held at once. He decided to use his clocks. As he was holding more and more, a crowd started to gather. However the man hadn’t been paying his taxes on time. An tax collector saw him on his way to collect the mans taxes. He asked the man to pay his taxes. The man, in the middle of doing the record said, “wait, I’m busy” .

The tax collector responded, “Well, for someone who’s busy, you sure have a lot of time on your hands."
Let’s do it,0,So I know this is not a joke but let’s declare war against tiktok
Just remember ...,0,"if the world didn't suck, we'd all fall off."
My Goal was to lose 10 this year....,0,[removed]
Why does Mercury go up in a sphygmomanometer?,0,Because it's under pressure.
[Long]A man who owned a clock shop wanted to set a world record.,0,"He found one: Most battery powered devices he’d at once. He decided to use his clocks. As he was holding more and more, a crowd started to gather. However the man hadn’t been paying his taxes on time. An IRS guy saw him on his way to collect the mans taxes. He asked the man to pay his taxes. The man, in the middle of doing the record said, “wait, I’m busy” .

The IRS guy responded, “Well, for someone who’s busy, you sure have a lot of time on your hands."
How do you get milk from a cat?,0,"Take away his saucer.


Follow up joke......

How do you get milk from a female cat?

Take away her saucer."
What do breads do at the dinner table?,0,Toast
Why doesn't anyone like paper?,0,Because it's tearable
Bathroom poetry,0,"When you shit, shit with ease.
Place your elbows on your knees.
Put a finger beside your nose,
Give a grunt and out it goes!"
The invention of the shovel was...,0,Groundbreaking
Smelly joke,0,"Where do they make smells?

In an olfactory"
The more suicidal people get,0,The less suicidal people there are!
"A very popular MMORPG, this cerulean Pixar dvd, a Boy Wizard and a Mesoamerican receptacle walk into a bar. The barman takes one look at the group and exclaims",0,"WoW, this Blue Up, 'Arry P, Mayan box"
"How in the hell do you get ""dick"" from ""Richard""?",0,You ask him nicely..
"""The car won't start,"" said a wife to her husband.",0,"""I think there's water in the carburetor.""

""How do you know?"" said the husband contemptuously. ""You don't even know what the carburetor is.""

""I'm telling you,"" repeated the wife, ""I 'm sure there's water in the carburetor.""

""We'll see,"" mocked the husband. ""Let me check it out. Where's the car?""

""In the swimming pool."""
Did you hear about the guy that went to a nudist Colony?,0,The first day was his hardest
Yo mama so old,0,Her last name is saurus
Talking over the fence,0,"My wife Julie was talking over the garden fence to our neighbor Betty.

""Hi Betty, how are things, how are you finding all this lock down stuff?""

""It's OK, bit strange having Jim around the house so much.""

""I can imagine, I saw him coming home this morning from the store, he had a big bunch of flowers with him.""

Betty went quiet, her cheeks reddening.

""What's the matter Betty, did i say something wrong?""

""No. It's just when he buys me flowers I have to go upstairs, take all my clothes off and lay on the bed with my legs open.""

""Why?, don't you have any vases in your house."""
"Following every Chrome, Firefox, Safari joke is an",0,[removed]
Where do melons go for summer fun?,0,John Cougar Mellencamp
"Paper was tough, Really?",0,"Dad: ""Why Didn't You Go For The Exam?"" Son: ""Paper Was Tough"" Dad: ""Without Going, How Did You Know?"" Son: ""Paper Was Leaked Two Days Ago"""
What do you call a cheap guinea pig?,0,[removed]
Where do you take someone that got hurt playing peek a boo?,0,To the I.C.U
My grandmother told me that my entire family loves me and supports me.,0,"My mom said ""Hypocrite, You were the one who taught me not to lie"""
Time is such a slut,0,[removed]
My boyfriend is imaginary.,0,I'm in a complex relationship.
"Amidst all of the current negativity, it's important to remember...",0,There's only 35 claps left until Christmas.
What’s a gay priest’s favourite toy?,0,Praynal beads.
All transactions should be rounded down if you ask me...,0,But that's just my 0 cents.
The Flag of Seychelles,0,[removed]
"Me and my dad had a conversation about long and short poles today,",0,Backyard camping was so much fun!
"My father once told me, ""Son, in this world, there are 10 types of people.""",0,Those who understand binary and those who don't.
"You know what they say, three times the charm.",0,"Unless you’re my dad. Four times the fall, four times the steps."
What do hackers from movies and guys with small dicks have in common?,0,They both have to say 'I'm in'.
What's the difference between a massage parlor and a funeral parlor?,0,One does not give you a happy ending.
Someone stole my office account,0,[removed]
"Why is ""dark"" spelled with a ""k"" not a ""c""",0,"Becuase you can't ""C"" in the dark"
Here's a good joke that isn't a repost!,0,[removed]
"for the year 2020, we didnt see this coming",0,[removed]
A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his staff..,0,"A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his staff.

While waiting for the coffee machine to finish brewing, the Colonel decided
to pose a question to all assembled.

He explained that his wife had been a bit frisky the night before and he
failed to reach his usual amount of sound sleep.He posed the question of just how much of sex was ""work""
and how much of it was ""pleasure?""

A Major chimed in with 75%-25% in favor of work.

A Captain said it was 50%-50%.

A Lieutenant responded with 25%-75% in favor of pleasure, depending upon his
state of inebriation at the time.

There being no consensus, the colonel turned to the Private First Class who
was in charge of making the coffee and asked for his opinion?

Without  any hesitation, the young Private First Class responded, ""Sir, it
has to be 100% pleasure.

The colonel was surprised and as you might guess, asked why?

""Well, sir, if there was any work involved, the officers would have me doing
it for them.""

The room fell silent"
Why do people make such a big deal about how hard it is to get bacon out of the package? It's not that difficult.,0,It's all the squealing and running around that makes it fun.
"Nearly every country in the world uses metric, except for America...",0,because America has a foot fetish.
Fred and Mary got married,0,"Fred and Mary got married, but can't afford a honeymoon, so they go back to Fred's parent'shome for their first night together.

In the morning, Johnny, Fred's little brother, gets up and has his breakfast. As he is going out of the door to go to school, he asks his Mom if Fred and Mary are up yet. 

She replies, 'No'. 

Johnny asks, 'Do you know what I think?' His mom replies, 'I do not want to hear what you think! Just go to school.' 

Johnny comes home for lunch and asks his mom, 'Are Fred and Mary up yet?'

She replies, 'No.'

Johnny says, 'Do you know what I think?' 

His mom replies, 'Never mind what you think! Eat your lunch and go back to school.' 

After school, Johnny comes home and asks again, 'Are Fred and Mary up yet?'

His mom says, 'No.'

He asks, 'Do you know what I think?' 

His Mom replies, 'Ok, tell me what you think?'

He says, 'Last night Fred came to my room for the Vaseline and I think I gave him my airplane glue.' 
__________________"
What does The Most Interesting Man in the World eat for breakfast?,0,&gt;!Dos Eggies!&lt;
Why did the sock cross the road?,0,Because I put on the wrong sock
What is the opposite of eggs?,0,No it's not.
Day 30 self-isolation sale! Lifesize mannequin! Free!,0,"Child-sized mannequins require occasional feeding. They come in several sizes, not responsible for breakage. And if you take the full-sized wife model too, I'll through in one hundred bucks as a special bonus! Hurry before I expire,"
What do you call a yellow doctor that gives you a free injection?,0,A honey bee.
A family was having dinner at home when the topic of sex came up.,0,"Teenage son: I know sex is supposed to feel good for both people but who does it feel better for? The man or the woman?

Mom: Well, when you're cleaning your ears out with a qtip what feels better, the qtip or your ear?"
I want to die by an I.E.D and have on open casket funeral,0,The first to complete the human jigsaw wins. Guess you could say I put the fun in funeral.
People with a victim complex,0,It’s all your fault
When does a son joke become a dad joke,0,When it becomes apparent
"Sometime, British people be like,""Hi, I'm Bri ish""",0,"Its probably because they drank the ""t"""
When Beethoven passed away,0,"When Beethoven passed away, he was buried in a churchyard. A couple days later, the town drunk was walking through the cemetery and heard some strange noise coming from the area where Beethoven was buried. Terrified, the drunk ran and got the priest to come and listen to it.

The priest bent close to the grave and heard some faint, unrecognizable music coming from the grave. Frightened, the priest ran and got the town . When the magistrate arrived, he bent his ear to the grave, listened for a moment, and said, ""Ah, yes, that's Beethoven's Ninth Symphony, being played backward."" 

He listened a while longer, and said, ""There's the Eighth Symphony, and it's backward, too. Most puzzling."" So the magistrate kept listening; ""There's the Seventh... the Sixth... the Fifth..."" 

Suddenly the realization of what was happening dawned on the magistrate; he stood up and announced to the crowd that had gathered in the cemetery, ""My fellow citizens, there's nothing to worry about. It's just Beethoven decomposing."""
Why are male amputees always dick's?,0,Because if you can't beat em join em.
Here a little lesson in trickery,0,"Two married buddies are out drinking one night when one turns to the other and says, ""You know, I don't know what else to do. Whenever I go home after we've been out drinking, I turn the headlights off before I get to the driveway. I shut off the engine and coast into the garage. I take my shoes off before I go into the house, I sneak up the stairs, I get undressed in the bathroom. I ease into bed and my wife STILL wakes up and yells at me for staying out so late!""

His buddy looks at him and says, ""Well, you're obviously taking the wrong approach. I screech into the driveway, slam the door, storm up the steps, throw my shoes into the closet, jump into bed, rub my hands on my wife's ass and say, 'How about a blowjob?' ....And she's always sound asleep.""

His buddy says, ""Alright, I'll try it!""

The next day the two meet up and the first guy asks if he tried it and how it went.

""I did it just like you explained, but it didn't go quite how you said--she woke up! But on the bright side, your wife gives one hell of a blowjob."""
Why is a banjo solo like premature ejaculation?,0,"You can feel it coming, but there's no way to stop it."
Did you know that diarrhoea is hereditary,0,It runs in you jeans
Little Timmy went into his grandparent's bedroom.,0,"He found his grandpa and grandma half-naked, fooling around in bed.

He asked his grandpa what they are doing.

Grandpa said: ""Your grandma is my wild card""

Little Timmy left the room confused, so he entered his parent's bedroom and found mommy and daddy half-naked, fooling around in bed.

He asked his father what they are doing.

Dad said: ""Your mom is my wild card""

Little Timmy became even more confused, so he entered his older brother's bedroom and found him playing cards.

Little Timmy asked his older brother: ""Who is your wild card?""

The brother replied: ""You don't need a wild card, if you have a good hand!"""
Why do Jewish men get circumcised?,0,Because Jewish women won’t touch anything unless it’s 20% off.
"What weighs more, a gallon of water or a gallon of butane?",0,The water. Butane is lighter fluid
Who are interested in color-cosmetics? Please participate in this survey!,0,[removed]
"Little Johnny yells upstairs: ""Dad, there's a salesman here with a moustache.""",0,"""Tell him I've got one."""
"An Amish woman and her daughter were riding in an old buggy one cold blustery day, when the daughter said, ""My hands are freezing cold!"" The mother replied, ""Put them between your legs. Your body heat will warm them up.""",0,"

The daughter did and her hands warmed up.

The next day, the daughter was riding with her boy friend who said, ""My hands are freezing cold!""

The girl replied, ""Put them between my legs. The warmth of my body will warm them up.""

He did and warmed his hands.

The following day, the boyfriend was again in the buggy with the daughter.

He said, ""My nose is cold.""

The girl replied, ""Put it between my legs. The warmth of my body will warm it up.""

He did and warmed his nose.

The next day, the boyfriend was again driving with the daughter and he said, ""My penis is frozen solid.""

The following day, the daughter was driving in the buggy with her mother again and she says to her mother, ""Have you ever heard of a penis?""

Slightly concerned the mother said, ""Why, yes. Why do you ask?""

The daughter replies, ""They make one heck of a mess when they defrost, don't they?!"""
Where does a lion get it’s power from?,0,The Maine’s!
"My wife just told me that in 8 months, I’m in for a big surprise!!!",0,"

I can’t wait for Santa to come now!!"
Why did the perfectionist cross the road?,0,Because it had just been tarmacked.
Why do Sodium and Chloride not like eachother?,0,Because they're salty!
"Without a doubt, my favorite Robin Williams movie is Mrs Fire",0,[removed]
"An engineer, a mathematician and a linguist are travelling on a train in Scotland",0,"At some point, they see a red cow from the window.

The engineer says: ""Look. In Scotlands, cows are red"".

The mathematician rolls his eyes and says: ""How illogical is that, you moron? Until now, we only proved that in Scotland there is at least one cow, and it's red"".

The linguist chuckles a little bit and stays silent.
""What?"" - says the mathematician - ""Do you not understand my rigorous proof?""

The linguist argues: ""What we proved is that one specimen of that species, which may or may not be labelled in a given lexical taxonomy, exists. As for the red, this is just the focal colour your ideolect was trained to label that shade with: we didn't measure the actual wavelength""."
My doctor seems to think I have some time changing abilities.,0,She seems upset that I won't make it two thirty
Our generations thought,0,"Our generations thought the grandparents and great grandparents who lived through the Great Depression were weird for continuing to stretch milk with water and reuse cardboard as paper for shopping lists, well after the fact. I think that when we're all old, future generations will think us equally strange - but instead of saving really small pieces of string, we'll still be hoarding hand sanitiser and loo rolls, and not kissing during sex."
I like to hold hands at the movies...,0,which always seems to startle strangers.
If sex with three people is called a threesome and sex with four people is called a foursome...,0,...I now know why they call me lonesome
A detective is investigating a crime scene in Mexico.,0,"A cop fills him in on what happened.

“Apparently the killer is riddled with dementia and considers the train his lover, so he killed the train operator out of jealousy”

“Wow” says the detective, looking up at the train in question.

“That’s some locomotive”"
Do you want to hear a joke about software,0,I'm still developing it
I'm returning these girlscout cookies cuz of false advertising,0,they are NOT cannibal food
The funniest sub on reddit,0,Is a joke.
What’s the difference....,0,"What’s the difference between a hippo and a zippo?
.
.
One is heavy and the other a little lighter."
ygolohcysp. That’s reverse psychology.,0,[removed]
"I walked past a homeless guy with a sign that read, ""One day, this could be you""",0,"I put my money back in my pocket, just in case he's right."
What is the difference between a stand-up comedian and a memer?,0,Stand-up comedian make fun of themselves and memers make fun of stand-up comedians
"My neighbour John, who's a locksmith",0,"Knocked on my door this morning asking if he could borrow some money as he's been at home for a few weeks now and run out of cash.........
I sternly said ""go out there and earn it........... you're a Key Worker!! """
A builder and a priest are out for a game of golf one afternoon.....,0,"Unfortunately the builder wasn't very good at the game and every time he missed a shot would shout ':shite:, missed'.

The game went on and after several outbursts from the builder, the priest could hold his tongue no longer. ""Don't swear like that"" he told his friend, ""or God will punish you"". The builder apologised and the game continued.

As soon as he missed another shot the builder shouted "":shite:, missed."" and continued to do this every time he missed a shot for the next three holes. 

The priest was starting to get really angry by now and said ""I must insist that you stop swearing this instant, otherwise God will hear you and punish you!""

Once again, his pleas made no difference as the builder missed an easy putt on the seventeenth green and shouted out "":shite:, missed"". Immediately the heavens parted and a bolt of lightning flew from the sky, hitting the priest and killing him stone dead.

Suddenly, a booming voice was heard in the clouds, "":shite:, missed!"""
"A 30 Y.O broke, jobless, homeless guy goes to a fortune teller who tells the future by reading his palm.",0,"Guy: How will my future be?

FT: Till you're 42, you'll suffer thinking about getting ruined, cleaned out, agonized, strapped, tortured, penniless, distressed, dirt poor, tormented,  wasted, unproductive, exhausted, dried up and living a lifeless life.

Guy: So what happens after 42.

FT: You'll stop thinking."
"Why are Prisoners referred to as ""inmates""?",0,"Because, on their first night, they're most likely to have said to them: ""I'm putting it in, mate!"""
"I was going to post a joke I have seen here before, ...",0,But I figure you guys already Reddit.
What you call an unmarried women who is ignorant ?,0,Miss\_informed.
You don't need a parachute to go skydiving...You need a parachute to go skydiving twice!!,0,[removed]
A man is walking along the street when he sees a ladder...,0,"... stretching well up in the clouds. Being the adventurous type, Harry begins to climb.

After a short while he stops at a cloud and sees a large, ugly looking woman lying there.

""Take me now or climb the ladder to success,"" she said.

He decided that he was definitely not drunk enough for this so he continued climbing.

Soon after he saw another woman lying on the cloud, this time slightly thinner and with average looks. 

""Take me now or climb the ladder to success,"" she said.

Noticing the pattern, Harry climbs further and sees an attractive woman with a good figure.

""Take me now or climb the ladder to success,"" she said.

Getting excited, he continued climbing.
On the next cloud was the most stunning woman he had ever seen - perfect body, slim curves, full set of gorgeous breasts - the lot. 

""Fuck me now or climb the ladder to success,"" she breathed seductively.

Despite the beauty of this woman, Harry's greed got the better of him and he continues climbing.

""The next one will have to be Aphrodite or the like,"" he thinks to himself.

Suddenly a latch locks behind Harry and he is trapped inside a dark room.
An enormous 6 ft 5, 120kg biker-looking bloke with a full set of tattoos and a great bushy beard stands up and starts walking towards him menacingly.

""Who the fuck are you?!"" Harry asks.
The man grins and replies ""I'm Cess."""
You let a sloth give you gonnorhea?!,0,*slow clap*
Any (too soon) covid-19 jokes out there?,0,[removed]
What’s the difference between a cheese panini and a grilled cheese sandwich?,0,$4
The only reason why Watson was good in Holmes,0,He had Sherlock (sheer luck)
"As the world can communicate freely online directly to anyone, we find ourselves in virtual information abundance, spoiled for choice!",0,"You can now choose between funny propaganda, serious propaganda, dramatic propaganda, scary propaganda, or sad propaganda!"
"One day, Einstein has to give a conference to all the top scientists in the world...",0,"One day, Einstein has to give a conference to all the top scientists  in the world.

On the way there, he tells his driver, that looks a bit like him, ""I'm sick of all these conferences, I always say the same things over and over!""

The drivers agrees, ""You're right, as your driver, I attended all of them, and even though I don't know anything about science, I could give the conference in your place.""

""This is a great idea!"" says Einstein ""Lets switch places then!""

So they switch clothes and as soon as they arrive, the driver dressed as Einstein, goes on stage and starts giving the usual speech, while the real Einstein, dressed as the car driver, attends it.

But in the crowd, there was one scientist who wanted to impress everyone and thought of a very difficult question to ask Einstein, hoping he wouldn't be able to respond. 

So this guy stands up and interrupts the conference by posing his very difficult question. 

The whole room goes silent, holding their breath, waiting for the response.

The driver looks at him, dead in the eyes and says : ""Sir, your question is so easy to answer that I'm going to let my driver reply to it for me."""
The dog was able to find the funny bone it buried by its scents of humerus,0,[removed]
What would you call a movie staring Jake Paul and a Psychopath?,0,Dumb and Dahmer
If sex with three people is called a threesome and sex with four people is called a foursome…,0,I guess now it's clear why everybody calls me handsome.
"I broke my finger last week,",0,"On the other hand, i'm okay."
"I forgot to do the dishes again, and as punishment my wife read me the collected works of Kafka",0,I never did hear the end of it
A dyslexic man walks into a bra,0,But a schizophrenic man walks into nothing
Asian jokes,0,Tell me your funniest Asian joke
Cares Act Check,0,Received my aid check from the government and it has Trump's signature on it. I took a picture of it with my banking app on my phone to deposit and the check bounced. I guess I should have known better to cash any check with Trump's name on it. And then Citi Bank cancelled my account calling it high risk assessment for doing business with Trump. And said they refuse the right to do business with Trump or anyone else doing business with him. This was under their 'Fool us once policy rule' in the TOS.
Sally's first job,0,"Little Sally is excited that a new house is going to be built on the vacant lot next-door.

Soon she gets to see the ground dug up, a foundation laid down, and the arrival of the carpenters. They're a little rough around the edges but after a short while, Sally is over there talking with the crew and asking a lot of questions. 

The carpenters like the girl and before long have her doing little things to make her feel important. At the end of the week they even give her a $10 paycheck. 

Sally's mom says, ""let's take that money to the bank and start an account for you.""

When they get to the bank, the teller says, ""wow, where did you get all of this money little lady?"" Sally explains the whole story of her eventful week.

The teller says, ""so, are you going back to work next week?""

Sally says, ""I will if those fuckers at the  lumber yard ever show up with the goddamn trusses!"""
What was so wrong?,0,[removed]
The creator of predictive text just died,0,[removed]
"Hair Salons, Tanning Salons, Gyms, Spas, The Clinique Counter...",0,"All closed.

It's getting ugly out there."
"Policeman: Im very sorry Ma'am, but it looks like your husband got hit by a bus.",0,"Lady: Im aware of that sir, but John has a wonderful personality."
Son: Why is my sister's name Paris?,0,"Dad: Because we conceived her in Paris.

Son: Thanks dad.

Dad: No problem Quarantine."
What's up?,0,[deleted]
Sam Ehite,0,[removed]
What's the difference between your wife and your job 5 years later?,0,(A) your job still sucks
What do you get when you cross a cow and an octopus?,0,[removed]
I really like that French song about the pink airplane.,0,L’avion Rose
What do you call a crab in self-isolation?,0,A hermit crab.
My family and I put my grandma in a retirement home,0,Because we didn't know what to do with her body
People think that the word 'queue' is just 'Q' followed by 4 silent letters,0,"But those letters aren't silent, they're just waiting their turn"
I'm going to teach you how to speak Irish in the spirit of diversity.,0,"Say, ""Whale oil beef hooked"" quickly.


Bonus: for Australian say, ""Good eye might."""
The ultimate race: the person unloading the dishwasher vs the person eating,0,[removed]
Me: *falls down,0,"Mom: What was that noise?

Me: My shirt fell

Mom: Sounded way to heavy to be a shirt

Me: I was in it when it fell"
My girlfriend poked me in the eye the other day...,0,I stopped seeing her for a while.
"I work in retail, a married man made me laugh",0,[removed]
Why did the turtle go to AT&amp;T,0,because he couldn't sprint
A limbo dancer walked into a bar.,0,That wasn’t supposed to happen.
You know what's better than 4K? Dial up,0,It's 56K
"If you went camping and woke up with a condom in your ass, would you tell anyone? ... (Uh, No?)",0,Wanna go camping?
I love the new sound the Facebook app makes when you open it up,0,[removed]
A young boy walks up to his dad with a puzzled look on his face.,0,[removed]
What did the pizza maker say before robbing a bank?,0,"""I may love making pizza, but I still knead the dough."""
I was gonna wrote a joke about paedofiles,0,But it’s a bit of a touchy subject
I like my coffee like I like my women.,0,Hot and all over my cock.
"Two gamers, one French, one American...",0,"A: You up for some Wii?

F: Oui!

A: Yes, do you wanna play?

F: Oui.

A: Yes, the game console.

F: Oui.

A: Are you going to answer my question?

F: Non."
What's Carol Baskin's favorite dating app?,0,Grindr
How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?,0,Ten. One to change the bulb and nine to blog about how empowering it was.
What's the difference between peeping toms and a burglar?...,0,A burglar snatches watches. - Redd Foxx
Sex is hereditary.,0,"If your parents never had it, neither will you."
I tried to date a rabbi but when people found out I got physically assaulted.,0,[deleted]
I asked the Colonel what the lowest rank in the army was.,0,"He said, ""It's Private.""

I said, ""Come on, you can tell me."""
What does a musician do when he dies?,0,He decomposes..
"Whats worse, being gay, or being black?",0,"Being black is better, because you don't have to tell your parents."
Did you hearabout the magic tractor?,0,It drove down the road and turned into a field.
Did you hear about the man who drowned in a bowl of Muesli?,0,Apparently the current took him under.
A married couple are out on a drive when..,0,"They see a wounded skunk...
They stop, the wife gets out, picks it up and brings it to the car.
She says “look, it’s shivering. It must be cold. What should I do?”
The husband replies “put it between your legs to keep it warm.”
She asks “what about the smell?”
He says “hold its nose”"
I cummed in the shower,0,Now it’s crying because I wont come back
How did the ISIS camel pass out from exhaustion?,0,It had to teach sex ED and Driver's ED at the same time.
A husband and wife are doing a crossword puzzle.,0,"Husband: Comedian Mike, 4 letters

Wife: Epps

Husband: Adolescent, 4 letters

Wife: Teen

Husband: Property paperwork, 4 letters

Wife: Deed

Husband: Talking trees of Lord of the Rings, 3 letters

Wife: Ent

Husband: Take a life, 4 letters

Wife: Kill

Husband: Religious songs, 5 letters

Wife: Hymns

Husband: Santa's little helper, 3 letters

Wife: Elf"
Einstein sits next to a man on a long flight.,0,"Einstein says,""Let's play a game. I will ask you a question, and if you don't know the answer, you will pay me only $5; but if I don't know the answer, I will pay you $500"". The man agrees and the game proceeds.

Einstein asks the first question, “What is the distance between the Earth and the Moon?”

The man doesn't say a word. He reaches into his pocket, and pulls out $5. He then asks Einstein, “What goes up a hill with 3 legs, but comes down on 4?”

Einstein thinks about it for a long time, but fails to answer the question. After almost an hour, he gives the man $500.

An irritated Einstein then asks, “Well, so what goes up a hill on 3 legs and comes down on 4?”.

The man reaches into his pocket and gives Einstein $5."
What did the Australian use when they ran out of toilet paper?,0,"Bidet, mate."
There are 10 types of people,0," Those who understand binary, and those who don't."
What does Tom Hanks say when he's grateful?,0,[deleted]
I almost made a joke about chicken parmesan...,0,But I didn't because I thought it would be too cheesy.
The bell tower up the street always rings 12 minutes before the hour...,0,I guess the church is behind the times.
He turns himself into a pickle...,0,[removed]
So the Hacker group Anonymous just declared war on ISIS and Al-Queida,0,Quite ironic that terrorists will be killed by 72 virgins.
"What do you call a wizard who walks everywhere on bare feet, has poor bone density and really bad breath?",0,A super-calloused fragile mystic hexed by halitosis.
One day Kim Jong Un is going to hear a loud popping sound...,0,[deleted]
How do you stop a film from being pirated in China?,0,Just name it Tiananmen Square Massacre.
What did the drug tell to the schizophrenic?,0,[deleted]
"""The Conspiracy Theorists of the Future Will Call Themselves Conspiracy Theorists""",0,... and it will confuse the hell out of everyone.  Which I'm sure is all part of their elaborate... plan.
What don't Europeans make Muslim bombing jokes?,0,It's always too soon.
What did the Mexican say after getting divorced?,0,I don't wanna taco bout it
The wife caught the dog licking...,0,"My wife walked in from work today and saw the dog licking marmite out of my arsehole.

""Don't let him do that!"" she screamed, ""It's disgusting.""

""That's your opinion"" I said, ""This is his second jar, he absolutely loves the stuff."""
A woman is in bed with her lover who also happens to be her husband’s best friend.,0,"They make love for hours. Afterwards, while they’re just laying there, her phone rings.

The woman answers and has a short conversation.

When she hangs up her lover asks, “Who was that?”

“Oh,” she replies, “That was my husband telling me all about the wonderful time he’s having on his fishing trip with you.”"
I've been in love with the same woman for 17 years.,0,"If my wife ever finds out, she'll kill me."
Why there is still no vaccine for COVID-19?,0,[removed]
Hillary gave Jeffrey Epstein a high five,0,but she still left him hanging
Whats not to like about the pandemic?,0,"Its god granting everyday you ever wanted to skip work or school, delivered in the form of a global economic depression."
America &amp; Yogurt.,0,[removed]
Wanna know why I don't like plane jokes?,0,They always go over my head.
What's the best part about a glass of water?,0,[removed]
I heard muffled singing from the kitchen cupboard,0,Found out it was the icing sugar...
What did the pastry say to the cake when they were in bed?,0,I'm crumbing!
"One day, a ridiculously bored King in a small town decided to have a contest and the winner would choose, either to marry his daughter, gold and riches... Or name anything that he desires.",0,"Whomsoever jumps down the moat filled with crocodiles,  swims to the sides and climbs back up unharmed shall win the contest and name his price. 

The crowd gathered near the edge of the moat where the king shouted:

""Is anyone brave enough to entertain me?"". And noone dared to respond.

The king, visibly bored and pissed, shouted ""If noone dares to jump, I will pick out from the crowd""

And the people gasped. No one even dared to attempt this futile task. Fear dawned at them.

Then suddenly to everyone's surprise, a splash. 

And then emerging from the waters, a man visibly swimming for his life as he avoided a fierce monster on his tail. He makes the side of the moat and climbs up frantically before he was caught. He makes it up. The crowd cheers and The king, very pleased, shouts: 

""Name your price! Brave soul.  Do you wish to marry my daughter and be prince?""

- ""No!""

""Do you wish for riches and fame?""

""Oh, hell No!""

""Then what do you desire? Speak!""



""I wanna find that motherfucker who fuckin' pushed me!"""
My Lesbian friend gifted me a Gucci scent,0,[deleted]
Q: Is Google male or female?,0,"A: Female, because it doesn't let you finish a sentence before making a suggestion."
Why is Trump so keen to build a wall to keep out Mexican rapists?,0,[removed]
I've been pretty busy in quarantine,0,My erotic Animal Crossing fan fiction is going to blow some minds
"Hitler was right,",0,[deleted]
What did Edith say to Archie Bunker when he got turned into a potato?,0,Ohh Starchie!
"A pastor, a priest and a rabbi walk onto a bar.",0,"Since it wasn't foretold in scripture, they didn't listen to the people telling them to duck."
A guy gets into a fight with a girl he doesn't know,0,"**Guy:** Listen to me you dumb bitch, I don't know you!

**Girl:** Well if thinking my marriage would work itself out makes me stupid then so be it!

**Guy:** You're married? Only an idiot would marry you!

So long story short I'm an idiot with Alzheimer's."
Little Johnny looked at the supermarket aisle that was completely bereft of toilet paper and asked: “Does this mean everyone is wearing pull-ups?”,0,To which I replied: “Depends.”
I have a great memory,0,"I can’t remember forgetting a thing, ever!"
What do you call a primate that loves fruit?,0,An orangeutan
Influencers’ life,0,"A twenty-something walks into a shop with a parrot on her shoulder, and begins recording herself in the floral, with fabrics mugging with product. 
The shopkeeper is intrigued, and asks her “ where did you get that?” 
The parrot says “Instagram! There’s millions of them there!”"
Collection of my favorite Latvian Jokes.,0,"* Man is hungry. He steal bread to feed family. Get home, find all family have gone Siberia! “More bread for me,” man think. But bread have worm.

* Man car break down near house of farmer. Take shelter in barn. Find farmer daughter in barn. Oh! Hot stuff! But TOO LATE! Is already rape by soldier.

* Latvian walk into bar with mule. Bartender say, “Why so long face?” Latvian say, “I was thinking of my daughter. She has been lie with soldier for potato feed baby. “

* Three Latvian are brag about sons. “My son is soldier. He have rape as many women as want,” say first Latvian. “Zo?” second say, “My son is farmer. He have all potato he want!” Third Latvian wait long time, then say, “My son is die at birth. For him, struggle is over.” “Wow! You are win us,” say others. But all are feel sad.

* Q : What are one potato say other potato? A: Condition ridiculous. Who have two potato?


* Q : How many Latvian is take screw in light bulb? A : 25. One screw in, 24 ride bicycle generator for 1-hour shift. But time probably better spend search food.

* Q: What is happening if you cross Latvian and potato? A: This is cruel joke. please, no more."
A diverse group of aquatic organisms that have the ability to conduct photosynthesis are homosexual and,0,they are algae.
Mississippi lent missouri her new jersey so what did delaware?,0,idaho but alaska
The KFC near my house is haunted.,0,They think it's poultrygeist.
They told me to shoot for the stars.,0,But my neighbors called in a noise complaint.
what is a computers favourite gutar riffs?,0,[removed]
"A priest, a rabbit, and a monk walk into a bar.",0,"The rabbit says ""I think I'm a typo."""
Corona go jokes!!!,0,[removed]
The funny thing about gang rape is,0,9 out of 10 people enjoy it.
"My brother has been staying with me for a couple weeks now, which has been awful.",0,"My brother is crazy. Even my neighbors hate him. The other day I opened the door...I caught him masturbating. He looks me right in the eyes and goes, “Shut the door.”

I said, “Get inside.”


credit: Anthony Jeselnik"
"My brother has been staying with me for a couple of weeks now, which has been awful.",0,"My brother is crazy. Even my neighbors hate him. The other day I opened the door...I caught him masturbating. He looks me right in the eyes and goes, “Shut the door.”

I said, “Get inside.”"
A young man has sex for the first time,0,"The young man was very nervous about having sex with his girlfriend for the very first time, because he was convinced that his penis would be too small.

Eventually he realized that he could not postpone it forever and he nervously invited her over to his house.

Hesitatingly he started to take off his clothes and after that he dimmed the lights. Very carefully he started taking off her clothes and he started stroking her. 

Finally he nervously nestled his erection inside her hand, hoping she didn't realize how small it was.

""No thank you,"" she said, ""I do not smoke."""
What do you get when you cross and hedgehog and a pig?,0,[removed]
What is the French national anthem?,0,We surrender..
Yo mama so fat that the world actually revolves around her.,0,[removed]
An engineer dies and is sent to hell,0,"He is hot and miserable, so he decides to take action. The A/C has been busted for a long time, so he fixes it. Things cool down quickly. The moving walkway motor jammed, so he un-jams it. People can get from place to place more easily. The TV was grainy and unclear, so he fixes the connection to the Satellite dish and now they get hundreds of high def channels.

One day, God decides to look down on Hell to see how his grand design is working out and notices that everyone is happy and enjoying umbrella drinks. He asks the Devil what's up?

The Devil says, ""Things are great down here since you sent us an engineer.""

""What?"" says God. ""An engineer? I didn't send you one of those. That must have been a mistake. Send him upstairs immediately.""

The Devil responds, ""No way. We want to keep our engineer. We like him.""

God demands, ""If you don't send him to me immediately, I'll sue!""

The Devil laughs. ""Where are YOU going to get a lawyer?"""
"Just after Neil Armstrong walks on the moon, and said the famous quote ""one small step...",0,"Just before he re-entered the lander to come back to Earth, he made an remark that no one really understood at the time  --- ""Good luck Mr. Gorsky.""

Many people though perhaps Gorsky might have been an old friend or mentor from either the Russian or American space programs, but no records of that name were found &amp; Neil never revealed who he was.  Years later after Neil found out that Mr. Gorsky had died, he felt he could finally answer the question.

When he was a kid, Neil was playing baseball with a friend in the backyard. His friend hit a ball which landed in front of his neighbor's bedroom window. His neighbors were Mr. and Mrs. Gorksy. As he leaned down to pick it up, young Armstrong heard Mrs. Gorsky shouting at Mr. Gorsky. ""Oral sex! You want oral sex?! You'll get oral sex when the kid next door walks on the moon!""

\--- ""Good luck Mr. Gorsky."""
Have you ever smelled moth balls?,0,How did you get their little legs apart?
Plant based cure for COVID-19,0,Plant your butt at home
What borders on stupidity?,0,Canada and Mexico.
Never have I had to cough so bad than standing in a line during pandemic.,0,[removed]
My neighbor asked me (IT Support) how to fix his leaky faucet. Not being a plumber I offered the only advise I have:,0,"""Have you tried turning it on and back off again?"""
A little girl went to her Grandfather ...,0,"A little girl went to her grandfather, who was working in the yard, and asked him,""Grandpa, what's a couple sex?""

The grandfather was surprised that she would ask such a question, but decided that if she's old enough to know to ask, then she's old enough to get a straight answer.

Steeling himself to leave nothing out, he proceeded to tell her all about human reproduction and the joys and responsibilities that go along with it.

When he finished explaining, the little girl was looking at him with her mouth hanging open, eyes wide in amazement. 
Seeing the look on her face the grandfather asked her, ""Why did you ask this question, honey?""

The little girl replied, ""Well, Grandma says to tell you that dinner will be ready in a couple secs."""
What did the Chinese man say when asked if he would captain the crew team with his best friend?,0,You had me at he'll row.
My wife is amazing she just surprised me with a $250k life insurance policy and a trip to china....,0,[removed]
I had to turn to Google for help with a crossword puzzle.,0,"I had to turn to Google for help with a crossword puzzle. The clue was ""Dishonestly gaining a advantage,"" eight letters.

I immediately felt bad for looking it up, that was cheating."
"An English test question asked us to use the word ""horticulture"" in a sentence.",0,"I wrote, ""You can lead a horticulture but you can't make her think."""
Why did the crumb cake isolate him self?,0,He had a crumbling social life
6 life lessons,0,"6 life lessons

**Lesson 1:**

A man is getting into the shower just as his wife is finishing up her shower when the doorbell rings. The wife quickly wraps herself in a towel and runs downstairs. When she opens the door, there stands Bob, the next door neighbour. Before she says a word, Bob says, “I’ll give you $800 to drop that towel.” After thinking for a moment, the woman drops her towel and stands naked in front of Bob.

After a few seconds, Bob hands her $800 dollars and leaves. The woman wraps back up in the towel and goes back upstairs. When she gets to the bathroom, her husband asks,…

“Who was that?” “It was Bob the next door neighbour,” she replies. “Great!” the husband says, “Did he say anything about the $800 he owes me?”

**Moral of the story:**

If you share critical information pertaining to credit and risk with your shareholders in time, you may be in a position to prevent avoidable exposure.

**Lesson 2:**

A sales rep, an administration clerk, and the manager are walking to lunch when they find an antique oil lamp. They rub it and a Genie comes out. The Genie says, “I’ll give each of you just one wish” “Me first! Me first!” says the administration clerk. “I want to be in the Bahamas, driving a speedboat, without a care in the world.” Poof! She’s gone. “Me next! Me next!” says the sales rep. “I want to be in Hawaii, relaxing on the beach with my personal masseuse, an endless supply of Pina Coladas and the love of my life.” Poof! He’s gone. “OK, you’re up,” the Genie says to the manager. The manager says, “I want those two back in the office after lunch.”

**Moral of the story:**

Always let your boss have the first say

**Lesson 3:**

A priest offered a lift to a Nun. She got in and crossed her legs, forcing her gown to reveal a leg. The priest nearly had an accident. After controlling the car, he stealthily slid his hand up her leg. The nun said,”Father, remember Psalm 129?” The priest removed his hand. But, changing gears, he let his hand slide up her leg again. The nun once again said, “Father, remember Psalm 129?” The priest apologized “Sorry sister but the flesh is weak.” Arriving at the convent, the nun went on her way. On his arrival at the church, the priest rushed to look up Psalm 129. It said, “Go forth and seek, further up, you will find glory.”

**Moral of the story:**

If you are not well informed in your job, you might miss a great opportunity

**Lesson 4**

A crow was sitting on a tree, doing nothing all day. A rabbit asked him, ”Can I also sit like you and do nothing all day long?” The crow answered: “Sure, why not.” So, the rabbit sat on the ground below the crow, and rested.

A fox jumped on the rabbit and ate it.

**Moral of the story:**

To be sitting and doing nothing, you must be sitting very high up

**Lesson 5:**

Power of Charisma

A turkey was chatting with a bull “I would love to be able to get to the top of that tree,” sighed the turkey, but I haven’t got the energy.” “Well, why don’t you nibble on my droppings?” replied the bull. “They’re packed with nutrients.” The turkey pecked at a lump of dung and found that it gave him enough strength to reach the lowest branch of the tree. The next day, after eating some more dung, he reached the second branch. Finally after a fourth night, there he was proudly perched at the top of the tree. Soon he was spotted by a farmer, who shot the turkey out of the tree.

**Moral of the story:**

Bullshit might get you to the top, but it wont keep you there

**Lesson 6**

A little bird was flying south for the winter. It was so cold the bird froze and fell to the ground into a large field. While he was lying there, a cow came by and dropped some dung on him. As the frozen bird lay there in the pile of cow dung, he began to realize how warm he was. The dung was actually thawing him out! He lay there all warm and happy, and soon began to sing for joy. A passing cat heard the bird singing and came to investigate. Following the sound, the cat discovered the bird under the pile of cow dung, and promptly dug him out and ate him.

**Moral of the story:**

1. Not everyone who shits on you is your enemy
2. Not everyone who gets you out of shit is your friend
3. And when you’re in deep shit, it’s best to keep your mouth shut!"
"Rick Astley will let you borrow any movie from his Pixar collection, except one...",0,He’s never going to give you Up.
NoFap is bullshit,0,I just came here to warn you
What do a nearsighted gynecologist and a puppy have in common?,0, A wet nose.
A Sargent scolded a soldier for not being in camouflage training,0,The soldier thanked him
What is the opposite of vegan?,0,Wu🇬an
99.9% of people are idiots.,0,"Fortunately, I belong to the 1% of smart people"
I'm thinking about selling my theremin.,0,I haven't touched it in years
How do you call a yogurt that you eat while running?,0,Joggurt.
Dove makes both chocolate bars and soap,0,"There’s a joke there, I’m just not sure what it is"
I was mistakenly put in a female prison.,0,... Its was a nicholas cage
Stupid one liners everyone should know,0,I'll start: I recently sold my vaccum. It was only gathering dust.
A mood off person have taken constipation tablets for fun..,0,[removed]
I wonder what will happen in 2022,0,because 2022 is 2020 too...
Started smoking for this girl who told me she was into people with cancer,0,Turns out she was talking about zodiacs. Anyway I've got three months to live.
Did you know you can't run through a campground?,0,You can only ran... 'cause it's past tents.
"If School was a game, what would the loading tips be?",0,Press X to Reload
"A lady had lost her husband almost four years ago. Her daughter was constantly calling her to get back into the dating world. Finally, she said she'd go out, but didn't know anyone. Her daughter immediately replied, ""Mom, I have someone for you to meet!""",0,"Well, it was an immediate hit.

They took to one another and after dating for six weeks, he asked her to join him for a weekend in Spain.

Their first night there, she undressed as he did.

There she stood nude, except for a pair of black panties, he in his birthday suit.

Looking her over, he asked, ""Why the black panties?""

She replied ""My breasts you can fondle, my body is yours to explore, but down there I am still mourning.""

He knew he was not going to get lucky that night.

The following night was the same, she stood there wearing the black panties and he was in his birthday suit but now he was wearing a black condom.

She looked at him and asked, ""What's with the black condom?""

He replied, ""I want to offer my deepest condolences."""
Women are like Hurricanes,0,They come into your life wild and free and then leave with the PATIO FURNITURE WE BOUGHT TOGETHER SARAH YOU BITCH
Oh well,0,"A mother is in the kitchen making dinner for her family when her daughter walks in. “Mother, where do babies come from?” The mother thinks for a few seconds and says, “Well dear, Mommy and Daddy fall in love and get married. One night they go into their bedroom, they kiss and hug, and have sex.” The daughter looks puzzled so the mother continues, “That means the daddy puts his penis in the mommy’s vagina. That’s how you get a baby, honey.” The child seems to comprehend. “Oh, I see, but the other night when I came into your room you had daddy’s penis in your mouth. What do you get when you do that?” “Jewelry, my dear. Jewelry.”"
That's why yo mama dead,0,Dead as hell
"Technically, we all die in 2 minutes",0,But with every breath you set the timer to zero
My wife farted.,0,"I ignored. 

She did it again.

This time I told her"" First you get done with this fart thing of yours then we'll continue anal""."
I don't believe Santa only comes once a year.,0,With all those kids sitting on his lap.
Why is Santa's sack so big?,0,He only comes once a year
"Johny Johny, yes baby",0,"Feeling horny? No baby
Telling lies? No baby
Open your pants? Ah ah ah..."
What did the boyfriend magnet say to the girlfriend magnet?,0,[removed]
What do 9 out of 10 people enjoy?,0,"What do 9 out of 10 people enjoy?


.........Gang rape!"
What did God say after he created the Japanese?,0,Ramen.
"Einstein ordered a chicken and an egg simultaneously from Alpha-Centauri, the nearest Galaxy to ours. Because of the difference in mass, the egg is scheduled to arrive on Earth 300,000 years before the chicken. So. Which will come first, the chicken or the egg, if they both have no mass at all?",0,Neither. Ain't nobody got time for this shit.
"Life hack! In case your kids paint the walls and furniture with markers, you can easily clear them using their tears",0,[removed]
A British guy finished a day of work,0,He was completely londone
Would you like to hear some jokes about my butt?,0,I have piles.
"The lockdown sucks for everyone, but it’s worse for us men.",0,We're losing $1 for every $.79 women are losing.
How did the mallard get to the UFO?,0,It was abduckted
What’s the difference between jelly and jam?,0,You can’t jelly your dick in someone’s asshole.
Why does a mermaid wear sea shells?,0,She outgrew her B shells
Haitian guy on vacation,0,[removed]
What turned laughter to murder?,0,The S
What's the difference between sex and the Corona virus?,0,I have the Corona virus.
What’s the hardest thing for an alcoholic law student to do?,0,Pass the bar
What's the difference between Corona Virus and sex?,0,Most Redditors lack the social skills to get both.
What happens when a frogs car breaks down?,0,It gets toad
What's Carol Baskin's favorite dating app?,0,Grindr
"After dying in a car wreck, an atheist meets God.",0,Neither one of them are pleased.
T sho,0,[removed]
What’s red and bad for your teeth?,0,[removed]
is butt cheeks one word...,0,or do you spread them apart?
My girlfriend was born on a leap year so she is technically 4,0,And 1 in leap years
Beethoven,0,[removed]
Don't have sex with prostitutes.,0,[deleted]
"NSFW: you could build a thousand bridges, but you will never be called a bridge builder",0,But suck just one cock...
What do you call a cow with no legs?,0,Ground Beef
A slice of apple pie is $2.50 in Jamaica and $3.00 in the Bahamas. These are the pie rates of the Caribbean.,0,[removed]
A family is at the dinner table...,0,"The son asks the father, “Dad, how many kinds of boobs are there?” The father, surprised, answers, “Well, son, a woman goes through three phases. In her 20s, a woman’s breasts are like melons, round and firm. In her 30s and 40s, they are like pears, still nice, hanging a bit. After 50, they are like onions.” “Onions?” the son asks. “Yes. You see them and they make you cry.” This infuriated his wife and daughter. The daughter asks, “Mom, how many different kinds of willies are there?” The mother smiles and says, “Well, dear, a man goes through three phases also. In his 20s, his willy is like an oak tree, mighty and hard. In his 30s and 40s, it’s like a birch, flexible but reliable. After his 50s, it’s like a Christmas tree.” “A Christmas tree?” the daughter asks. “Yes, dead from the root up and the balls are just for decoration.”"
What do you call it when a DJ has a heart-attack?,0,[deleted]
Italian spelling,0,"The bus stops and 2 Italian men get on.
They sit down and engage in an animated conversation.
An old lady who is sitting next to them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of them say the following:
“Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more. Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time.”
“You foul-mouthed sex obsessed swine,” retorted the old lady indignantly
“In this country. we don’t speak aloud in public places about our sex lives. “
“Hey, coola downa old lady,” said the man.
“Who talkin’ abouta sex? I’m a justa tellin’ my frienda here how to spella “Mississippi’.”"
"Teenage boy: ""Dad, what's a vagina look like?""",0,"Father: ""Well son, before sex it's a delicate little thing. Almost like a tulip that hasn't fully bloomed"".

Boy: ""What about after sex?""

Father: ""You ever seen a bulldog eating mayonnaise?"""
I asked my bicycle to take me for a ride ...,0,... but it was two tired.
The Power of Words,0,"A soldier in the trenches of WWI had lost his rifle in a previous battle. His sergeant ordered his troops to attack. He didn't move. The sargeant screamed at his soldier. The soldier said, ""Sarge! I lost my rifle in the last battle."" Sarge looks around and finds a wicker broom. He says, ""Point this at the enemy and and say Bangity. Bangity. Bangity!"" The soldier, befuddled, responds, ""Sir! But what if that doesn't work?"" The sargeant plucked a string off the broom and twist tied it to the handle. ""There. Now you have a bayonet. If the enemy gets close just yell Stabbity. Stabbity. Stabbity!"". The soldier still perplexed ventured onto the battlefield nonetheless. He saw his enemy on the horizon and began shouting ""Bangity! Bangity! Bangity!"" To his surprise the enemy was dropping like flies. Except for one. They kept coming. Getting closer and closer. Once the enemy was right upon the soldier he began jabbing his wicker bayonet screaming, ""Stabbity! Stabbity! Stabbity!"". But to no avail. The enemy rolled right over the soldier crushing every bone in his body and pressing him deep into the soil. As the enemy passed over him he could hear them saying, ""Tankity! Tankity! Tankity!"""
My mom dropped this one on me,0,"Mom and I, her 27-year-old son, had had an argument about my clothes. She pointed to a hole in my shirt and said, ""There's a big hole in your shirt!""

I answered, ""Yes? Well there is a big hole in your face and dumb things keep coming out of it,"" pointing to his mouth.Without a pause, she snaps back, ""Not nearly as dumb as the thing that fell out of my other hole 27 years ago."""
If you are sad that you can't spend 4/20 with your friends,0,Just wait till 4/22 cause 4/22 is 4/20 too
I've been nominated for president of the flat-earth society.,0,Not sure if I should feel flattered or if this is going to have a flipside.
My girlfriend is like the coronavirus,0,[deleted]
A horse walks into a bar...,0,"Bartender: Hey.

Horse: Yes, please."
How do you get rid of the horny?,0,[deleted]
String vs bartender,0,"A string walks into a bar bartender yells at him “we don’t serve your kind here” So the string walks out of the bar, bends over, mess up his hair, and walks back into the bar bartender asked him “ aren’t you that string I threw out earlier” string looks at him and says “No I’m a frayed knot"
My boyfriend is 8 because he was born on a leap year.,0,He turned 2 in leap years last week!
A circle trying to convince a deadbeat dad to attend his son’s game:,0,"“Sir, come for Ence.”"
How does PETA support animals that have been hurt?,0,By unplugging their life support so they can sing for them.
A pirate walks into a bar with a wheel in his crotch and the bartender asks what's the deal and.....,0,[removed]
A superlative walks into a bar none,0,[removed]
I was going to post a time-travel joke...,0,But you guys didn't like it
Where do fish get their sports apparel?,0,FINish Line
In other news Nabisco has announced to its stockholders that it is diversifying into the automotive industry.,0,They are now the primary producers of airbags for vehicles made in the US.
What became of the Megaconda when it died?,0,*Hssss*tory.
What do you call a famous dog who can play the piano,0,Beethoven
What do you call the greatest vaporised boxer of all time?,0,Gaseous Clay
If Michael Myers chased the same bitch for 40 years,0,[removed]
How many babies does it take to change a lightbulb?,0,At least 6 because my basements still dark
The only time I am attractive,0,Is when I am holding a magnet.
I can't understand the jokes any more,0,[removed]
Why did the alcoholic become a comedian?,0,[deleted]
I heard they were making a movie about constipation,0,[removed]
Due to quarantine,0,[deleted]
What's the last thing to pass through a fly's head as it hits the windshield of a speeding car?,0,It's ass.
My wife spreads joy and happiness to everyone she meets,0,[deleted]
Even people who are good for nothing have the capacity to bring a smile to your face.,0,[removed]
My grandmother always use to say “the fastest way to a man’s heart is through the stomach”,0,She was a terrible surgeon.
A guy walks into a bar.,0,[removed]
Childhood fight!,0,[removed]
British people be like: I'm bri ish,0,Hiding the T from Americans ever since Boston tea party
"North Korea’s leader has been suspiciously absent, arousing concerns from his followers who all wonder...",0,...Is Kim Jong ill?
And the award for best neckwear goes to...,0,"...well would you look at that, it's a tie."
Whats the difference between america and a jogurt,0,[removed]
A wife asks a husband: is there a dream or aspiration that you gave up on when you decided to settle down and start a family?,0,"Husband: well I had thought about getting multiple degrees, passing the bar, and becoming the single greatest lawyer in southern California!

Wife: Uhh, honey, you DID all of those things. I am so proud! 

Husband: Sorry, I meant ""greatest single lawyer"""
A wife asks a husband: What is one dream you gave up on when you decided to settle down and start a family with me?,0,[deleted]
Does anyone sleep with their cat without their clothes on?,0,I'm sure there is bound to be someone who can't afford a collar for their cat after all.
My teacher said meditation is all about accepting and acknowledging the thoughts that comes into my mind,0,[deleted]
I'm addicted to drinking brake fluid. I drink a fashion per day.,0,[deleted]
Mom and son,0,[removed]
"To everyone who doesn’t understand this meme and isn’t staying home,",0,[removed]
The most annoying part about having my wife and daughter constantly wear a burkha:,0,"The most annoying part about having my wife and daughter constantly wear a burkha is the confusion. 

Last night, I accidentally slept with my wife."
Darth Vader built an entire Galactic Empire...,0,"Wearing protective gear in sanitary environment.

But it was all destroyed by a whiny brat without a mask who refused to stay home with his aunt and uncle."
What do you call a cow that's masturbating?,0,[removed]
Alex Jones was right,0,it really IS a **prisonplanet** we're living on
At 18 a woman is like Africa,0,"At 18 a woman is like Africa, wild and untamed. 

At 28 a woman is like Asia, exotic and beautiful. 

At 38 a woman is like America, flourishing and in the prime of life.

At 48 a woman is like Europe, exhausted but still has points of interest. 

At 58 a woman is like Australia, everyone knows it's down there but nobody gives a damn."
What is the difference between roast beef and pea soup?,0,[removed]
Court Ruling from the UK,0,[removed]
Two girls went out on a night out,0,[removed]
"A young man married a beautiful woman who had previously divorced 10 husbands. On their wedding night, she told her new husband to ""Please be gentle; I'm still a Virgin"".",0,[removed]
I saw a bunch of insect larva on my porch,0,You've got to bee kidding me!
Where are the Arnold Schwarzenegger action figures?,0,"Aisle B, back"
What did the body say to the immune system when it got a butt infection?,0,[deleted]
What do you call religious male boobs that eats it's partner after sex?,0,Praying man-tits.
I just flew in from China,0,[deleted]
What do you tell a man with two black eyes?,0,[removed]
I rolled a rug into a long tube for my cat to play in...,0,[removed]
Why did the shop owner ban me from his store when I brought 10 dead deers to his shop?,0,He said the item would cost 10 bucks.
Whats one black person on the moon called?,0,[deleted]
What do Korean web designers specialize in?,0,[removed]
Quintin Tarantino changed his name,0,[deleted]
What do Blondes say right after sex?,0,"Thanks, Guys"
A blonde tried to rob a bank,0,It failed miserably when she tied up the safe and decided to blow the guards.
Why did the blind man fall into the well?,0,He couldn't see that well
"When NASA was preparing for the Apollo project, some of the training of the astronauts took place on a Navajo reservation.",0,"One day, a Navajo elder and his son were herding sheep and came across the space crew. The old man, who spoke only Navajo, asked a question that his son translated. ""What are these guys in the big suits doing?""
A member of the crew said they were practicing for their trip to the moon. The old man got all excited and asked if he could send a message to the moon with the astronauts. Recognizing a promotional opportunity, the NASA folks found a tape recorder.
After the old man recorded his message, they asked his son to translate it. He refused. The NASA PR people brought the tape to the reservation, where the rest of the tribe listened and laughed, but refused to translate the elder's message.
Finally, the NASA crew called in an official government translator. His translation of the old man's message was: ""Watch out for these guys; they have come to steal your land."""
God said to John come fourth and you shall be granted eternal life.....,0,[removed]
(NSFW) Whats the similarity with a hand wash and sex with me?,0,20 seconds is a good performance
What did Santa say when Rudolph farts?,0,[deleted]
"I was walking past a homeless guy when he yelled, ""Stephen King is my older brother and he stole the ideas for all his novels from me!"" - I said, ""Surely you must be Joe.""",0,[removed]
I made a graph showing my past relationships,0,It has an ex-axis and a why-axis
"The only thing flat-earthers fear, is..",0,Sphere itself.
My girlfriend told me to stop being a flamingo.,0,[removed]
A limbo champion walks into a bar.,0,[removed]
I broke one of my fingers at work today.,0,[removed]
A kiss can make your day,0,[removed]
Joke for hard of hearing.,0,[removed]
What's the difference between a hippo and a zippo?,0,"One is really heavy, and the other is a little lighter."
How many Democrats does it take to change a lightbulb?,0, None. They only *talk* about change
Why are there two “d”s in “Reddit”?,0,The second one’s a repost.
what's the most religious insect?,0,[deleted]
Why will the congress never impeach Trump?,0,[deleted]
"With all of the golfing Trump does, I wondered what his handicap is...",0,[deleted]
The president's name and signature will now be added to .....,0,[removed]
"My girlfriend borrowed $100 from me. After 3years, when we separated, she returned exactly $100.",0, I lost Interest in that relationship.
So the waiter asked me what I would like as a side dish...,0,"I told her to recommend me a side dish as I had never been to the restaurant before.

She told me they had curried rice, potato wedges or a supersalad.

I told her I'd like the supersalad. She gave me a strange look and asked me the same question again.

I tell her yes, that I would like the supersalad.

She goes to the kitchen and I tell my date I wonder what this super salad was. Maybe it was a giant salad or something really extra.

10 minutes later she comes out with our order and gives me my main and on the side she places a salad with a soup. I thank her and she walks away.

I take a look at my side and wonder what this restaurants cooks are doing. So I pour the soup into the salad like if it was a ranch dressing. I start eating it like if it was any other salad and it was surprisingly decent.

So we finish our meals and go to pay. As I walk out I see every waiter just give me a look and I wonder what I did. I shrug it off and get into the car with my date and go home.

after 5 minutes in the car, my date tells me, ""Hey, I think that waiter back in the restaurant asked you if you wanted a soup or a salad. not a supersalad"""
How do you steal a coat?,0,You jacket
What does an arms dealer Say?,0,Can i give you a hand
It is WWI. The Germans and the Italians are fighting in trenches.,0,"The Germans have a plan. Since almost all Italians are named Mario, a German would yell, ""Hey, Mario!"" An unfortunate Mario would pop his head up with ""si?"" and a German sniper would put a bullet into his forehead. Every day, a few Italians died with ""Hey Mario!"" ""Si?"" Boom!

One day, the Italians decide to reciprocate. One of them yells, ""Hey-a, Fritz!"" No reply. ""Fritz!"" Nothing. ""Hey-a, Fritz!"" ""Is that you, Mario?"" ""Si!"" Boom!"
A big porcelain basin was demanding entry to our house.,0,Let that sink in.
How did Michael Jackson pick his nose?,0,[deleted]
Funniest video ever,0,[removed]
What's more fun than throwing a baby off a skyscraper?,0,[removed]
What's the difference between a baby and a washing machine?,0,[removed]
You and a girl go on a date.,0,[removed]
"If Americans raid Area 51, then Europeans should try for Vatican.",0,"Americans will get the aliens, others will get the predators."
What's the difference between the Alien saga and Christianity?,0,[deleted]
I love my new indestructible walls,0,"I am thirsty

&amp;#x200B;

I just wish I had some kool-aid right now 

&amp;#x200B;

\*audible thud outside the house\*

&amp;#x200B;

what was that?"
Who is the head of the pasta crime family?,0,Rigatoni Soprano!
How do you defeat an Ent?,0,[removed]
"So there I was, with a plantain 3/4 up my butthole....",0,[removed]
Breaking News,0,Depressed Pigeon misses shitting on people.
what do you say to someone who doesn't understand english?,0,[removed]
"Eric Rudolph, formerly Hide &amp; Seek Champ, is now also Social Distancing Champ.",0,[removed]
Just ordered $1200 in dildos,0,These stimulus checks are more stimulating than expected to say the least.
What is the most expensive haircut you can get?,0,[removed]
They told me I wouldn't be any good at poetry because I was dyslexic,0,But so far I've made 3 jugs and a vase and they're lovely
I've been trying unsuccessfully to move air around my apartment all day,0,"I gotta say, I'm not a fan"
I tried to tell a sheepdog a joke,0,[deleted]
I tried to think of a joke but then noticed biggest joke is in the mirror,0,[removed]
"I know understand why Americans spell aluminium, aeroplane and colour different to the British...",0,They were saving up to give the WHO an I.O.U
What do you call a gay chickpea?,0,A hommusexual
An Israeli businessman accidentally sleeps through his alarm one morning.,0,"Feeling the panic of waking up late, he throws on his suit as quickly as he can and rushes out the door to drive to work. As he begins the commute through the Tel Aviv rush hour traffic, he painfully watches the clock as his meeting starts without him. 

Finally he pulls into his parking lot, fearing how much trouble he will be in, and he cannot for the life of him find a parking spot. After endlessly searching, in his desperation he stops his car and looks up towards the heavens and pleads, “Dear God, if you please just give me a parking spot I promise I will go to synagogue every week, and I will only eat kosher, and I’ll follow all the 10 commandments, just PLEASE give me a spot so I don’t lose my job!”

Miraculously, a parking spot opens up right by the front of the building. He looks back up to the heavens and says, “never mind I just found one!”"
Why doesn't the Doomslayer have PTSD from all the demon fighting?,0,You cannot get PTSD if you ARE the traumatic event
"To keep my cat entertained indoors, I rolled a rug into a tube for her to play in.",0,"She loved it at first - repeatedly crouching and stalking through it, but after a while, she started limping a bit.   The vet said it might be 'carpet-tunnel syndrome'."
A man walks into a doctors office wearing nothing but clingfilm.,0,"The doctor says ""I can clearly see your nuts"""
"Son: ""Mom, Dad, I'm gay.""",0,"Mom: *Stares at Dad*

Dad: *Clenches fist*

Mom: ""Don't!""

Dad: *Sweats Profusely*

Mom: ""...""

Dad: ""HI GAY, I'M DAD"""
Ok Dad...,0,[deleted]
What do gay horses eat?,0,Hay hay hay!
So I got fired for sticking my dick in a pickle slicer,0,[deleted]
An experimental drug called Remdesivir showed positive results against Covid-19 in Chicago study. Gilead Science stock price is skyrocketing.,0,"Shady Drugmakers are already trying to take advantage of the great news and make huge profits by rushing unproven generic versions to market first.

...for very advanced cases, they're trying to market ""dam-dat-sevir"".  

...for patients on ventilators and can't swallow a pill, they have a suppository version ""ram-dis-inrir"""
I went out for a walk and saw a face mask grow bigger and bigger,0,Then it hit me...lesson learned
Papi,0,[removed]
The shortest math joke,0," 

# Ɛ &lt; 0"
There was a priest and a teacher in a burning school,0,"Teacher: We've got to get out of here!
Priest: What about the kids!?
Teacher: Fuck the kids!
Priest: You think we got time?"
A guy walks into a bar...,0,Lucky Bastard
"A man returns from the doctor and tells his wife that the doctor has told him he has only 24 hours to live. Given this prognosis, the man asks his wife for sex, so naturally, she agrees and they make love. About six hours later, the husband goes to his wife and says...",0,"""Honey, you know I now have only 18 hours to live. Could we please do it one more time?""


Of course, the wife agrees and they do it again.

Later, as the man gets into bed, he looks at his watch and realizes that he now has only 8 hours left.

He touches his wife shoulder and asks, ""Honey, please...just one more time, before I die.""

She says, ""Of course, dear."" and they make love for the third time.

After this session, the wife rolls over and falls asleep.

The man, however, worried about his impending death, tosses and turns, until he's down to 4 more hours.

He taps his wife, who rouses.

""Honey, I have only 4 more hours. Do you think we could...""

At this point, the wife sits up and screams, ""Listen, I have to get up in the morning...YOU DON’T!!!"""
"“Hey Dad, have you seen my sunglasses?”",0,"“No son, have you seen my dad glasses?”"
Women love a silver medalist,0,They always come second
I told a Chemistry Joke to a class.,0,"But the students were so dumb, I saw no reaction."
A woman gets on a bus holding her baby.,0,"Bus driver sees the baby and immediately goes “Ah!  That is the ugliest baby I’ve ever seen!” The bus riders, catching a glimpse of the child, all gasp in horror. Distraught, the woman gets off the bus, sobbing. 
“My baby can’t be that ugly...” she thinks to herself. An elderly woman carrying a small bag of groceries is walking by, and notices the woman, crying on the bench. 
The old woman walk up and says “Oh, hunny.  Rough day huh?”
“Oh yeah, the world can just be so cruel!”
“Oh dear, don’t worry, it’ll all turn out okay. Here take a biscuit for your cute little doggy too!”"
A man and a woman are sitting at a bar. They hadn't previously met.,0,"At the other end of the bar a rather attractive woman arrives and sits down.  

The woman at the bar turns to the man, motions to the newly arrived woman and says ""See that woman over there? I want to strip her naked, suckle on her breasts, lick her out until she's dry. And yes, I'm a lesbian.""  

The man looks a bit surprised, so the woman asks him ""Are you shocked?""  

""I certainly am,"" said the man, ""I think I must be a lesbian too!"""
How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?,0,I'll change that for you love. Dont you worry your pretty little head about it!
Why didn't the autistic kid enjoy the magic show at his birthday party?,0,Because magic fukin sux!
What's the difference between raping and rapping?,0," One's mostly done by criminals in shady neighborhoods, and the other is sex without consent."
My girlfriend has a twin. Two days ago they changed when we went to bed...,0,And now I need to buy 2 birthday gifts! That is not fair.
Once my dog ate all the Scrabble tiles,0,[removed]
What's the difference between a Dutchman and a coconut?,0,You can get a free drink out of a coconut.
How do Asian lumberjacks feed their families?,0,[deleted]
My girlfriend left me because she couldn't handle my OCD.,0,I told her to close the door five times on her way out.
Why is Oedipus against profanity?,0,Because he kissed his mother with that mouth
A man decides to buy a car...,0,"So he goes to a car dealership.

The salesman says, ""What kind of car are you looking for?""

""I want something fast,"" says the man.

So the salesman shows him some models.

""No, faster than that,"" says the man.

So the salesman shows him some more models.

""No, no, faster than that,"" urges the man.

The salesman is getting frustrated and running out of models that could work, so he says, ""Sir, are you looking for a racecar?""

""What kind of race do you mean?""

""Oh, any you like, sir.""

The man puzzles over this for a moment. ""Alright,"" he says. ""What are the fastest Mexican cars you have?""

""Sir, I don't like what you're insinuating,"" says the salesman. ""I'm going to have to ask you to leave.""

""Fine!"" says the man. ""You're no help anyway. I'll look for a fast car somewhere else.""

The salesman turns to a coworker, who'd been listening in. ""I think that man is racist.""

""Yeah,"" says the coworker. ""Everyone knows it's Germans who make the fastest cars!"""
What’s a pedophile’s favorite key of music?,0,[removed]
Whose dick will grow longer if he lies?,0,PPnochio
What happens if you put poop and lice together,0,[removed]
If you put together poop and head lice you get,0,[deleted]
Why did the really lazy and unethical man not want to be cured by the genie?,0,[removed]
What is the object of American football played by really cheap people?,0,Get the quarter back.
Why do really cheap women like their men circumcised?,0,"Because she is so cheap that she thinks that a circumcised penis means she is getting a bargain.  But she is wrong because the 5 percent is off the length, not the price."
"Respect has nothing to do with age son,",0,But your obviously to young to understand that.
This morning I was beaten up by a busty woman in an elevator.,0,"I was staring at her boobs and she said ""Press One?"" So I did... I don't remember much after that."
What kind of biscuits fly?,0,The plain ones
What was the Klansman hoarding at the grocery store?,0,White flour!
Hear any good jokes lately?,0,Just gender equality.
Why did the woman with a lisp keep getting showered in fake leather?,0,[deleted]
Why was the antivaxers 5 year old son so sad?,0,He was having a mid-life-crisis.
It’s dark and screaming,0,Stevie Wonder answering the iron.
Ultimate Jewish Dilemma,0,[removed]
I was fucking a nun in an elevator...,0,It was wrong on so many levels.
"The Texas Department of Transportation (TxDOT) found over 200 dead crows on Highway 281 this past week, and there was concern that they may have died from the Coronavirus.",0,"A veterinary epidemiologist examined the remains of all the crows, and, to everyone's relief, confirmed the problem was NOT Coronavirus (COVID-19). 

The cause of death was actually from vehicular impacts. However, during analysis it was noted that varying colors of paints appeared on the bird's beaks and claws. By analyzing these paint residues it was found that 98% of the crows had been killed by impact with motorcycles, while only 2% were killed by cars.

TxDOT then hired an Ornithological Behaviorist to determine if there was a cause for the disproportionate percentages of motorcycle kills versus car kills. 

The Ornithological Behaviorist quickly concluded that when crows eat road kill, they always have a look-out crow to warn of danger. 

They discovered that while all the lookout crows could shout ""Cah"", not a single one could shout ""bike""!!!"
Love Marriage Specialist Astrologer in India,0,[removed]
What's the difference between Britney Spears and a woman who faces physical abuse?,0,One likes to sing 'Hit Me Baby One More Time'
What do Canadians call a Kumon teacher in Japan?,0,"It's common-sense, eh?"
What do you call a dog that does magic tricks?,0,A labracadabrador
Compared to the trillions in big bailouts...,0,We are all just getting Trump change.
I walked in on my two Jesus clones having sex with each other today.,0,"""Jesus fucking christ"" , I exclaimed."
What do you do if you don’t want to talk to a chicken?,0,"Egg-nore it.

Stolen from my 8 year old."
2019 : no one bats an eye at bat eaters 2020 : no one eyes a bat,0,[removed]
I called my mother an elephant when I was a child,0,She never forgot
A horse walking into a bar,0,"- Why the long face?, said the bartender
- I am a giraffe, you horsist"
What’s the difference between a Cactus and Congress?,0,"On a cactus, all the pricks are on the outside."
A woman visits a florist to get some flowers for her mother.,0,[deleted]
City slicker moves to a house in the country side,0,"One day his farmer neighbor comes to greet him. Farmer says ""hey we're having a hell of party at my place tonight. Gonna be a little drinkin, a little fightin, and a little fuckin...'"" City slicker says ""Hell, sounds like my kind of party! What time should I show up?!"" And the farmer says ""Oh don't matter, it's just the two of us""."
A man dies and goes to the Pearly Gates.,0,"When he gets there, he is perplexed and confused to see everyone aggressively whipping eggs, and mixing flour and batter.  


He looks around and finds an entire section specially reserved for decoration, with elaborate arrangements of strawberries, frosting and tiering that would have done any architect or baker proud.  


Finally, she recoginizes an ascetic woman who seems to be in charge of the melee. He goes over and asks her, ""What is happening here?""  


The woman, graceful as ever, replies that everyone is trying to do their best to improve their souls. Not quite understanding the cryptic message and curious about the charming woman's traditional Mongolian garb, the man asks her to explain further.  


The monk replies, ""My dear, having cake is the best way to gain karma."""
Wanna hear a joke ?,0,[removed]
What do you call two Mexicans playing basketball?,0,[removed]
What do you call a fish with no eye,0,A blind fish
I made a new android app that has ALOT of funny jokes! download from the link below,0,[removed]
Why am I seeing so many,0,[removed]
What do you do if your wife starts smoking?,0,[removed]
My 11 year old brother told me this joke,0,[removed]
"My friend met a witch, who gave him a new penis, which was 10 centimeters bigger than his old one.",0,"- in exchange for a 10 % deduction of his IQ. My friend then asked me, if I wanted the same deal, but I declined, as I figured, I would become so dumb, that I would do it again"
Asian couple gets married.....,0,[removed]
I always liked those spice girls back in the 90s. What where their names again?,0,"Oh yeah, Salt-N-Pepa"
"One day, Bane is bench pressing 265lbs for reps when Batman walks in",0,"""That's quite a heavy weight, Bane,"" Batman says.

""For you,"" Bane replies."
What did true say to false?,0,Stop boolean me
What do you call it when there are too many Muppets on Sesame Street?,0,Groverflow
I spilled some pickle juice on my right pant leg. But don't worry...,0,"I immediately self-isolated my pants,  washed them with soap and hot water for 20 seconds and I have been social distancing from my pants ever since."
God decided to make a donkey,0,"First he made a pair of donkey-eye-shaped eyes. Then he added a long face, long ears. He took a break, added a torso, long legs (four of them, the two hind legs fortified for kicking), a tail. He added hooves and hair, eyelashes, ear fuzz.

He gave the donkey a strong sense of self-preservation.

He made the donkey's heart, his kidneys. He made lungs. 

He made the mouth, the teeth, the tongue, alimentary canal, intestines... he worked hard all day, and finally, he decided that after this one thing, his creation would be finished

&amp;#x200B;

and he made the asshole."
So my girlfriend farted...,0,"And she said, we've got to get Trump on the line, I'm Pootin."
Harold is 95 and lives in a senior citizen home.,0,"Every night after dinner, Harold goes to a secluded garden behind the Center to sit and ponder his accomplishments and long life.

One evening, Mildred, age 87, wanders into the garden. They begin to chat and before they know it, several hours have passed. After a short lull in their conversation, Harold turns to Mildred and asks, 'Do you know what I miss most of all?'

She asks, 'What?'

'Sex!!' he replies Mildred exclaims, 'Why you old fart. You couldn't get it up if I held a gun to your head!'

'I know,' Harold says, 'but it would be nice if a woman could just hold it for a while.'

‘Well, I can oblige,' says Mildred, who unzips his trousers, removes his manhood and proceeds to hold it. Afterward, they agree to meet secretly each night in the garden where they would sit and talk and Mildred would hold Harold's manhood.

Then one night Harold didn't show up at their usual meeting place. Alarmed, Mildred decided to find Harold and make sure he was O.K.

She walked around the Senior Citizen Home where she found him sitting by the pool with Ethel, another female resident, who was holding Harold's manhood!

Furious, Mildred yelled, 'You two-timing son-of-a-bitch!  What does Ethel have that I don't have?'

Old Harold smiled happily and replied, 'Parkinson's.'"
My dick is the same length as this joke!,0,[removed]
Where to you send someone who’s been in a peekaboo accident?,0,To the I.C.U.
What did the cannibal say when he ate a clown? It kinda taste funny,0,[removed]
What sound does an airplane make in a bouncy castle?,0,"Boeing, Boeing, Boeing"
its funny,0,[removed]
What do you call a flying dinosaur with a black marker?,0,[removed]
People should take an example from everyone who has died of Coronavirus.,0,They're now maintaining 6 feet of social distancing at all times.
My girlfriend just accused me of cheating,0,I told her she was starting to sound like my wife
There is a guy stealing Iphones around town,0,He is probably going to face time
Competitive lumberjacking will never be a sport as it isn't a matter of skill,0,It just comes down to whoever has logged the most hours
Why did the semen cross the road?,0,[deleted]
what do you get when you cross a baseball and a bunch of tacks,0,[deleted]
"Arnold Schwarzenegger's is long and hard. The president's is a 5. Madonna doesn't have one, and the Pope has one, but he doesn't use it.",0,A last name.
Welcome to the Sexual Innuendo Club,0,[removed]
What did the sign say on the closed down brothel say?,0,[removed]
"Eeny, meeny, miny, moe, Catch a tiger by the toe. If he hollers, let him go, Eeny, meeny, miny, moe",0,[removed]
I knew the chinese were up to something in January,0,[removed]
What do you call a cheerleading doggo?,0,A pompomeranian
Jesus was having trouble with his crossword puzzle.,0,He was stuck on 2 across
What so you call a cheerleading doggo?,0,[deleted]
What if tesla was a rope making company ?,0,Its founder would be Elon Husk
So I messaged my girlfriend earlier...,0,"Her: “Hey, wanna have my sex?”

Me: “Sure”

Her: “Female”"
Are you a star babe?,0,Because looking at you is burning my eyes
A man walks into a bar,0,[removed]
"A nucleus walked into a bar, he asked the bartender, “How much for a drink?”",0,[removed]
What do you call a guy who knows only 1 sex position?,0,A one prick Tony.
"Dwayne Johnson, Moses and Jesus walked into a bar",0,"*Dwayne Johnson, Moses and Jesus walked into a bar *

Dwayne Johnson ordered a beer 

Moses ordered a staff  and said ""Jesus are you ready ""

*Jesus nodded *

*Dwayne Johnson screams! *

There was abundant red wine after that"
Three drunk vampires make a bet to see who is the best at taking blood from their victims.,0,"The first one transforms into a bat and flies away. After a couple of minutes he comes back with some blood in his lips. The other two ask him where he got it from. 

""See that little kid over there? That's where.""

The second vampire transforms himself into a bat and comes back with even more blood than the first one. They ask him where he got it from.

""See that man over there? That's the guy I got it from.""

The third one also transforms himself into a bat. It doesn't take him too long to come back. His entire body is covered in blood. The other two are amazed and ask him where he got it from.

""See that wall over there?""

They nod. 

""Well, I didn't."""
An ego and a superego walk into a bar.,0,"The bartender says ""I'm gonna need to see some id""."
"A nun walked into a bar with her clothes on inside out. The bartender asked her about it and she replied,",0,“Its a bad habit”
North Korea is so poor that the belly of a bear is considered prime real estate.,0,[deleted]
What Borders Stupidity?,0,[removed]
The thing I dislike about suspense is,0,[removed]
"My ex is probably in a loving, committed relationship right now",0,[deleted]
I was talking to my plumber...,0,"I told him, ""Mario, I'm growing a big bushy mustache like yours, so I got this hair trap to prevent the stray mustache hairs from clogging my drain. It's working great, and I'm thinking of keeping the mustache, so I figure maybe I should get some plumbing epoxy and affix the hair trap to the pipes. What do you think?""

My plumber responded, ""Listen, if it ain't a-broke..."""
What do you call a hippie's wife?,0,Mississippi.
Breaking News- Congressional Republicans announce they now support all mail voting for the 2020 Presidential Election,0,"Correction- All MALE voting, they support all MALE voting for the 2020 Presidential Election."
Why did librarian refuse to lend a book on suicide to a man?,0,[removed]
"""It's a notice from the World Health Organization.""",0,[deleted]
I bought a prostitute on craigslist.,0,[deleted]
2020,0,[deleted]
Secret message hidden in the SPAGHET meme,0,[removed]
Two men went hunting,0,"One man asked the other, “Did you ever hunt bear (bare)?” The other hunter said, “No, but one time I went fishing in my shorts.”"
Steve Jobs would have handled the pandemic very well,0,"After all, an apple a day keeps the doctor away"
I told my girl that between her vagina must be the holy spirit...,0,Because it always has me speaking in tongues.
"To idiots who have COVID-19 symptoms and dont believe in medicine and science -&gt; PLEASE GO TO A HOSPITAL NOW. IF YOU DONT,",0,[removed]
For anyone interested in watching the World Origami Championships,0,It’s on paper view.
The Germans and Americans were reaching a stalemate in WWI.,0,"In World War I there was trench warfare, and neither the Americans nor the Germans could get the upper hand. They were reaching a stalemate. One day, an American came up with a plan that would win them the war. This private explained his plan to his trench mates, and they figured, ""Why not? It's not like we have any better ideas."" The next day, an American soldier called out, ""Hans!?"" A German popped up and shouted back, ""Ja?!"" Boom, the German was shot dead. The next day the Americans shouted again, ""Hans?!"" ""Ja?!"" Shot dead. This process continued over the next couple of days. The Germans were losing large numbers, and were now finally catching on.

The Germans had an emergency meeting. They thought they could come back from the heavy losses using the same tactics as the Americans. Thus, a German asked, ""What is a popular American name?"" ""John!"" replied another. The next day, the Germans decided to execute their plan. A German shouted, ""John!?"" 

An American called back, ""Is that you Hans?!"" 

""Ja!"""
I played a song to a tree in Russia,0,Now it's Dmitree
I was practicing my whole life for this moment,0,"&amp;#x200B;

Staying home all day, and socially distancing myself from others. Now they can't stay home for one day without being depressed, ha!   

**He who laughs last, laughs best.**"
What do you call a fart that makes everyone laugh?,0,Laughing gas
"Always Remember, during these hard times...",0,Viagra won't let you down
Why did the conductor make a terrible train pun?,0,Because he couldnt resist
A guy walks into a bar,0,[removed]
My wife caught me crossdressing,0,So i packed her clothes and left
It is preposterous that people act like Hitler never did anything good for the world.,0,[deleted]
Clogged pipe? You don't need a handyman.,0,"You need a handy, man!"
Could you imagine the world if we all turned out to be nocturnal..,0,the difference is night and day.
What's the name of the Madonna song where she sings about being a classical poet and a guide through hell?,0,Like a Virgil.
A woman walked into a pharmacy,0,[removed]
I wasn't sure what to wear to the Premature Ejaculators' meeting...,0,"So I just came in my pants.


(May not be original, but it popped in my head while doing laundry. Y'all have a good one!)"
Ever play Gay Mortal Kombat?,0,"When you defeat your opponent you’ll hear: 
“Finish Him Off” 

Then you perform a Gaytality."
Why are cutlasses called cutlasses?,0,Because that’s what they do - they literally cut lasses.
Used Condoms,0,[removed]
"TIL In light of the online hatred due to her ""I'm in prison"" quarantine posts from her mansion, Ellen DeGeneres has graciously agreed to let her personal Chef have her, and her wife's leftovers from one meal each day.",0,[removed]
I flicked an insect with unusually long legs and it acted like it was nothing,0,[deleted]
We are only a few weeks into self-isolation and it is really upsetting me to witness my wife standing at the living room window gazing aimlessly into space with tears running down her cheeks.It breaks my heart to see her like this. I have thought very hard about how I can cheer her up.,0, I have even considered letting her in - but rules are rules.
What does Michael Jordan put on his toast?,0,Space Jam
If I had a dollar for every time someone over 40 told me my generation sucks...,0,[removed]
My wife and I were happy for 30 years,0,[deleted]
Trying to find a joke,0,[removed]
a bishop walked up to a bar,0,the barman said “you can’t do that. Bishops can only move diagonally.”
I’d share a coronavirus joke....,0, but you’d have to wait 2 weeks to see if you get it.
I had a job interview at the city recycling center,0,"""Why should we hire you?"" They asked.

""Have you seen my r/Jokes posts?"" I replied."
I'm really hating this ducking auto correct on my new phone.,0,[deleted]
A Woman Was Redecorating Her House,0,"But when it came time to choose her window curtains, she was torn between two different shades of blue. One set was a darker shade - which matched the sofa, and the other was a lighter shade - which matched the chair. No matter how she tried to justify one over the other, she could not come to a decision on which set to put up.

So she decided to hire the best interior designer in town to help her make the choice. The only stipulation was that the designer required payment up front, and in gold. As odd as this seemed, the woman knew this designer was the best around, so she did as the designer asked.

As soon as the gold exchanged hands, the designer wasted no time looking at each set of curtains. She lifted up each set to see how they looked against the window, and inspected from all angles. Finally - after about 10 minutes, the designer pointed to the dark blue curtains and said:

""This blue up. Thanks for the gold."""
"What is the interval [2020, 2022) ?",0,[deleted]
"Does ""flattening the curve"" mean women have to put on a tighter bra?",0,Not a dad joke.
Did you hear about the inflatable boy at the inflatable school who was sent to see the inflatable headmistress for bringing in a pin?,0,"She said: “You’ve let me down, you’ve let yourself down, but worst of all you’ve let the whole school down.”"
All these countries keep complaining about the coronavirus reaching them...,0,[deleted]
"If I made a porn when I was 16, is it legal for me to watch it now?",0,Or is it illegal because my parents didn't know they were being filmed?
How come China lost WW3?,0,[removed]
Knock Knock,0,"""Knock knock""

""Whose there?""

""Nev""

""Nev who?""

""Nevwho gonna give you up..."""
"To save money now, hospitals are forced to buy cheaper counterfeit catheters.",0,[deleted]
I hate it when people call me ignorant,0,[deleted]
There's a little-known legend about Attila the Hun,0,[deleted]
Due to Trumps withdrawal of funding from WHO there has been some unlikely casualties,0,He misunderstood and now the BBC has to stop filming the next series of the time traveling doctor
"An angel appears in a puff of smoke to a man and says to him, ""Because you have lived a good and virtuous life, I can offer you a gift: you can be the most handsome man in the world, or you can have infinite wisdom, or you can have limitless wealth."" Reflecting, the man says, ""I'll take the wisdom""",0," ""Wisdom is yours,"" says the angel, disappearing in another puff. The smoke is barely clear before the man thinks, ""I should have taken the money."""
What borders on stupidity?,0,Mexico and canada
My dad died last year when my family couldn't remember his blood type in time for paramedics to save him,0,[deleted]
Latest Hindi Jokes,0,[removed]
What do you call a sodomized chicken?,0,[removed]
"I always wanted to have a pet, especially in these lonely times",0,But I realized- I am already nursing vipers in my bosom.
Guy walks into a bar,0,Lucky bastard
"An Englishman, a Frenchman, a ravishing blonde and a homely brunette...",0,[deleted]
Oral sex would make my day...,0,[removed]
An 18 year old Italian girl tells her Mom that she has missed her period for two months.......,0,[removed]
A footballer asked his friend,0,"""How are you so good at side stepping ?""

His friend said,

""I just keep running into people"""
A Roman walks into a bar and holds 2 fingers up to the barman,0,"""Five beers please."""
What do you call the parents of a baby Llama?,0,[deleted]
A woman is preparing dinner for her husband,0,"While she was setting the table, a minister and the manager of the brewery the husband works at knock on the door.  

When she opens the door the manager says, ""We're extremely sorry, but this morning your husband fell into one of the vats of beer and drowned""  

The woman explodes at the manager, ""He died this morning and your telling me this now!?!?!?"" 

The manager replies, ""Well, he got out a couple times to use the bathroom"""
What size underwear do feminists wear?,0,[deleted]
Hans and Sveeda,0,"Hans and Sveeda are newly married and soon after the wedding they board a bus for their honeymoon to a lodge in the Alps. 

About 20 kilometers into the journey the bus breaks down and Hans says ""Sveeda I need it NOW, we could go to the woods and be back before the bus is fixed."" Sveeda, wanting her first time to be special says, ""No Hans, it will be soon enough.""

 A half hour later the bus is fixed and they are on their way. 18 kilometers down the road the  bus breaks down again. And again Hans says ""Sveeda, I need it NOW, let's sneak behind that old barn and we'll be back before the bus gets fixed!"" ""Hans, just wait, it will be soon enough."" 

Twenty minutes goes by and the bus is fixed and on it's way. Then the bus breaks down again and soon Sveeda snuggles up to Hans and says ""Hans, I need it NOW!"" Hans says, ""Sveeda, you said we should be patient and wait until we get someplace special. We're so close, why have you changed your mind?"" Sveeda says, ""yah, I know but I overheard some hunters talking behind me and they were saying if we don't hurry up and get there soon the FUCKING season will be OVER!"""
What do you call a rich prostitute?,0,*Suck*cessful
"And the Lord said unto John ""Come forth and you shall receive eternal life.""",0,"Unfortunately, John came fifth and received a toaster."
I'm not worried about the Coronavirus.,0,"I didn't see COVID1 through 18, so I'm not going to get COVID19.

(I'm sorry, I'm so sorry.)"
Three redditors died on the same day together,0,[deleted]
I've been dating a horse girl for three years now,0,It's been a stable relationship
An old lady dies and goes to heaven. She's chatting it up with St.Peter at the Pearly Gates when all of a sudden she hears the most awful bloodcurdling screams.,0,[removed]
Back in time,0,"Ma was in the kitchen fiddling around when she hollers out....
""Pa, you need to go out and fix the outhouse!""
Pa replies, ""There ain't nuthin wrong with the outhouse.""
Ma yells back, ""Yes there is, now git out there and fix it.""
So....... Pa mosies out to the outhouse, looks around and yells back, ""Ma There ain't nuthin wrong with the outhouse! ""
Ma replies, ""Stick yur head in the hole!""
Pa yells back, ""I ain't stickin my head in that hole!""
Ma says, ""Ya have to stick yur head in the hole to see what to fix.""
So with that, Pa sticks his head in the hole, looks around and yells back ""Ma! There ain't nuthin wrong with this outhouse!""
Ma hollers back, ""Now take your head out of the hole!""
Pa proceeds to pull his head out of the hole, and then starts yelling, ""Ma! Help! Oh Help me Ma! My beard is stuck in the cracks in the toilet seat!""
To which Ma replies, ""Hurts, don't it?"""
A man owned a small farm in Indiana,0,".

The Indiana State Wage &amp; Hour Department claimed he was not paying proper wages to his help and sent an agent out to interview him.

'I need a list of your employees and how much you pay them,' demanded the agent.

' Well,' replied the farmer, 'there's my farm hand who's been with me for 3 years. I pay him $200 a week plus free room and board.

The cook has been here for 18 months, and I pay her $150 per week plus free room and board.

Then there's the half-wit who works about 18 hours every day and does about 90% of all the work around here. He makes about $10 per week, pays his own room and board,
and I buy him a bottle of bourbon every Saturday night. He also sleeps with my wife occasionally.'

'That's the guy I want to talk to --- the half-wit,' says the agent.

'That would be me,' replied the farmer."
Why did the can crusher quit his job?,0,Because it was soda pressing
What do you call a male crocodile who marries another male crocodile ?,0,[deleted]
"Girl, you must be an N95...",0,because I want you on my face.
James Dean had a tiring day at work,0,"James Dean had a long and tiring day at work, so he decided to stop at a pub on the way home. He ordered a pint of Coors Light and some whiskey. Before the drinks were poured he changed his mind - instead of the pint he asked for a can of Red Bull. He was getting a Red Bull without a Coors!"
"A Jewish man was leaving a convenience store with his espresso, when he noticed a most unusual Italian funeral procession approaching the nearby cemetery. A black hearse was followed by a second black hearse about 50 feet behind the first one...",0,"

Behind the second hearse, was a solitary Italian man, walking a dog on a leash.

Behind him, a short distance back, were about 200 men walking in single file.

The Jewish man couldn't stand the curiosity.

He respectfully approached the Italian man walking the dog and said, ""I am so sorry for your loss and this may be a bad time to disturb you, but I've never seen an Italian funeral like this. Whose funeral, is it?""

""My wife's.""

''What happened to her?""

""She yelled at me and my dog attacked and killed her.""

He inquired further, ""But who is in the second hearse?""

“My mother-in-law. She came to help my wife and the dog turned on her and killed her also.""

It was a very poignant and touching moment of Jewish and Italian brotherhood.

Silence passed between the two men.

The Jewish man then asked, ""Can I borrow the dog?""

The Italian man replied, ""Get in line."""
There once was an old toymaker.,0,"His name was Abram Wright, and he had spend his entire life working on his craft. His only joy was to bring a smile on children's faces, by giving them the toys he made, entirely with his own two hands. He started working with wood, when he himself was a kid, and made the most wonderful dolls; then he started working with metal, and made the most ingenious automatons; and then he learned to use various tools and materials, and brought to life the most marvelous, almost living toys.

One day, the old man felt he was going to die. He had led a fulfilling life, and caused many a smile; he was happy; though in his heart, he couldn't help but regret seing the end of it. He dreamt of making children happy forever.Abram was beloved and respected by all. When the townsfolk heard that his end was near, they went and ask the authorities to help him. One day, as Abram was lying, his restlest hands still making small wooden toys, even on his deathbed, there was a knock on his door. An important sounding man was there, clothed in army colors. He told the old toymaker that his life was too great, that he was too important to be left to die. The joy he has brought was extraordinary. ""We want you to keep making the children happy"", he told him, ""and we have just the technology for you to do that. We can extract your mind from your brain, and then put it back somewhere it could thrive. There is just one problem we still haven't solved: we can't create a proper recipient. A human brain cannot accept a different mind than its own, so we need a mechanical one. And no one, but you, is skilled enough to make one. Build yourself an automaton, a puppet with a brain intricate enough to contain your mind, and we will put you into it, so you can live forever.""

Abram was happy. He didn't want to die yet, he wanted to stay and make even more toys. So he got out of his bed, and he got to work. The army had given him everything he could possibly need: every material that existed on the world, the most advanced technologies, and all the hands he wanted. He worked tirelessly, days and nights, creating the most advanced toy he had ever made. And then, finally, it was done.

""Mr Wright"", said the general, ""you have worked well. But we now face a new problem: we made tests on your creation. Our technology should work, yet somehow any brain we transplant fails to animate this vessel. If your mind also fails to fit your puppet, you will die."" ""I'm dying anyway"", answered the old man, ""I might as well take one last chance before I go.""

And so it was done, and it worked to perfection. Abram fell asleep on a flesh body, and woke up in one made of wood, metal, and plastic. He couldn't feel anymore, he wasn't hungry anymore, he wasn't sleepy anymore; but he was alive. And he could still make toys. He had given himself slender hands, a limber and fast body, so not only could he still bring joy to everyone, but he could also repair the most intricate parts of himself as needed, and he could live forever. ""I don't understand why it worked"", said the general, ""but I am glad it did. You're now immortal, Abram Wright, so go and spread joy as it is you do.""

The toymaker was happy. Both children and adults went to marvel as this big great toy that was making others. He was sworn to secrecy: no one would know that he was still alive. But he never cared. He spent his days playing with the children, and his nights making more toys for them. And he was happy.

One night, there was a strong knock on the door of his workshop. ""We know you are here, toymaker!"", yelled a powerful voice, ""come out, come out, we want to talk to you!"" Abram opened the door, puzzled to discover two asian-looking men sharing the same face. They could have been twins, but somehow he could tell: they looked even too much alike. Like the same man having the two same bodies. ""Who are you?"", he asked in his mechanical voice. ""I am Lee Chan Wong"", one of the man answered, ""and I seek to be immortal. I spent my life working on cloning myself, and I managed to put myself in a younger version of my body; but my science is imperfect, and I am dying fast. My clones can't hold out. I stole the technology to put one's brain in a mechanical one, now, I'm going to need you to build the body I will then inhabit.""

Abram refused, but the two clones took him and started tearing him appart. His body was resilient, but not strong, and he could do nothing to fight the two men that were one. But the toymaker lived for nothing but his craft. He felt nothing but the need to bring joy. ""You can destroy me!"", he cried, ""but you can never make me pervert my toys!"". ""Fine"", one of the clones said, ""if you're not going to give me a new brain, I will have to take yours.""

The poor toy could do nothing. The clones took him to their lab, where he recognized the technology that had brought his mind inside of his puppet; he was strapped to a table, and the machine was put in place. ""I have studied the intricacies of the brain for longer than a lifetime, Mr Wright. I know the technology hasn't worked on anyone but you, and though nobody can tell why, I will use my first clone to understand the process, and then my second clone will take your place.""

And so the poor toymaker's mind was erased. He layed there, powerless, as he heard the machines whirring sound getting closer; he felt the electric waves going into his mind, and then, he was gone.

But then, as the brain of his first clone dived into the mechanical one, Lee realized his error. What he hadn't know about Abram Wright, what nobody had ever figured out, is that the man wasn't simply great: he was a genius. His brain could animate the machine because his mind was simply greater. The technology had worked only with him, because it simply couldn't work on anyone else. A normal mind was merely not enough to animate his greatest toy.

The cloning technology that Lee had spent a lifetime developing had one curious side effect: it was not just his body, but also his mind, that was shared. He could feel, as if he were there himself, the anguish of his clone, stuck into his mechanical prison. He screamed and yelled and cried and fought and fought and fought, but he simply didn't have the strenght to make to automaton move. He didn't have enough brain. The desperate scientist knew what he had to do: one brain wasn't enough for the puppet to move, but two would surely be. He plugged himself into the machine, and sent his mind with his other self, inside the giant toy.

He saw the dark around him, as he couldn't see. He felt the absence on his limbs, as he couldn't feel. He heard the silence, as he couldn't hear. A wave of terror went crashing down on him, a double panic filling his double mind, as both brains came to the same realization: they had failed. Two of the crazed scientist's brains weren't enough to animate the toy. Crying a cry no one could hear, they stayed there, in a prison of wood, metal and plastic, burried inside the mechanical mind of a man too great for them to ever match.

&amp;#x200B;

They should have known. Two Wongs do not make a Wright."
"God: ""8"" Angel: ""9""",0,"God:""We shouldn't do this drunk."" Angel:""10 lol"" God: ""15"" Angel *mouthful of pizza*: ""25"" Centipede *tearing up*: ""Stop giving me legs, I look stupid!"" God: ""ONE HUNDRED"" Angel: ""LMAO"""
"How come if a woman has sex with lots of men, she's automatically a slut, but when I do it...",0,I'm gay?
How did Michael Jackson die????,0,[deleted]
What do you call a retarded agent?,0,"Blonde, James blonde"
My parents,0,"My parents grew to like my girlfriend so much, they take her as their own daughter. Now they started looking for a proper boyfriend for her."
TikTok Funs in shambles,0,TikTok funs in shambles after health officials reported that one of the coronovirus symptoms is bad taste.
What should you never drink if your mouth is dry?,0,Canada Dry
How fun is Animal Crossing: New Horizons?,0,[deleted]
Jeffrey Epstein plays mmo for...,0,Sui side quests.
Hey dad I’m going to shove my fully erect penis into this paper shredder slowly pushing it through as i scream in agony while my penis is separated into small strands.,0,[removed]
Happy new years day 260 days in advance,0,Its a dope joke but still....
What borders on stupidity?,0,Mexico and Canada!
4 Warning signs of dementia,0,Why am I on reddit?
My girlfriend dressed up as a policewoman and told me I was under arrest on suspicion of being good in bed.,0, After 2 minutes all charges were dropped due to a lack of evidence.
Two men were washed ashore during World War I.,0,"Their ship, an aging minesweeping model, had wrecked off the coast of an uninhabited island. As the older veteran worked to build a makeshift camp, the younger soldier managed to salvage a radio, and quickly telegraphed an SOS with their coordinates. 

To their surprise, a ship responded within the hour, confirming that it could arrive at their position in approximately two weeks.

The old vet sighed and shook his head, saying he'd rather take his chances swimming out to the wrecked ship and trying to repair it. 

The young soldier scoffed. ""You'd really rather play with that old mine craft all day?""

The older man shrugged. ""It's better than a fortnight."""
You don't need a parachute to jump out of a plane,0,You need a parachute to jump out of a plane twice.
I hate Russian dolls,0,[removed]
The only time I use my Airtel sim,0,[removed]
Two men in the desert,0,"Two men are wandering the desert. They've been there for days, and can't remember how they got there; the only thing in their minds right now is that they need water to survive another day in this scorching heat.

Midday passes, and the men are succumbing to despair - but wait, what's this? They see a shimmering outline of a wall in the distance. This is the first sign of life they can remember seeing, and so they rush over to it. They find it's one of the walls of a small market town.

Overjoyed, the men rush through the gates and see that the only things inside the walls are three battered market stalls, each manned by a single trader. They rush over to the nearest one.

""Please, kind stranger, we've been wandering the desert for days and we desperately need water, do you have some?""

The stranger pauses for a moment, then replies, ""No sirs, I do not have any water. But I can give you some of this delicious strawberry jelly.""

The men let out a small simultaneous sigh, thank the man for his offer (whilst kind, they really need water rather than food) and rush over to the next stall in the hope that the next merchant has some, any, water.

Again they repeat their plea: ""Please, kind stranger, we've been wandering the desert for days and we desperately need water, do you have some?""

This next merchant pauses and regards the men, before saying, ""No sirs, I have no water. Only this fine and tasty custard to offer you.""

The men sigh even deeper this time - custard is too thick and too solid to sate their growing thirsts. They quickly thank the man for his time and desperately rush over to the last stall in the town.

In a pleading voice they cry, ""Please, kind stranger, we've been wandering the desert for days and we desperately need water, do you have some?""

This trader pauses for the longest time, and just when the men are about to turn away, he says: ""No, I am sorry, gentlemen, but I have no water; however, if you would like, I sell tasty whipped cream which you might like.""

The men cry out aloud in despair; no water is to be found in this town, and their hopes have been dashed on the rocks of insupply. They trudge wearily out of the small market town, hoping against hope that they can find a place with water before the day is out.

Five hundred paces from the walls, one man turns to the other and asks:

""Did you notice that that market was a little strange?""

The other replies,

""Yes, it was a trifle bazaar."""
What two walls are saying to each other?,0,We meet at the corner
Night at the Putin household,0,"What does Mrs Putin say at night?

“Vladimir, put in, put in.”"
What do you call a hooker that you pay with spaghetti?,0,A pastatute
I like my women how I like my music,0,[removed]
Two travellers tired from a journey reached an inn.,0,[removed]
"I found $20 in the parking lot and thought to myself, what Jesus would do?",0,"So, I turned it in to wine."
My neighbor came knocking at my door at 3 AM...,0,[removed]
My dad told me this one.,0,"A guy enters in a public toilet ... in the cabin next to him, another constipated guy, he forces himself quite noisy. The first guy, finishing what he had to do, at the exit of the toilet turns off the light, at which time a loud scream is heard. Curious, he returns, turns on the light and asks the one in the toilet: - What happened? This one visibly frightened responds:         -I thought my eyes jumped out of my head."
How do blind people tell when they are done wiping?,0,A taste test.
"Ever since I got cloned, my wife has said I spent too much time with him. Today, the clone and I were sat in the lounge watching TV, when my wife came in and told me that she was leaving.",0,I was beside myself.
What did the left eye say to the right eye?,0,Between me and you something smells
There are 70 things to please a lady,0,"First is shopping, next is 69."
Why wasn't Bill Murray cast as Thor?,0,Because nobody likes an electricity bill.
What do you call a well endowed white guy?,0,[removed]
A joke from my personal experiences,0,"\*  After a nice dinner date 

Girl: Is it fine if I  leave you? 

Me: That's alright most of the girls leave me anyway.

Girl: I was talking about giving you a lift to your house! 

Me: Facepalm"
What is a burger’s favorite day?,0,Fry-day
Why can't penguins fly?,0,[removed]
I was a man trapped in a woman's body ..,0,And then I was born!
My teacher caught me masturbating in the shower.,0,Totally spoiled our excursion to Auschwitz.
During a funeral the pallbearers accidentally bump into a wall,0,[removed]
i’m not lazy,0,i just get slack-attacks
Why did the shark have bloodshot eyes?,0,It smoked some seaweed
New movie.,0,[removed]
Cheating Wives,0,"A guy thought his wife was cheating on him. He waited for her to leave that night and jumped in a cab to follow her. By following her, he found out she was working in a whore house.

The guy says to the cabbie, ""Wanna make a $100?""

The cabbie says, ""Sure, what do I have to do?""

The guy replies that all the cabbie has to do is go inside the whore house, grab his wife, put her in the back of the cab, and take them home.

The cabbie goes in. A couple of minutes later, the whore house door gets kicked open, and the cabbie starts dragging out this woman who is kicking, biting, punching, and fighting all the way to the cab.

The cabbie opens the door to the cab, throws the girl inside, and tells the man, ""Here! Hold her!""

The man looks down at the girl and yells to the cabbie, ""THIS AIN'T MY WIFE!""

The cabbie replied, ""I KNOW. IT'S MINE... I'M GOING BACK IN FOR YOURS!"""
"when does a joke become a dad joke? (this, of course, from my dad)",0,"when it's full groan, of course!"
"A flat-Earther died, and to his surprise found himself standing on a cloud in front of the gates of heaven",0," 

A flat-Earther died, and to his surprise found himself standing on a cloud in front of the gates of heaven. God himself was there and told him he would be happy to answer any questions the man might have - about anything across the entirety of Space and Time.  
So of course the man said - ""Was I right? Is the earth actually flat?"" and God chuckled and said ""Of course not"".

The man shook his head in disbelief, shaken to his very core, before murmuring ""...this goes even higher than I thought..."""
What did the cell say when his sister stepped on his toe?,0,Ow mitosis.
"Especially this year, I find it really distasteful that shops seem to stock seasonal products earlier and earlier...",0,[deleted]
I deleted my wife's audiobook,0,Now I'll never hear the end of it.
Poor homeless woman,0,"I asked a pretty, young homeless woman if I could take her home. She smiled at me and said yes. The look on her face soon changed, however, when I walked off with her cardboard box."
"People are so sad, I'm not entering the Bake Off this year",0,Even their cakes are in tiers
What do you call children born In early 2021?,0,Children of the quarn
A man takes a woman on a date ...,0,"Throughout the date he is a complete gentleman. He takes her to the best restaurant, orders the finest champagne.

Later he takes her home. He stops his car in front of her house and then, leering, he abruptly unzips his pants and places her hand on his penis.

Disgusted, the woman gets out of the car, slams the door, and runs to her porch. Then she turns around and yells, ""I only have two words for you: *fuck off!*""

The man yells back, ""I only have two words for you: *let go!!!*"""
Newman Bates went to his psychiatrist friend's house with his family,0,"Newman Bates: Let me introduce you to everyone, this is my wife, Mrs. Bates, this is my daughter, Miss Bates, and my son, Master Bates

Friend: Does he now? Send him to my office, he'll turn out just fine."
What does a baby bird call its mom that won’t feed it?,0,Cheap Cheap
A cat walks by the window of a mental hospital.,0,"A sadist, a masochist, a murderer, a necrophile, a zoophile and a pyromaniac are all sitting on a bench in a mental institution.  
""Let's have sex with a cat?"" asked the zoophile.  
""Let's have sex with the cat and then torture it,"" says the sadist.  
""Let's have sex with the cat, torture it and then kill it,"" shouted the murderer.  
""Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it and then have sex with it again,"" said the necrophile.  
""Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it, have sex with it again and then burn it,"" said the pyromaniac.  
There was silence, and then the masochist said: ""Meow."""
They always ask what is Raid: Shadow Legends,0,[removed]
What's the best kind of joke to tell during a pandemic?,0,[removed]
Where does Napoleon keep his army?,0,In his sleevies
Turns out Jesus is not that popular in Twitter,0,Only 12 followers
"A man walks into the bar, and approaches a woman",0,[deleted]
How do you tell the sex of an ant?,0,"You drop it in water.
If it sinks, Girl ant.
If it floats..."
A man sees his friend at the store and is shocked to find that his head has been replaced by a giant pumpkin.,0,"The man approaches his friend to see what happened.

Friend 1: Man what the hell happened to your head?

Friend 2: Oh you're never gonna believe this I ran into a genie and he told me he'd give me three wishes.

Friend 1: No way, so what did you wish for?

Friend 2: Well first I wished for one billion dollars and, lo and behold, a huge stack of money appeared. Then for my second wish I asked for a beautiful woman to be my wife and, once again it came true, the most gorgeous woman I've ever seen appeared out of thin air.

Friend 1: But how did you get a giant pumpkin for a head, what was your third wish?

Friend 2: Well I guess for my third wish I really blew it. I wished for a giant pumpkin head."
Terrible pun...,0," An elderly German couple that own a butcher shop are minding the store one day, selling all sorts of meats and sausages when in walks a man with a bird under his arm.  
The shopkeeper asks the man if he can help him and the man says ""Yes, I would like to trade this bird for a few of your famous sausages.""  
After haggling over quantity of sausages to bird ratio, the butcher agrees and he trades his remaining stock of sausages for the bird.  
After locking the bird in the back room, the butcher's furious wife comes running up to him screaming ""What have you done??""  
She then realizes that due to his advanced age and diminishing mental capacity, he has taken a Tern for the Wurst."
Doctor: I'm sorry Mark...,0,"Mark: Why doctor?

Doctor: You need to stop masturbating...

Mark: Oh god, why...

Doctor: Because I'm talking to you"
Alexzandre told his mom he had the biggest dick in the 8th grade.,0," 

 

 He asked her if it was because he was Polish. She said, “No, it’s because you’re eighteen. """
The times have changed.,0,[removed]
I never thought I be going up to a bank with a mask on...,0,[deleted]
"Went to the stationery store, picked up a ruler and asked the store assistant:",0,[removed]
My friend Gavin died of heartburn...,0,I can't believe Gaviscon
"When lockdown started in Germany, people started panic buying sausages and cheese",0,[deleted]
So a man is in a hospital...,0,[removed]
The papal elections came down to two contenders:,0,"Cardinal Koch and Cardinal Sea. The votes were tallied and Cardinal Koch won by 1 vote. However, moments later, Koch suffered a massive heart attack.

The Dean came out of the room where they took Koch. He looked at the assembled cardinals. They asked, “Will we have Pope Koch?”. The Dean shook his head and said, “Koch is gone, is Pope Sea ok?”"
My long-term girlfriend said that our sex isn't the same any more.,0,[deleted]
The Pope died and they needed a successor.,0,"They considered Cardinal Sicola, but he was not chosen because they didn’t want a Pope Sicola."
I like to play chess with old men in the park,0,although it’s hard to find 32 of them
Rabbi John is arguing with three other Rabbis over a passage in the Torah.,0,"He argues with them for over an hour before he says

Rabbi John: Alright you three think you're right and I think I'm right. Let's ask God.

The four men walk outside to a cliff, and John shouts to the sky 


Rabbi John: God  if I'm right send me a sign!


Storm clouds begin to form, but nothing happens.

The other three Rabbis aren't at all convinced saying


Rabbi 1: It was supposed to rain today.


They go back in and argue for two hours longer before John takes them back to the cliff, to ask God again.


Rabbi John: God, if I'm right send a sign!


Then a massive Earthquake happens shaking the ground.

The three Rabbis still aren't convinced saying.


Rabbi 2: Not convincing, We live in California. There a a massive fault line ya now.


The go back in and argue for another three hours, John takes them back out to the cliff a final time. Exhausted he asks


Rabbi John: God, if I'm right please send a sign!


Then a booming voice comes down from the sky shouting


God: He's right!


The three Rabbis look at each other and then at John.


Rabbi 3: So what, now it's two against three."
A duck walks in to a bar..,0,"A duck walks into a bar, looks up at the bar tender and says ""I'll have a beer"".
 
The bartender says ""Hey, a talking duck!!! Where did you come from!?""
 
The duck says ""I'm working the construction site across the street"".
 
And the bartender says, ""Well what are you doing, working construction when you could be making millions working in the circus!?""
 
And the duck says ""What the fuck would the circus want with a brick layer?”"
What is a ducks favourite drug?,0,Qrack.
Joe Biden said that he won’t allow any of his children to work in the White House...,0,"  
I doubt Trump intended to offer any of them a job, so I don't think it's an issue."
What does REDDIT stay for?,0,[removed]
"Why do laxatives always say they 'Work gently, over night?'",0,What if I want something that works violently right now?!?
What is Forrest Gumps favorite type of pasta?,0,Penne
"The TSA, customs officers, oral hygienists ...",0,[removed]
2020 is a unique leap year...,0,"It has 29 days in February.

300 days in March.

And 5 years in April."
"But honey, I only had two beers last night!",0,[deleted]
"Dorothy and Edna, two senior widows, are talking.",0,"
Dorothy: ""That nice George Johnson asked me out for a date. 
I know you went out with him last week, and I wanted to talk 
with you about him before I give him my answer."" 

Edna: ""Well, I'll tell you. He shows up at my apartment 
punctually at 7 P.M., dressed like such a gentleman in a fine 
suit, and he brings me such beautiful flowers! Then he takes 
me downstairs, and what's there but a luxury car... a 
limousine, uniformed chauffeur and all. Then he takes me out 
for dinner... a marvelous dinner... lobster, champagne, 
dessert, and after-dinner drinks. Then we go see a show. 
Let me tell you, Dorothy, I enjoyed it so much! 

So then we are coming back to my apartment and he turns into 
an ANIMAL. Completely crazy, he tears off my expensive new 
dress and has his way with me two times!"" 

Dorothy: ""Goodness gracious! So you are telling me I 
shouldn't go out with him?"" 

Edna: ""No, no, no...I'm just saying, wear an old dress."""
My parents were dwarfs...,0,they struggled to put food on the table their whole lives.
What do you call a singer after covid-19?,0,Post Carone
What do you get called when your use the left bra cup to make a facemask?,0,[deleted]
A little girl asks her mom where babies come from.,0,"The mom has been preparing for this so she explains the process using scientifically correct terms but in a way the young girl can understand.  Afterwards she asks, ""Do you have any questions?""

The little girl thinks for a few seconds and then says, ""How does the daddy's sperm get into the mommy? Does she swallow it?""

""Sometimes,"" says the mom, ""If she really wants some new jewelry."""
"After hearing about the news, I am absolutely disgusted of Emily Blunt",0,[deleted]
Bhari mehfil me,0,[removed]
WHAT DID SANTA SAY WHEN HE SAW HIS WET ROOF,0,It looks like rain dear
What do you get if you cross a chicken with a giraffe?,0,A really long pecker.
A whore came up to me and said I've been through a lot,0,[deleted]
"I tried to build a car out of spaghetti, my wife lost her temper and said it would never work and threatened to leave me, anyway, you should have seen her face when I drove pasta. After a while my obsession got the better of me and she walked out..",0,Now I’m feeling cannelloni.
What do you call someone who dyes their hair red?,0,Transgingered
"Hey baby, forget Netflix and chill",0,Let's Imax and climax
My dad gave me a rifle from a French soldier in WW2,0,[removed]
"Looking at all the country wise corona statistics , I thought of an Olympics joke..",0,[deleted]
Where did the dyslexic Rastafarian go on holiday?,0,Yeman
I like my women like I like my weed,0,[deleted]
White people do not shoot each other in the streets as black people ...,0,[removed]
Have you heard about the South African man who went to Greece and would only eat cheese?,0,He got Feta and Feta and Feta.
My talent,0,"There are people with many talents
Many can sing
Some can dance 
Others can draw
I can finish any tacobell combo in less than 5 minutes"
A virus and a successful man are talking over lunch,0,The virus asks the successful man what he does for a living.  The successful man says he is a tech entrepreneur.  The successful man then asks what the virus does for a living.  The viruse replies: I chase ambulances.  The successful man asks what if any certifications the virus has.  The virus responds: I passed the Bar exam.
"Jesus, waving around a baguette at The Last Supper",0,"""You wanna piece of me!?"""
I had such an eye opening experience when I woke up this morning,0,[removed]
I have joke on HR,0,But I will let you know.
I asked Siri why I was still single,0,[deleted]
A woman kills her husband and has to hide the body,0,[deleted]
"Somewhere in the world, a woman is having a baby every 12 seconds...",0,Someone has got to go stop her!
What did the Australian use when they ran out of toilet paper?,0,[deleted]
Jesus is in a bar and getting completely wasted,0,[deleted]
Trump moved to end WHO funding..,0,[removed]
A 5G cell tower was built in a rural neighborhood,0,"After the cell tower was erected, people living near the tower started reporting worrying symptoms, such as, as dizzy spells, vomiting, and insomnia.

Over the next few months, these symptoms increased in both frequency and intensity--sometimes people would completely lose consciousness and faint in their homes. The city papers reported that animals, particularly sensitive to changes in nature, were barking at odd hours of the night, and mothers were reporting cognitive issues with young children--particularly children under the age of 2.

Worried, city officials sent a team of scientists and engineers to the tower to determine the cause. When they came back with results, they informed the city officials of very disturbing news.

Due to a construction mistake, the power coils were incorrectly routed. 

The cell tower was never turned on."
A woman walks into her accountant's office and tells him that she needs to file her taxes,0,"The accountant says, ""Before we begin, I'll need to ask a few questions.""

He gets her name, address, social security number, etc. and then asks, ""What is your occupation?""

The woman replies, ""I'm a whore.""

The accountant balks and says, ""No, no, no. That will never work. That is much too crass. Let's try to rephrase that.""

The woman, ""OK, I'm a prostitute.""

""No, that is still too crude. Try again.""

They both think for a minute, then the woman states, ""I'm a chicken farmer.""

The accountant asks, ""What does chicken farming have to do with being a whore or a prostitute?""

""Well, I raised over 5,000 cocks last year."""
"Every morning when this woman's husband wakes up, he let's a horribly smelling fart.",0,"She tells him over and over ""some day you're going to fart your guts out!""
Her husband just laughs and brushes it off.

This goes on for months until Thanksgiving comes around and she is preparing the turkey. The woman gets this idea. Her husband is still sleeping so she grabs the turkey guts, runs up stairs, pulls the covers and off slowly and puts the turkey guts in his underwear.

She heads back down stairs. An hour later she hears the husband's powerful fart and then a scream. About 15 mins goes by before he comes down the stairs.

""Honey you were right! I didn't think it could happen but today I woke up and farted my guys out. Luckily, I was able to get them all back in"""
I ordered a chicken and an egg from Amazon. I’ll let you know,0,[removed]
Virigns don't have a chance to loss their virginity during these days,0,[deleted]
What’s the difference between my uncle and a chicken sandwich?,0,I don’t have a chicken sandwich in my bum at the moment!
"A vampire, a genital mutilator, and a Rabbi, enter a bar,",0,[removed]
Roses are red,0,[removed]
Dad Joke,0,[removed]
Did you hear about the old Italian chef?? Yeah he pasta a way.,0,Then a man come along prehending to be him. Everyone knew he was a in-pasta
Who is the politest Hollywood actor?,0,[deleted]
The opposite of 'isolate' is...,0,Usoearly. ._.
For our first wedding anniversary I made a bet with my wife that the first one to wake up would have to surprise the other one with oral sex,0,[deleted]
"We thought Johnny was a good uncle, then he fucked his niece.",0,"Now, he’s a great uncle"
"I think the Corolla virus is one of the best things to ever happen,",0,[removed]
I have a multi million dollar home that took years to construct.,0,I live under a bridge.
A frog without an asshole hopped by the unemployment office,0,[deleted]
I saw two women exercising...,0,"They were taking a walk but were way too close to each other given the social distancing orders. When I confronted them about the need to keep at least 6 feet apart, one of them looked at me dumbfounded and said, ""We're just trying to flatten our curves!"""
What expression does a baby love?,0,[deleted]
How do you sell a gluten free pizza?,0,"Take all the other pizzas out of the frozen section.

(too soon?)"
"Shoot for the moon, if you miss you'll land among the stars is a good quote",0,Unless you're an astronaut.
Did you hear about the new Abraham Lincoln sitcom on ABC?,0,Shot in front of a live studio audience.
What do you call a cat who's been living with the queen?,0,An Aristocat.
A mother and her daughter were playing grocery store at home.,0,[removed]
What is the most sensitive part of your body to masturbate?,0,[removed]
What did the cow say to the other cow?,0,[removed]
"Three men are in the middle of a desert when their car breaks down. For their hike to town, they each decide to take one thing with them.",0,"One man takes a jug of water. The second man takes a sandwich. The last man takes one of the car doors. 

The first man says to the last man: ""I'm bringing the water because if I get thirsty, I can take a drink. And it makes sense to bring a sandwich in case we get hungry, but why bring a car door?""

The last man replies,  ""If I get hot, I can just roll down the window."""
What’s it called when you call a Muslim a terrorist?,0,A radical slur
So the other day I was tickling my baby brother’s foot,0,"Then my mom said “Umm son, you could wait until he’s born?”"
Turkey the place,0,"Teacher: what is the birthplace of thanksgiving??
Me: Turkey"
"Some people have 10 teeth, while others have 32",0,[deleted]
10% of women think their ass is too skinny,0,"30% of women think their ass is too fat.

60% say they don't care, they love him, he's a good man and they wouldn't trade him for anything."
How many ears did Davy Crockett have?,0,"Three. A left ear, a right ear and a Wild Frontier."
"TIL in 1942, a Russian warship misfired a torpedo intended for an enemy ship, instead sinking a friendly Russian U-boat.",0,[removed]
Who is the most popular man at the nudist beach?,0,The man who can carry two cups of coffee and six donuts.
"If you want to express love for someone, the three letter word is ""ILU"". What is the three letter word by which gay guys express their love?",0,P.T.O.
A man's girlfriend left him.,0,"""What, I thought you told her that you are from a wealthy family?""

""I did. That's why she is my stepmother now."""
There are 10 types of people in the world.,0,"Those who understand binary, and those who don’t."
You know salt and vinegar chips?,0,[removed]
My wife accused me of being immature,0,I asked the poopyhead to get out of my fort
What do angels use to make music?,0,Soundclouds
"3,342 Chinese People",0,[removed]
You momma so fat...,1,"...when she went to watch a fight they gave her a sign that said ""ROUND ONE"""
Yo momma so big...,1,When ever she goes near the beach the tide comes in
Yo momma so fat...,1,There's always an elephant in the room
Successful treatments for infant eczema?,1,[deleted]
!There's only one thing worse than a rapist!,1,
Funeral dance meme | Run over by a train,1,
Daughter of the year!,1,
When my wife is not around,1,
Guy punches people in the face at Walmart,1,
Boy breaks his jaw when he jumps into the pool,1,
Yo Mamma's Code!,1,"[\#include](https://www.facebook.com/hashtag/include?source=feed_text&amp;epa=HASHTAG) &lt;iostream&gt;

using namespace std;

int main()  
{  
int Your\_Mom = 2;  
int The\_Earth = 1;  
{  
if(Your\_Mom &gt; The\_Earth);  
cout &lt;&lt; ""Yo Mamma so fat not even a computer can calculate her diameter!"";  
}  
return 0;  
}"
Yo momma so fat,1,she got counted twice on the census
Your mama joke,1,Your mamas so fat even Dora couldn't explore her
Your mama jokes,1,Your mamas so ugly she made blind kids cry
Yo mama joke,1,Your mamas so fat when she stepped on the scale her phone number showed up
Trolling a PAYDAY 2 lobby...,1,
Your mom is so old she remembers when netflix was white,1,
it's a conspiracy,1,
Yo mamma so fat when she undresses she's a naked singularity,1,
Yo mama so fat she is in a football stadium she feels claustrophobic.,1,
Ha!,1,
Lets get off the mommas since i just got off yours!,1,Bow down now fool
Yo mamma so ugly,1,"When god said ""Let there be light,""
he said ""OH SHIT GIVE IT BACK"""
Your momma's so fat...,1,When she gets into a Jacuzzi she makes her own gravy
Yo Momma so big,1,Even when she lost weight no one could put it past her.
Your momma so fat she...,1,Uses a VCR as a pager.
yo momma so fat,1,
Yo momma so stupid...,1,She still thinks PHD stands for Playa Hater Degree.
Yo momma so fat,1,She took a relationship compatibility test and her only result was little debbie
Yo momma so fat,1,She jumped into the Pacific and it flooded Miami!
Yo momma so fat...,1,that even a black hole would have problems sucking her up.
Mom life,1,I’m at that stage of my life where I understand why our parents didn’t want us to have food in our rooms but I too still have food in my room
"Advice,tips, support",1,
"Yo mama so ugly, Scorpion said STAY OVER THERE",1,
Your momma is so stinky that skunks run away from her.,1,
Yo mama so old,1,Shes was friends with jesus before he was crucified
yo mamma so fat she was used as the vault door in fallout,1,
"""it can't swallow us all"" - but yo momma can!!!",1,"Fox News: 'Storm Area 51 event' spawns rival 
‘Storm the Bermuda Triangle' event: 'It can't swallow us all'.

https://www.foxnews.com/science/area-51-bermuda-triangle-event"
Your momma’s so fat she’s got mushrooms growing under her folds.,1,
Mom: “You can use my car anytime.” Tim: “Can I use it?” Mom:,1,
Yo momma so fat,1,She died I’m sorry for your loss
Yo momma so fat..,1,Her Room of Requirement is a McDonald's
Yo Momma’s so old...,1,"When it’s that time of the month, she has a renaissance period."
Lolilol,1,"  i just ate like 3 m&amp;ms and my mom told me that i was going to be fatter, no that kind"
Yo momma so large...,1,"...when she tried out for Track and Field, she was told she'd have an excellent chance being both."
yo mama so crazy,1,she make carnage from spiderman seen sane
yo mama so tall,1,she make wilt from foster home for imaginary friends seen short
You momma is so fat,1,That when Thanos snapped only she disappeared
Tour mom is so fat,1,That she doesn’t fit in this joke
Yo momma so classless...,1,She could be a Marxist utopia!
yo momma so fat,1,you never get separation anxiety!!
So momma so classless...,1,She could be a Marxist utopia!!
Yo mama so old,1,"she didn't played Minecraft, she read Meinkampf!"
Yo momma so poor...,1,She goes to KFC and licks everyone elses fingers
Yo mamma so fat...,1,... flat earthers deny her existence.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,... She has to turn around 3 times to make one complete revolution
Yo momma so nasty..,1,She had to keep pouring salt water down her pants to keep the crabs fresh
Yo momma so short,1,"That when she fights in boxing matches, she's penalized for hitting below the belt"
Yo momma so old that she told Columbus he'd won a cruise,1,
Yo momma so old that she was once woken up by the big bang,1,
Yo momma so old...,1,"... when she was in high school, the Dead Sea was only sick."
Yo mama so old,1,"When she took off her bra, she said ""the floor is so cold!"""
Yo momma so fat,1,"She walked in front of the TV at the start of Reunited, and by the time she got to the other side of the room, Diamond Days had started."
Yo mama so old,1,Everybody talks to her in past tense.
Yo mama,1,Is a very lovely lady
O Gosh.,1,"My mom just mad a joke about an octopus she said , how come an octopus is not called a pen.. I- sskskskskms"
Yo momma so fat..,1,..she says #MeToo because she gets sexually harassed by giant blue whales
Your mum is so fat..,1,She showed up as a way point on my sat nav
Yo momma so dumb,1,she lost yo ass at SkyMall
Interesting crossover between your mom and a cool game,1,
Everybody show love to the next big rapper,1,
Yo momma so dumb,1,She's fascinated that her birthday falls on the same day she was born.
Yo momma so dumb,1,She excitedly announced that she just found out her birthday falls on the same day she was born!
Yo momma so fat . . .,1,she walked in front of the TV and I missed three episodes.
Yo mama is so fat,1,that when she wears high heels shoes she finds oil!
Yo Momma so dumb,1,She thinks Johnny Cash is a pay toilet!
Yo momma so fat,1," when she walks, an injured Jeff Goldblum sees the water in a puddle vibrate and he gets scared."
"Roses are red, violets are blue",1,And yo momma's a whore
Yo momma so dumb,1,She sent a fax with a stamp on it
You're momma's so fat,1,Her belt size say's the equator!
Yo momma so fat she did a trust fall and landed in prison for manslaughter,1,
Yo momma so ugly,1,I jerked off to her and blew a load in my eyes so I wouldn't have to look at her.
Yo Momma so dumb . . .,1,She threw away her vibrator because it was chipping her teeth.
Yo Momma so Young,1,Yo Poppa is accused of being a PEDOPHILE.
Nailed this guy in political argument,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,you can call her stomach a cave
Yo Mama so Strict,1,"Okay, guys. YouTube channel ""Yo Mama"" is debuting a new mama, Strict Mama.

In anticipation, let's flood the comment below with Strict Mama Jokes.

Yo Mama so STRICT, you're still a virgin at 30. ;(

Yo Mama so STRICT, she called 911 on a policeman FOR TRAFFIC VIOLATION.

Yo Mama so STRICT, she grounded you FOR GETTING A SILVER MEDAL.

&amp;#x200B;"
Yo momma so ugly,1,no amount of Flex Tape can fix the damage done by her face
Yo momma so fat that she sat on a bar stool and when she left it was a foot stool,1,
How Black Mothers Argue with Their Daughters!!!,1,
"That was either a sonic boom, or yo momma’s got gas again.",1,
Yo momma so fat,1,Santa came down her chimney and was like “ho ho HOLY SHIT what a fat ass” 
Sharing the News,1,
Ur mum [Is pretty great actually],1,
Yo momma so fat...,1,She ate $5 of ramen in one sitting. 
Yo mamma is so fat...,1,scientist mistook her belly button for a black hole 
Yo momma is so annoying...,1,"that when she called the suicide hotline, the person on the end of the line killed themselves."
"Yo Momma's so ugly,",1,if you take 10 pictures of her you need to delete 12.
Yo Momma is so dense,1,That light bends around her
Yo mama so fat,1,"Yo mama is so fat that every time she wears high heels, she strikes oil!"
Yo momma's so muslim...,1,"Yo momma's so muslim, when she tries to speak her mind, she gets stoned to death"
Yo mama so FAT...,1,She can't save files larger than 4gb!
"Birthday suit?? When your first birthday celebration consists of streaking across the yard, wearing only a red balloon, your bound to go viral.",1,
CHABREADLOAF,1,"Your probably reading this because you googled Chabreadloaf in school, STOP AND DO YOUR WORK"
Yo momma soo ugly...,1,Even Freddie Kruger gets nightmares...
Yo momma so dumb she thought LA Fitness,1,"was Spanish for ""The Fitness"". "
Yo momma's credit so bad,1,Bank won't lend her a pen.
Yo mama's glasses so thick,1,She saw the light and burned herself.
Are you born in a barn?,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,That her patronus is a cake.
Yo mama so hairy,1,That the only language she speeks is wookie
Yo mama so fat,1,Thanos had to snap twice
Yo mama do fat,1,Thanos had to snap twice
Yo momma so ugly,1,tears run down the back of her head to avoid her face
Yo mamma ate so many pies she's in the pie charts,1,
Yo Mama so fat,1,"yo mama so fat, when she swims naked, it doesnt count as skinny dipping"
She stared at a cup of orange juice for 12 hours because it said “concentrate.”,1,
Charcoal mask review...fml,1,
yo mamma so fat...,1,yo mamma so fat it takes her two trips to haul ass!
Found your mom's Vibe,1,
Your momma so fat,1,Her splash attack does damage.
Yo mama is so skinny,1,she has to run around the shower to get wet.
Ya mamma so fat that when she was baptized she caused another tsunami,1,
Yo momma is so fat,1,"She said she's reaching for the mountain top, but it looks like all she's reaching for is a muffin top."
Suction Power Rating,1,
My mamma...she dies try:(,1,
Are Yo Mama Jokes Safe in Public?,1,"Why do some people get so mad??? Like I've just murdered their family...

Nearly got jumped by 2 guys last time I told a yo mama joke on the street."
Love moms,1,
Moms can be so funny but serious at the same time 😂,1,
Yo Mommas,1,no u
yo mama so fat,1,"Yo mama so fat that when you tried to wish her back to life, Shenron said, ""You may only grant one wish."""
yo mama so fat,1,
Yo momma so stupid,1,she brought a spoon to the Superbowl
Yo momma's so fat...,1,"...kuna kee tanee pha uen, Solo? Ho ho hooo"
Yo Momma's so fat...,1,"That when she walks, the USGS records an earthquake and the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center alerts Hawaii."
Me and my 18 y.o. son texting from the Dr.’s office. 🙌🏼,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,That she needs a latitude and longitude to find her asshole
Mom Life! YouTube - Adrienne’s Crazy Life,1,
Your mummas...,1,Your mummas so huge her butt creates its own gravitational force and sucks in light and all matter.. it also known as a black hole.
Mom Funny Quotes Tweets Funniest Things,1,
Yo mommas so ugly...,1,"When she was born the doctor said  ""I better put her back in for another hour. She's not done yet"""
Yo momma is so fat....,1,She makes blind kids cry
yo mama so fat,1,"yo mama so fat she drinks the Milky Way for breakfast.
AFAIK I thought of this, but I wouldn't be surprised if this has already been posted before.
"
Yo momma so gassy,1,She farted in a synagogue and was arrested for anti-semitism
Your momma is so fat !,1,She voted for trump because he looked like a cheese puff 
Your momma's so fat...,1,she went to the food court and was found guilty.
Wouldn’t change this crazy life for anything. 😂😊❤️ #myheart #littleheathens,1,
Yo momma's so fat...,1,...she uses face ID on panorama mode.  
Yo momma's so fat...,1,[deleted]
Your mama is like jupiter,1,She's a gas giant
Your momma's so fat...,1,She got put on whalefare
"Yo momma so fat, when she sits around the house...",1,[deleted]
Yo momma's so fat,1,That when she dies and gets buried the Earth will not be flat anymore.
Yo momma made a joke...,1,
"Yo momma's SO fat,",1,She filled the great expanse of emptiness my ex boyfriend left inside of me
Yo momma's so fat,1,That she eventually developed clogged arteries. This led to a heart attack. She was the being operated in the hospital room as you were contacted about the incident. She finally came out of the operation successfully and began a diet. Eventually she became healthy again and the family was then happy. That she wasn't fat. 
"Yo momma's so fat!,",1,"When you were born, the doctors had to retrieve you from her orbit."
Yo momma so fat... (stroke of genius I came up with),1,Yo momma so fat that when she fell out of bed she broke the spacetime continuum and landed 65 million years ago causing the extinction of the dinosaurs.
Yo momma so Jewish,1,[deleted]
Yo Mamma's so fat...,1,"That when I searched up ""Milky Way"", your mom was drinking it."
My 9 yo thinks up yo momma jokes on the fly...yo momma’s so old...,1,She remembers when Burger King was just a prince. 
Yo mamma's so fat...,1,"That instead of Google Earth, I use Google Your Mom




"
Yo momma so dumb,1,"She deleted the cookies on her webpage to lose weight. 


"
What do you call a cow?,1,What do you call a cow with 2 legs? Your mom
What do you call a cow...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma's so fat...,1,that when she plays spin the bottle it lands on her every time
Yo mama's so fat...,1,When she threw paper planes around she did 9/11
Yo mama so fat,1,She could make Earth flat by jumping
Yo momma is so fat...,1,iPhone's new wide-angle camera was invented specially for her
Yo momma is so fat...,1,She stole an intercontinental internet cable to use as a belt.
Yo mama's so fat...,1,A NASA probe landed on her by accident.
Yo mama's so fat...,1,my username is her weight
"Yo mama so ugly,",1,She made a SCARECROW fly away
Yo momma so fat...,1,The dinosaurs went extinct when she forgot her parachute.
Yo momma so fat,1,The Sun wakes up when she rises.
Yo momma so tasteless…,1,She could be served on an airplane.
"Yo momma so fat,",1,"She doesn't need the internet, she's already connected worldwide."
Yo mamma so short...,1,she broke her leg jumping off of the toilet
Moms gone crazy! XD,1,
Yo momma so ugly...,1,If my dog had her face I would rather shave his ass and walk him backward
Yo momma's taken...,1,"..so much cock, the evolution of the human penis shape is based on the inside of your momma's vagina."
yo mamma so poor,1,"yo mamma so poor that her food stamps, don't even have any food on then"
Your Mamma is so ugly.....,1,scooby-doo can't work out the mystery
Your mother is like my views on socio-economics:,1,Every worker gets a share!
I Don't Know Cheezychezzy Song,1,
Your mother is so dirty...,1,...she still has skid marks in her underpants from where she shat you out.
What are you waiting for?!,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,She twerks a 6.2 on the Richter scale.
Yo mama's like a bus,1,She wanders around from street to street offering people a cheap ride
Yo momma so fat,1,She was on the crime scene and  the police ran out of tape.
Yo mama's so ugly,1,She requires prescription mirrors
Yo mama's like Wal-Mart,1,You can find her on the corner of any busy intersection and her prices can't be beat
Yo mama's like Starbucks...,1,[deleted]
Yo mama like a pizza,1,She's used to having more than one sausage stuffed in her box
Yo mama like a waiter...,1,she does whatever it takes to get just the tip
Yo mama so sad...,1,"She adopted yo dumb ass...

*on layaway.*"
Yo mama's so ugly...,1,"She made the Kool-Aid man say, ""Oh no!"""
"If she was going to leave, at least be attractive not trailer trash, please put on a fucking bra!!",1,
Yo momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Ya momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Your momma so ugly,1,"When God beat her face with the Ugly Stick, it broke."
Yo momma so stupid...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma jokes are not funny,1,"Yo momma jokes are completely unfunny and unoriginal. And only unintelligent 10 year olds find them funny.



Just like yo momma"
Yo momma so stupid,1,She tells you yo momma jokes
yo momma so fat,1,she broke the stairs to heaven
Yo momma's so white,1,She don't get a tan she gets a tumor
Yo momma so fat,1,She went for a walk and got cited for operating unlicensed heavy machinery.
Yo momma so fat,1,That she jumped in the air and got stuck
Yo mama's like a field...,1,You'd need to pay a Mexican to plow her.
Yo mama's so obese,1,She always has typo on Samsung Galaxy Tab S3
Yo momma...,1,Yo momma's so anorexic she thinks yo momma's so fat
Yo momma's​ so fat,1,When she moves​ everyone thinks​ the US dropped a MOAB
I 1v1 yo momma...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma's like a superheavy element...,1,"She only lasts for milliseconds. Oh, and she's super heavy as well."
Yo Mama Is So Ugly Jokes,1,
Hi,1,
Your momma's like a hockey player,1,She only showers once every 3 periods 
Yo momma is like a vacuum cleaner...,1,"She sucks, blows, and gets shoved back in the closet."
Yo momma so fat......,1,She got more chins than a Chinese phonebook
Yo mama is like Pi,1,"Circular, irrational, and there's never going to be an end to her. "
Yo momma so white,1,[deleted]
Yo momma's so stupid...,1,She sold her car for gas money
*BOOM*,1,https://www.google.com/imgres?imgurl=https%3A%2F%2Fs-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com%2F736x%2Fa6%2F2b%2F85%2Fa62b85f95e2f67f9a9724e2464432652.jpg&amp;imgrefurl=https%3A%2F%2Fuk.pinterest.com%2Fexplore%2Ffunny-quotes%2F&amp;docid=0IZLv2tb1QUkZM&amp;tbnid=mbWy0j1LXJJLvM%3A&amp;vet=1&amp;w=460&amp;h=460&amp;bih=648&amp;biw=1366&amp;q=funnyquotes&amp;ved=0ahUKEwi4_a_Tuc7SAhXEwbwKHfpaC1cQMwgzKAMwAw&amp;iact=mrc&amp;uact=8
Yo mama's so nasty,1,Homeless people tell her she stinks.
Yo momma's so ugly...,1,"...when she looked at the sun, the sun went blind."
Nice sexy girl,1,[removed]
Danielle,1,
Free Sex Dating,1,[removed]
"Guys, I advise you this Free and good Internet sex dating website which will help a girl for your interestes",1,[removed]
My true story about free dating website,1,[removed]
Nice sexy girl,1,[removed]
Free and good Internet dating website with a lot of girls. My real story for you guys,1,[removed]
24 [F4M] Riley❤️💗💋,1,
Nice Sexy selfie,1,
Excuse me for interrupting but,1,[removed]
Can You Help?,1,[removed]
From my point of view,1,[removed]
[FREE] Free Sex Dаting Website,1,[removed]
[Free] Dating_Sexy_Girls,1,[removed]
[Free] Dating_Sexy_Girls,1,[removed]
Rеаl Hot Amаtеur Мaturе Lеsbiаn Vidеo,1,[removed]
Whаt hаvе you bееn up to? Niсе tо sее уou!,1,[removed]
Is it ok if I jumр in fоr a sесоnd?,1,[removed]
Yo momma so hunchback ...,1,... she has to wear goggles every time she takes a piss.
Frаnkly spеaking,1,[removed]
"Just а mоmеnt, I’d likе to",1,[removed]
Whаt I mеan is,1,[removed]
Wait a minute!,1,[removed]
The Day Bonnie Tyler Made Me Lose It,1,[removed]
How’s life?,1,[removed]
Excuse me for butting in but,1,[removed]
Yo mama's pussy so nasty that when she walks it sounds like someone's stirring Mac and cheese,1,[deleted]
Comes from an alien...,1,"Yo mama's so poor, she can't even pay attention.

PS: Not a native speaker."
I'm willing to bet money that r/MommaJokes was made by a twelve year old or a mother.,1,Who's willing to bet against me? Anyone?
Hоw аrе уоu gеtting оn?,1,[removed]
"A NEW way to joke with your friends that is "" SCARY MOUSE ON PHONE"", Let's make life fun",1,
I аm glаd tо sее уоu,1,[removed]
Sреаking fоr mуsеlf,1,[removed]
Му rеаl ехреriеnсе with girls fоr guуs,1,[removed]
Sех_withоut_rеlаtiоn._Оnlу_Sех_with_girls,1,[removed]
I_fоund_sех_in_thе_wеbsitе.Му_rеаl_ехреriеnсе_with_girls_fоr_guуs,1,[removed]
Нi,1,[removed]
My true story about Sex with 3 different girls,1,[removed]
"Guys, I advise you this Free and good Internet dating which will help you a girl for your interestes",1,[removed]
3 timеs with diffеrеnt 3 girls оr mу mаn stоrу hоw I fоund 3 girls fоr 1 mоnth,1,[removed]
Thе internеt sex dating sitе found 3 girls for rеаl Sеx,1,[removed]
Мy first and gооd man еxрeriencе. I didn’t undеrstаnd thаt sitе саn help mе tо find thе rеal girls fоr sех,1,[removed]
Ноw I was fоund seх in thе Internеt websitе.Му real stоry fоr yоu guys,1,[removed]
Мy rеal storу аbоut seх dating site,1,[removed]
1 mоnth I’m using this well trustеd dаting wеbsitе – I’ve fоund 3 girls whо аgrеed for sеx with me,1,[removed]
[FREЕ JОIN] 100% Frее-Seх-Dаting-Wеbsitе.,1,[removed]
[FRЕE] Оnlinе-Dаting = Sеx оn thе First Datе,1,[removed]
[FRЕЕ JОIN] 100% Free-Seх-Dаting-Websitе. Jоin us today. Members аrе frоm all over the world. Our girls arе looking fоr just free-sех. Don't wаstе аny mоrе timе lоoking for frеe-dаting-sites.,1,[removed]
Yo momma's teeth are so yellow,1,"When she smiles, the sun gets jealous"
yo momma has been kicked to the curb so many times...,1,she got a body suit with a skid-plate sewn into the booty
Нow I was fоund seх in the Internеt site.Мy reаl еxpеriеnсe with girls for yоu guуs,1,[removed]
your momma IsaIah I was the Preacher man !!!!! HelloDusty Springfield Son of a Preacher Man,1,
Yo Momma's so old,1,That when I told her to act her age she died. 
Yo mama 's so old...,1,"...she masturbates on pics of herself 

I came up with that joke while asleep (not that I dreamed about the situation or something, but at the time I thought the joke was funny af , and happened to wake up right after and write it down :D . Posting it here, because I don't thing my gf would appreciate it, but someone has to see it!)"
Ya Momma's so nasty...,1,Every time she takes a bath the bitch makes roux!
Your moma so fat,1,when she tried to get into higher education she flatten it.
Yo mama so black,1,[deleted]
Yo momma is like a shotgun...,1,One cock and she's ready to blow.
Your momma so dark...,1,[deleted]
Hướng dẫn sử dụng máy hút sữa mẹ - Hibaby.vn,1,
"I seen yo momma, her momma, and your sister shopping on black Friday...",1,"Ho, Ho, Ho!"
Yo momma so ugly,1,That when they try to run the DeepDream algorithm on one of her photos the algorithm woke up. 
Yo momma is always ready for Christmas...,1,Her stockings are stuffed year round
Obesity runs in your momma's family...,1,Her grandfather was the son of flubber
mom's lips,1,Your mother's lips are so thick they cover her chin and nose!
Yo mama so fat....,1,even the shadow of her ass weighs a 100 pounds!
Yo mama so stupid...,1,when she was locked in a mattress factory for the night she slept on the floor
Yo mamma's teeth are so yellow,1,"When she yawns, traffic slows down

Edit: typo"
Mom life,1,Pretty accurate
Yo momma so fat...,1,... I'm seriously worried about her health. We need to nip this in the bud before it becomes a serious issue.
Whenever you ask Bengali Mom for going Outside,1,
If You Come To Our Home,1,
Yo momma is such a hoe...,1,..she lost her virginity before yo grandma did
Yo momma so poor and broke and stupid...,1,[deleted]
Yo Mama So Fat,1,Yo mama so fat that her farts spawn tornadoes which rip the town apart 
Yo momma's surfboard,1,
Yo momma so old...,1,I went to school with her. She was pretty cool actually. 
Yo momma so annoying...,1,She's getting on my nerves - Please come and get her out of here seriously
Yo momma so fat....,1,"when she gets too hot, a little red button pops up so you know she's done"
Yo mama so fat,1,...she gave her memory foam mattress amnesia
You mammas ass so big,1,She uses a hub cap for a diaphragm.
Yo momma so classless,1,She could be a Marxist utopia
The “Is That Poo or Chocolate?” Moment,1,
You momma so fat...,1,when she broke her leg gravy ran out
Yo momma so ghetto,1,Her boyfriend and her baby daddy share bunk beds
Yo momma's ass so flabby...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so stupid...,1,She decided to be *pro-choice* because she heard professionals get paid
Yo mamma so Fat,1,"When she passed the TV, I missed two seasons."
Yo momma's coochie so nasty....,1,Her little man in the boat jumped overboard
Yo momma so foul...,1,"There ain't no pink, they're all in the stink"
Yo momma ass so big...,1,her butt crack got an echo^echo^echo
Yo momma so fat....,1,"if she steps on a crack, she'll break everyone's back"
Yo momma so fat...,1,when she got on the escalator they turned into stairs.
Yo momma's ass so damn big...,1,Every time her booty claps the lights go off
Yo momma so stupid....,1,"when her tooth hurt, she went to the airport for a cavity check"
Yo mama so fat...,1,She got more chins than a Chinese phone book. 
Yo momma so old,1,she knew the dead sea when it was still alive
Yo mama so fat.,1,She's the only reason the universe is expanding.
"Baby and Mom Breastfeeding HD #9- Breastfeeding dinner, breastfeeding mommy",1,
Yo Mamma is so poor,1,Ducks Throw Bread at her
Yo mamma so big...,1,"she has a watch on each wrist, one for each timezone she in"
"What's the difference between yo momma and a sweet, warm apple pie?",1,I haven't eaten a pie's ass every night for the last month.
Yo mama so fat...,1,that her gold tooth is worth 5 million dollars!
Yo momma is so fat...,1,[deleted]
how to make roast lamb,1,"hello, tonight, I want to make something special for dinner. some roast lamb. first, we go to a pasture and find a sheep. walk towards the sheep you have chosen and tell him, ""your momma so ugly, PETA tried to skin and eat it."" congratulations, your lamb has roasted. its a little raw on the inside, but be ready to cut off some of the sick burns it may have. good luck on your dinner!  "
Yo momma is so fat,1,She is 4 of the 5 fat people I know.
Yo momma is fat.,1,".
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.

What? 
There is no joke, she is just fat."
What's the difference between your momma and hippo?,1,Hippos don't eat ass for a living
Is yo momma a microscope?,1,[deleted]
Your momma so fat and religious,1,Bitch could pop the buckle off the Bible Belt
Yo momma is so stupid,1,she can't figure out the words to YMCA
Yo Mama So Stupid,1,[removed]
You mamma so fat,1,".. That when she went to the Super Bowl, she took a spoon!!"
Yo mamma so dead,1,She just like this fucking subreddit HOOLLLAAAAAAAHH
"""Hey Fart Face, your mamma so fat "" (x-post r/funny)",1,[deleted]
Baby announcement: Best sisters reaction EVER!,1,
[x-post from /r/NeuralJokes] Yo mama so promise...,1,[removed]
[x-post from /r/NeuralJokes] Yo mama so flowing in the morning...,1,... if they all wanted to be coming from school the lawyer was in the lawyers town and she went for his arm.
[x-post from /r/NeuralJokes] Yo mama so probably martinis has no daughters and kill the piece of windshield in the nose.,1,[deleted]
Your momma so dumb....,1,She thought a maxi pad was a great apartment 
Yo momma so fat,1,"That when god created the earth, instead of saying ""let there be light"" he asked her to stop blocking the sun."
Yo momma's so hungry,1,
Yo mama.,1,
A very honest girl. I like to learn and study all new. My friends.. oDivMR0,1,
I will teach you passionate pleasures. Free video chat. ePKgItyDu,1,
"My ex - whore, nickname: Vendeta. 6nVMPPv",1,
"I want to communicate with you closer. You will certainly like. Come on in, you will not regret. gsPtky8Z",1,
What about the show this night? Only registered and 4pLjbGJX,1,
"Very boring :( I'll have fun here, but for registred and only.. RA7zL8",1,
"Not busy night? I can arrange a personal show for free, just for you. Registred and only Z0nhisI51F",1,
"If you looking for great time - join here, registred and only TsLmtO",1,
"I'm very bored today, come to me, free show for you :) for and registred SUTNaw",1,
How about free webcam show? For registred and only.. JOXC1t,1,
"Do you think to do this night? Join to me here, registered and only wwSNiIyg9D",1,
An interesting meeting with a guy who wants to try a strap) 26W5rS25J,1,
"Only joined online Dating a few weeks ago, and after more than a year on other sites, and limited success. 828jrLYI0hi",1,
I didn't join in anticipation that internet dating would work and then unexpectedly found the perfect partner and am very very happy akQwsNaRk5y,1,
First time cum in the mouth ZGGR4O8C4X,1,
Your momma so greasy,1,She stained the mirror.
acquaintances and virtual striptease HvIAJ3623,1,
Yo momma so stupid...,1,She thought masturbation was a karate teacher.
Stylish and sexy lady is waiting for you to visit. Register - arrange a meeting. PJLdI2,1,
Is yo momma an astronaut?,1,...she spread her legs and scientists said they observed a supermassive black hole at the centre of the galaxy.
Google,1,
I Made $12 000 in 26 Days without spending a Dime. How? 6Wq_a_M82k,1,
Yo momma so poor,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so fat,1,She invaded your dads space to the point of divorce.
Want h0t sEx? Here womens 8Hd_j_Q6_,1,
Here beautiful girls for sex 7Ab_z8_D_qS6pY3,1,
Yo mamma so fat,1,"when she sat on walmart, she lowered all the prices"
Yo Momma so stinky,1,her nickname is Pepe
Yo Momma is a lady,1,just kidding shes a hoe!
Yo Momma eats ass...,1,with a spoon
Yo momma so fat,1,She helped prove Einsteins theory that the curvature of time and space is what gravity is dependent on.
Yo momma so easy,1,she comes with a bag of cheese powder.
Yo momma so fat,1,She sleeps on squashed memory cells first developed by NASA to cushion men inside the cockpit.
Yo momma so fat,1,she could bring balance to the force.
Yo momma so fat,1,she tells guys she's high maintenance.
Yo momma so fat,1,its hard to find a man that can support her
Yo momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma's so fat....,1,"That the UN created a special commission just to designate her ass as ""terra nullis""!"
Yo momma's so fat the only way to get her to go outside,1,is to grease up the doorframe and toss out a twinkie
Yo mama's so ugly that when she visited London...,1,She made the London Eye close.
Yo momma so fat,1,She takes selfies in Panorama mode.
Yo momma so black.....,1,I threw salt in her face and she looked like deep outer space
Yo momma so fat...,1,When she came out of the house they predicted an early spring. 
Yo momma so fat...,1,If a normal person talks to dead people they're called a Medium. If yo momma talked to dead people shed be called an Extra Large.
Yo Mama's So Fat...,1,Nasa plans to send a team of ten men and women to colonize her surface by the year 2019...
[MommaJokes] Base profiles unmarried age 21+ online. The base is available only 2 hours.,1,
Yo momma so fat...,1,"When she got in the car if flipped over like the Flintmobile.
"
Yo momma so fat,1,Dr. Otto Gunther Octavius couldn't handle her ass.
The Best yo Momma Jokes,1,
Yo momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat (Christmas edition),1,Santa gives her coal cause she ate Rudolf the Red Nosed Reindeer 
Yo Momma so fat,1,she takes up both sides of the family
Yo momma so fat and smelly,1,She has to wash her clothes in a water boiling nuclear reactor.
Yo mamma so fat,1,Her blood type is Rocky Road.
Yo mama so nasty,1,"after yo daddy kiss her, he wash out his mouth with sour milk"
Doctor Certified Joke,1,
Yo momma so fat..,1,"I took a picture of her last Christmas, and it's still printing."
Yo Momma So Dumb,1,She asked if her drug test was multiple choice
"Yo momma so fat,",1,"she sings ""wrecking ball"" when playing on a swingset."
Yo momma's so fat..,1,"..when she walks backwards, she needs to make reversing sounds ""Beep! Beep! Beep!"""
Yo momma so fat,1,"when she sat on an iPhone, she broke Apple too."
Yo Momma so Noob,1,she actually *fell outside the house 4 times* when she heard **fallout4**
Your mama's so classless..,1,She could be a marxist utopia.
Yo momma so stupid,1,She strangled herself with a cordless phone
Yo Mama So Ugly...,1,Yo daddy takes her to work and makes her hang out all day just so he don't have to kiss her goodbye.
Yo Mama so hype,1,She would sacrifice her kids to the vegan plant god.
Yo Mama so poor,1,She keeps her food stamp card in her money clip.
Yo momma so short...,1,...that she poledances on lollipops.
Yo Momma So Broke And Nasty,1,"She like a goalie, only changes her pads after three periods "
Your mama so stupid,1,She sold her flat screen t.v. to pay her cable bill
Yo Mama so fat,1,She collects water from the Oort Cloud and thats why shes always lookin so sweaty.
Yo Momma so fat...,1,But I did her anyway
Yo momma so fat..,1,She won't fit in Moogs Honda
Yo Mama so faithful,1,I don't leave her site.
Yo Mama so fat,1,When her cat died it took awhile for her to turn the other cheek.
Whats the difference between Chuck Norris jokes and jokes about your momma?,1,Chuck Norris jokes are all made up
Yo Momma so big...,1,She needs a crane just to lift her snacks
Yo mama so stupid,1,"when she takes a shit, she picks dog poop off her lawn!"
6 Websites For Mom’s and Healthy Baby’s And Children Skills,1,
Yo momma sits around,1,"When yo momma sits around the house, she sits around the house."
Yo mama so fat,1,Her magnetic field is shielding the Earth from solar wind
Yo mama so fat,1,"I uploaded a picture of her, and I exceeded my 300gb data cap!"
Yo Momma so nasty...,1,but at least the showers she takes are golden
Yo Momma so fat....,1,She irons her pants in the driveway
Yo Mama so ghetto,1,She stopped showin class after the 9th grade.
Yo mommas so stupid,1,She bought tickets to xbox live
yo momma so poor...,1,...she can only afford a sandwish
Yo Mamma so hairy....,1,That bigfoot takes pictures of her
Yo momma such a pig,1,Kermit the Frog asked me for her number
Yo mama so dumb...,1,"When the government wanted to brainwash her, they only needed an enema."
Yo momma so ugly,1,"That she make Scorpion in *Mortal Kombat* yell, ""STAY OVER THERE!!""

my 9 yo nephew came up with this. as for why a 9 yo's playing MK, I blame his mother."
[Android] This Yo Mama Jokes app has jokes sorted by categories,1,[deleted]
yo momma so fat...,1,...she uses the freeway for a slip n slide
I would tell you something about your Momma...,1,but I dont fuck and tell
Yo mama so black,1,She has to wear white gloves when eating tootsie rolls to prevent her from eating her fingers.
You Momma so fat...,1,you need a pokeflute to wake her up
Yo Mamas so stupid,1,She thought the kid coming over with cornrows was going to bring her food.
Yo Momma so fat,1,her asscrack like the marianas
Yo Momma so valuable...,1,no wonder they call her Precious
Yo Momma so fat,1,She couldn't sit with her sister on the airplane
Yo Momma so stupid,1,she buys one ply 
"Let's get off ""Yo mamma's""",1,cause I just got of yours.
Yo momma so clean and hygenic,1,"when she came to her porn set, she brought her own cup"
Yo momma so old...,1,She has an autographed version of the Bible.
Yo mama so ugly,1,"Her reflection said "" I quit"""
Yo mama so ugly...,1,"when men give her compliments they start with: ""no homo, but I like your hair"""
Yo mamma so dumb,1,She took an I.Q. test and got a Q stuck in her eye
Yo mamma so supid,1,She got trapped in a grocery store and starved to death
Yo mama so fat &amp; greasy...,1,She got a job at Denny's rubbing pancakes and waffles on her forehead.
Yo momma so skinny...,1,She gotta run around in the shower to get wet 
Yo momma so fat...,1,...she fell on the floor and rocked herself to sleep tryna get back up.
Your mamma so stupid,1,She still pay for aol.
Yo momma so fat..,1,that when she saw a school bus full of white kids she yelled “STOP THAT TWINKIE!!”
Yo momma so poor...,1,Her front and back door are on the same hinge
Almost done with...,1,
Your mama so black..,1,They mine her for coal.
Yo momma missing so many teeth,1,it looks like her tongue is in jail
Yo momma so fat,1,She dead
Yo Momma So Halloween,1,
Your mother is so fat,1,[deleted]
How was Copper wire created?,1,Yo momma and a Dutchman tried to pick up a penny at the same time!
Funniest Parenting Tweets: What Moms And Dads Said On Twitter This Week,1,[deleted]
Yo mamma so fat...,1,...she broke Allstate's hands
Yo momma so poor..,1,"I dropped a piece of bread in her house and a bunch of cockroaches and rats came out singing ""Clap yo hands, stomp yo feet, praise the lawd we got sum thin to eat!"""
"""Like"" my pumpkin so I can get office bragging rights! https://Instagram.com/p/9eCu-jvgKe/",1,[removed]
Yo momma so poor...,1,She went to McDonald's and put a shake on layaway.
Yo mommas so stupid,1,She bought tickets to xbox live
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
yo mamma so stupid.........,1,she sold the car for gas money.
yo momma so fat...,1,...she gets her toe nails painted at Earl Scheib.
Yo momma blind,1,"Talking bout ""I see what you mean"""
YO MOMMA.. SO STUPID..,1,she put catfood down her pants to feed her pussy!
Yo Momma's So Unfamiliar With The Gym...,1,She calls it the James.
You mama so ugly...,1,Her portraits hung themselves.
Yo mamma so stupid she uses you mamma jokes as comebacks,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so nasty,1,She puts ice in her panties to keep the crabs fresh
Yo mamma so small...,1,She can hang-glide on a Dorito.
You Momma So Fat,1,"She fell in love

and BROKE it!!!!"
Yo momma so fat...,1,"She needs 50 watches, one for each timezone she's in."
Yo mamma so fat,1,"when she wears a rain coat people yell ""TAXI!"""
Yo momma so poor,1,when she goes to KFC she has to lick other people's fingers
Yo Momma so ugly...,1,She can trick or treat over the telephone!
Yo momma so ugly...,1,"After seeing her, I didn't have a self-esteem anymore."
Yo mama is so ugly...,1,She makes onions cry
Yo mamma so stupid....,1,She brought a spoon to the Super Bowl 
"Yo mama so bald,",1,"When she puts on a turtleneck, she looks like roll-on deodorant."
The Pharcyde - Ya Mama,1,
yo momma so fat...,1,...the back of her neck look like a pack of franks.
Yo momma just like a toilet,1,"Short, white, and full of shit"
Yo momma so poor,1,She wears a cardboard box and calls it a mobile home 
Your momma's so nice,1,[removed]
Yo momma so nasty,1,I called her for phone sex and got an ear infection
Your momma so poor,1,She can't afford a two story cheerio box 
Yo Momma is so fat..,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat,1,I looked her up in the dictionary and her definition took up a whole section.
Dear sir,1,"Well, I do say that your mother is so grievously unattractive that when she desires to gaze out of her window that she recieves a citation for revealing her posterior."
your momma so fat,1,she fell in love and broke it
Yo mamma so skinny,1,She can hula-hoop with a Cheerio.
Yo momma so fat...,1,"Jabba the Hutt said ""DAAMN!""  "
Yo momma is like a joint,1,she gets passed around 
Yo Mama so stupid,1,she thought speed dial was an exercise
yo momma so dumb...,1,...she thought a quarterback was a refund.
Yo momma so stupid,1,she sold her car for gas money
Your momma so fat,1,"She tripped over Walmart, stumbled over K-Mart, and landed right on Target! "
Yo mama so old...,1,She's how Vlad the Impaler really got his nickname.
How can you find Yo Mamma in a crowd?,1,She's the one with a mattress strapped to her back.
Yo momma so fat..,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so fat...,1,She takes selfies in Panorama mode
Your momma is so stupid,1,She thinks fruit punch is a gay boxer.
Your momma,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so cross-eyed...,1,When she cries tears run down her back. 
Yo mama be like Oxygen,1,she'll binds with EVERYTHING
Good Job just like my daddy!,1,
"Yo' mama so fat, that she should see a doctor because diabetes is a real problem...",1,
"(Funniest if you're from the south) Your mama is so nasty,",1,every time she takes a bath the bitch makes roux!
Yo momma so fat ...,1,"When she falls of the bed, she falls on both sides."
Zodiac signs what a coincident,1,
Yo mamma so ugly...,1,"...when she said ""mirror mirror, on the wall, the mirror said ""you're the ugliest of all."""
My 21 yrs boyfriend made first cup of coffee this morning,1,
Yo mamma so dumb...,1,She tried to throw a rock at the ground and missed.
What a Perfect Match !,1,
Why Jacky Deak Akay adopted this cat??,1,
Yo Momma's so stupid,1,She dialed 911 on the microwave
fabulous workout by Kitty,1,
Yo mama so fat...,1,...the three blind men thought she was the elephant.
Yo mamma is so cheap...,1,"...when she takes a dollar out of her purse, George Washington blinks at the sunlight."
Yo momma such a nasty crack head bitch,1,The Most Interesting Man in the World has [this](http://i.imgur.com/zBFLNLl.png) to say about her. 
yo momma so fat...,1,"...that when she stepped on the scale, it said ""To be continued."""
"Yo mama jokes go waaayy back, It's so natural ya'll.",1,
funny animals compilation i love that that's &lt;3 :D,1,
Your momma so fat,1,Not even the Mexicans can climb over her
superb mom jokerings,1,[removed]
Yo momma so fat...,1,"She caused a massive pile-up at the waterslide. After rescuers dumped gallons of dish soap and baby oil down the chute, she finally farted and broke free. The resulting Tsunami and methane explosion injured many and destroyed the park. "
Yo Mama's so ugly,1,"After she conceived you, her husband had her arrested for rape."
Yo Momma so stupid...,1,She didn't abort you
Your momma so fat,1,She uses a pool noodle as a tampon
Yo momma so fat,1,She uses a mattress as a maxipad
Yo Mama Joke! Funny as hell.,1,
Yo momma so fat,1,She fell in love and broke it. 
Yo momma's so fat...,1,She eats biscuits like Tic-Tacs!
Very Funny and Entertaining Must Watch Mission Impossible Squirrel Edition,1,
Yo mama's so heavy....,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma so poor....,1,"Yo Momma's so poor,  she was kickin a can down the street,  I asked her what she was doing and she said she was moving."
Yo momma's armpits are so hairy...,1,it looks like she got Buckwheat in a headlock
To momma so stupid...,1,She took a ruler to bed to measure how long she slept.
Your momma is so fat...,1,"When she goes driving, the Mercedes bends."
Yo momma's so hairy.....,1,That when you were born you received a carpet burn
"11 ""Yo Mama"" Jokes.",1,"Yo mama's so fat, she drives a spandex car.  
Yo mama's so stupid, she tried waking up a sleeping bag.  
Yo mama's thigh's are so big, when she walks, they gotta talk to each-other. ""I'll go by, &amp; then I'll let you go by."".  
Yo mama's breath kicks so bad, the ice cream man gave her a Listerine Popsicle.  
Yo mama's so fat, she puts mayonnaise on her Tylenol.  
Yo mama's ""V"" is so neppy, her crabs drive dune-buggies.  
Yo mama's so big, she takes. (I gotta find out what this one, sorry, as of right meow, I'm not sure, sorry.)  
Yo mama's house is so small, the ""Welcome Mat"" just says: ""Well?"".  
Yo mama's so fat, she uses 2 greyhound buses for roller-blades.  
Yo mama's glasses are so thick, when she looks @ the sun, her eyebrows catch on fire.  
Yo mama's are so crossed-eyed, that- That, she- They're cross-eyed.  
Eh, I'm done, now, sorry.  
Edit: If you tell me where I got these from, you're awesome. (&amp; no, not from here.) "
Yo mama's so slutty,1,"When she opens a window, it instantly becomes a glory hole."
Yo momma so fat ...,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma so stupid,1,She got a peep-hole installed on her sliding door
Beat it bro!,1,[deleted]
Your momma's like a brick...,1,She's flat on both sides and gets laid by Mexicans!
Yo Momma so out of touch.,1,She thinks 'Welcome to the Jungle' is a synonym for a hairy vagina. 
Your momma so old....,1,she has an autographed copy of the bible.
Yo momma so ugly...,1,She had to get a baby drunk just to breastfeed.
"Ops Mom arrested in Washington, DC",1,[deleted]
Yo mommas like a christmas tree,1,come christmas everyone likes to get their balls on her
Yo momma got so pimples...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma is so old...,1,"...when someone told her to act her age, she died."
Yo momma so fat,1,Yo momma so fat it took a whole week to get nation wide on her side. 
Yo MAMA is so SLUTTY,1,"When a guy tried to give her a STD, she gave him 6 more."
I think this belongs here...,1,
Yo mama's so fat...,1,She uses highways for a slip-and-slide
Yo momma so fat...,1,when she got on my case she smashed it flat.
Your mother is so nasty,1,"She watched two girls one cup, thought it was a trailer, and is looking for the full movie."
Yo mama so fat,1,She jumped up and got stuck!
Yo Mamma is such a slut...,1,"That I woulda been your dad, but the dog beat me up the stairs!"
Yo Mamma so nasty....,1,".... when she takes her panties off, it sounds like velcro!"
Yo mamma so fat...,1,She died of untreated diabeetus
Yo momma so nasty...,1,"...dude tried to give her herpes, but the herpes clung on for dear life."
The family ...tree,1,
Yo Momma So Old...,1,"her ""baby's first footprints"" were found at Dinosaur National Park in Idaho."
Yo Momma So Fat...,1,Her school picture took up three pages of the yearbook. 
Yo mama's so old...,1,Her social security number is 1.
Yo mamma so slutty,1,"When she bakes cookies, they are called whoreos"
Yo momma so ugly,1,Her face hurts my feelings 
Yo momma so ugly,1,it looks like someone set her face on fire and tried to put it out with a fork
"Hey everybody, let's get off mamas",1,[deleted]
Yo mamas so fat...,1,"
She has early onset diabetes and will probably die before you reach your 13th birthday!"
Yo momma so dirty,1,when she takes her panties off it sounds like Velcro
Your mamma head so big...,1,"She wears chandeliers as earrings and uses a toilet brush to clean her ears out.
"
Yo momma so fat,1,she makes moby dick look like a tictac
Yo mama so black,1,she gets marked absent at night school
Yo momma so backdated,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma is so Dumb...,1,...She thinks Yo Momma jokes are funny
Yo momma so fat,1,"she have other, smaller fat women orbiting her."
yo momma so fat,1,they use one of those planes that fly across the beach with advertisements to tuck her in at night
Yo momma so ugly,1,"Even Freddy Kruger said ""fuck that""."
Your mammas,1,So fat she gets fed with a slingshot!
Yo momma is so fat,1,She is on a diet now due to health problems
Yo momma's mouth is so big,1,[deleted]
Yo mamma so fat,1,God couldn't lift her spirits
Yo mamma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo mamma is so fat..,1,.. The only belt that can fit her is Orians belt!
Ya mum,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma's Breath,1,Smell so bad when she yawns her teeth duck
Yo momma is so hairy...,1,...her titties look like coconuts.
Yo Momma So Fat,1,"Yo Momma so fat, that when she hits the dance floor the band skips. "
i'd sleep with your mom but,1,[deleted]
yo momma's like,1,"a turtle, once she's on her back she's fucked."
Yo momma so slutty,1,She don't leave the house without her kneepads.
Your momma so short,1,There's a mini Stonehenge monument on stage that is in danger of being crushed by her. 
You're monma is soe stooppid,1,sShe rote thes daym joek. 
Yo momma so fat...,1,Her patronus is a cake!
Yo momma so old,1,She likes to take long walks across the beaches since she remembers crawling out of the ocean
Yo momma sooo fat....,1,"I saw her come out of the water at the beach, and some guy with a harpoon was stuck on her back tangled in her bikini straps."
Yo mama so fat,1,It takes her two trips to haul ass
Yo mama is like a super hero.,1,"She's fast, helpful, and wears skin tight clothing."
Yo momma so fat,1,Ruxin from The League wouldn't have done her in highschool... 
Yo momma so hairy,1,She uses a weed whacker to shave. 
Yo momma so ugly,1,Everyone calls her Meg Griffin. 
Yo MAMA is so DAMN stupid...,1,"She asked me where in America China is, and why everything is made there."
Yo mama so fat and stupid,1,She thinks babies are made by Doctors alone.
Yo momma so fat,1,when she went to rehab the whole world was by her side
Yo Mama is so fat we had to build another universe just for her.,1,[removed]
yo momma so fat and old...,1,"When God said ""Let there be light"", he asked her to move out of the way"
Yo mama so fat...,1,she has to put the scale on top of her head to not crush it
Yo momma just like a Big Mac.....,1,Full of fat and only worth a dollar
Yo momma so damn hairy,1,She clogs my sink after washing her hands 
Yo momma so fat,1,Diabetes has her
Yo momma is so fat...,1,she has a reduced life expectancy and is likely to face many health related complications from her type 2 diabetes.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,She thought Taco Bell was a Mexican phone company 
From my friend to his professor..,1,[deleted]
Yo Mamma is So Fat,1,"She fills up the tub, then turns on the water."
Yo mama is so ugly,1,when she became a stripper she became a millionare because people paid her to put her pants back on!
Yo momma is so poor...,1,"That when I used the paper plates she said, ""Don't use the fine china!"""
Yo momma so fat...,1,Whenever she at a party children try to jump on her
Yo momma so nasty..,1,when I was over last night I had to eat blue waffles
Yo momma so stupid,1,She tried to put m&amp;m's in alphabetical order. 
Your mamma is so ugly...,1,Every time she smiles an angel gets aids.
Yo mama so ugly,1,Her stripper name is 'STOP'
Your mother is so fat,1,"That a stormtrooper can't miss her.
"
Yo momma so country,1,She can suck dick and chew tobacco at the same time and still know what to spit and what to swallow. 
Yo mama is so fat..,1,"When she sat on a quarter, a booger popped out of George Washington's nose."
Yo mama is so fat,1,"When she goes to the beach, Greenpeace activists try to push her back in the water"
Yo mamma so fat...,1,"when her beeper goes off, people think she's backing up."
yo mama is so ugly..,1,that people put pictures of her in their cars so it would scare away people trying to jack your car.
Yo Momma so Fat,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so poor,1,The dog begs the roaches for scraps instead of her. 
Yo mama so old...,1,That her kindergarten school picture is a cave painting
Yo mama so old...,1,She sat next to Moses in third grade.
Yo momma so old...,1,I told her to act her age and the bitch died.
Your mother is so fat and old,1,Scientists believe she was the asteroid that killed off the dinosaurs.
Strange. I thought the character's name was Peggy.,1,
Yo mama so poor,1,"i went to your house and rang the doorbell and she stuck her head out the window and yelled out ""ding dong!"" "
You mother is so nasty,1,She stops by the sperm bank for her protein shakes.
Your momma so FAT,1,She can't save files larger than 4GB
YOUR MOTHER IS SO OVERWEIGHT,1,THE DOCTOR RECOMMENDED THAT SHE SHOULD EAT MORE FRUITS AND VEGETABLES!!
YOUR MOTHER IS SO MORBIDLY OBESE,1,SHE HAS TYPE 2 DIABETES
Your mamma is so smart...,1,She gave you up for adoption.
Yo momma so stupid,1,She went to Pizza Inn and asked for a room
Yo momma so old...,1,That her memory is in black and white!
Yo mama so ugly,1,She went into a haunted house and came out with an application. 
Yo mama so fat,1,"When she jumps into a pool, her splash attacks are super effective."
Yo mama's so big...,1,"When she plays hopscotch it sounds like, 'Nevada, Colorado, South Dakota, Missouri...'"
Your mother is so fat,1,"When she went to the beach, people threw water on her and tried to feed her fish.

I'm calling your mother a whale."
Yo momma is so poor...,1,that the rainbows in her neighborhood are in black and white.
Yo momma so fat,1,that light bends round her
Yo mommas face is like the moon,1,Pale and filled with craters.
Yo momma so fat,1,the ice from her soda sank the Titanic.
Yo momma so old,1,"When God said ""let there be light"" she flipped the switch."
Yo momma is so nice....,1,She baked me cookies and washed my clothes.....after we did the nasty like 20 times. Bitch is insatiable! 
Yo mama's so nasty...,1,"She found out what 'Blue Waffle' was, and still didn't change her order"
Yo momma so fat,1,Earth has two moons
Yo momma so dumb,1,[removed]
Yo momma is so skinny...,1,her nipples touch.
We ANIMATED the best yo mama jokes,1,
Yo momma so fat,1,She gonna bust the Hamburglar out of prison for one last heist. 
Yo momma is like a Whirlpool,1,She takes hella loads inside of her 
Yo momma so tall,1,[deleted]
Yo mama smells like,1,...day old hot dog water. 
Yo mamma so ugly..,1,planned parenthood uses her picture to induce abortions. 
Yo momma so dumb..,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so black,1,She listed on the blacklist as 3.🌚
Yo Mama So Stupid...,1,She takes toilet paper to a crap shoot.
Yo mama so fat...,1,.... her wedding video had to be done in IMAX!
Yo momma so ugly her yearbook picture is in brail,1,
Yo mama so fat she has temper-pedic tampons.,1,
Yo momma's so old...,1,...she knew Burger King when he was a prince.
Yo mama is so ugly.,1,She makes onions cry.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,Her memory foam mattress forgot!
Momma Cops Episode 1: The Hooker,1,
You mama's so fat...,1,she can't even fit in a 180° panorama.
Yo momma's SO HAIRY,1,Her snapchats end up on Monster Quest
Yo mamma is like a brick...,1,"Shes flat, square and gets laid by mexicans."
Yo mama so fat...,1,...she thinks the world revolves around her (and rightfully so!)
Yo mamma's breasts are so saggy...,1,...children use them to play double dutch.
Yo momma sucks so much dick,1,She putting a rainbow on my dick from every time she change her lipstick color 
Yo momma so stupid...,1,She had to study for her pregnancy test
Yo Momma is so fat...,1,... you have to use forced perspective to fit her in the family photos. 
Your momma is sooo FAT...,1,That every time she wears her X-Men shirt helicopters keep trying to land on her back!
Yo momma so fat...,1,"Her license plate says ""Oversize load."""
Yo momma so fat...,1,.. I can't write more that 4gb on her at once
Yo momma so slow...,1,"When she runs a race, they bring the finish line to her!"
"Yo momma said, ""You can tie me to the bed....",1,"..and do whatever you want...""

So I tied her to the bed and **left**"
Your mom is the world,1,I fuck the world
Your mom is so fat--,1,"--you're adopted. Your real mom died of heart attack, and you were left at the orphanage."
meow,1,[removed]
Yo momma so inbred,1,YOU actually her momma. And you fat and stupid btw 
Yo momma so loose,1,She tried to jump a fence and cut her lips
Yo' momma is so fat...,1,... when stormtroopers shoot on her they never miss.
Yo mamma so fat,1,I fucked her 2 hours ago and she still jigglin
Idiots who the world will never forget,1,
Wasn't yo momma the stunt double in that 90's movie?,1,
When a 'your momma' joke backfires...,1,
Yo momma so stupid...,1,She cut herself with Occam's razor.
Yo momma is like sheep...,1,because she fucks sheep.
You mothers breasts sag with such severity....,1,"..that the late, great, surrealist artist Salvador Dali mistook them for clocks. "
Your mumma is as funny as this subreddit,1,
Yo momma so fucking illiterate,1,"She looked at the YMCA and said, ""look! They spelled Macy's wrong"" "
Yo momma so fat...,1,everytime she walk anywhere you will hear someone playing a tuba...
Yo Christian momma soooo fat...,1,In the beginning Ronald McDonald created her from a McRib.
Yo momma sooo ugly.....,1,Her parents got an apology letter from the condom factory.
You're mother is soooo ugly.....,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,She gonna get type two diabetes 
"Yo momma so fat and old that when God said, ""Let there be light,"" he asked your mother to move out of the way.",1,
Yo momma so fat she gotta get a special plane ticket....,1,
Yo momma is so fat...,1,...I took a picture of her last Christmas...and it's still printing.
Yo Momma d Airplane Pilot,1,"Yo Momma D Aiplane Pilot.... 

Fly Plane Upside down. 
Have Crack Up.
"
Yo mamma so hairy,1,She got Afros on her nipples
Your Mom is so fat...,1,...it takes two poké flutes to wake her up.
Yo momma so nasty....,1,Her camel toe got an ingrown nail
Your Mama's so fat...,1,"When she breaks wind, it stays broke"
Yo mamma so easy...,1,The easy button keeps a button with yo mommas face on it.
"Yo mama so fat,",1,"She jump in the pool and got stuck

WAIT WAIT
Yo mama so fat she jump in da OCEAN and got stuck

WAIT WAIT
Yo mama sooooo fat,
She JUMPED and got stuck"
Yo momma so ugly,1,Earth became uninhabitable
Yo momma so fat.....,1,When she falls she always lands on the buttered side
Yo mama's so ugly,1,She had to blindfold yo dad to make you.
Yo mamma's breath so bad,1,"When she yawns, her teeth duck. "
Yo mama so crazy,1,She haunts Freddy Krueger's dreams.
Yo mamma teeth so yellow,1,I can't believe it's not butter
Yo momma so dead,1,that I am literally fucking her skull.
Yo mama so fat,1,she plays pool with the planets
Erybody know yo momma too big...,1,"when she called a cab, they sent a flatbed and a forklift...."
Yo momma's so dumb...,1,She thinks Dick Cheney is how you keep a man around.
Yo momma so fat...,1,She jumped into the Guadalupe River and...well let's just say it's not a river anymore...
Yo momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo mama just like a ham sandwich...,1,"fast, easy, and on the kitchen counter in five minutes"
Yo mama's so stupid,1,She got into a fight with someone over the phone and ended up in a coma.
Yo momma so crazy,1,"Even ISIS says ""woah..."""
Momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
"Yo mamma so fat, she went skydiving and...",1,
Yo momma so dumb...,1,....she thinks submissions on r/funny are funny
Your Mom is so fat...,1,"...you completed your first marathon before reaching the end of her birth canal.

...Superman and the Flash race around her.

...in the Middle Ages she was believed to be flat.

...she sat on a Nokia phone; and it broke.

...when she goes camping the Bears hide their food.

...she is, literally, stuck in her current job.

...when she farts in the tub, the bubbles come out the toilet."
Yo momma so fat....,1,"When she smashes the homies, they stay smashed

"
Yo Mumma's so dumb...,1,even redditors don't correct her spelling
Yo Mamma so old,1,Yo momma so old she forgot she has Jesus Christ's placenta in her Jewelry Box.
Yo mama so slutty...,1,She yells out every name in town during sex.
Yo mama so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma's Head So Big,1,"She tripped while she was walking down the beach, and the tide went out."
Yo Momma so sexy,1,Na im lying she ugly af
Yo momma so short,1,You can see her feet on her drivers license.
Yo momma so fat n ugly....,1,When she walkin out of the zoo she got tranquilized
Yo momma so ugly,1,she has to wear a mask to catch a cold.
Yo momma so fat...,1,... she jumped up in the air and got stuck!
"Yo momma is so fat, stupid, lazy, ugly, and poor...",1,[deleted]
Yo momma got so much gas....,1,"When she breaks wind, windows break!"
Yo momma so foul...,1,her pussy has it's own toll-free helpline Dial 1800-STANKASS
Yo momma so fat,1,She jumped out in front of my car and I ran out of gas trying to swerve around her
Yo mamma is so stupid,1,She thought AIDS was a button on the VCR
So stupid..,1,Your Momma so stupid.. She's sitting on TV and Watching sofa..
Yo mamma is so Fat..,1,The only belt that fits her is Orion's Belt!
Yo momma is so crooked,1,she has to screw her socks on.
Yo Momma so dumb...,1,She went to a *two for one* sale and paid twice
Yo mama so FAT,1,[deleted]
Your momma is so basic,1,She has a Ph of over 7.
Yo mama so ugly,1,Yo mama so ugly people throw money at her at strip clubs to keep her clothes on.
Yo momma is so fat,1,She takes her selfies with Google maps
Yo momma head so big,1,"Yo momma head so big, she went to Disneyworld it was confused with Epcot center."
Yo momma so fat,1,"Yo Momma so fat, when it snows she is host to the winter olympics."
Your momma so poor...,1,Your momma is so poor that she started to call giving oral breakfast.
Yo mamma recognizes STDs,1,by taste.
Yo momma so ugly,1,"Yo momma so ugly, she has to tie a pork chop to her neck so the dog will play with her."
Your momma's head so small..,1,She uses a tea bag as a pillow.
Yo momma so ugly,1,"Yo momma so ugly, she has to screw her hat on every morning!"
My momma is so fat,1,that she can't even smack a dent in a pack of butter because then she has to smack herself in the tummy because she's as fat as butter and not even the diet version
Yo mamma so fat,1,She wakes up in sections.
Your momma so poor,1,"I stepped on a cigarette at your house and she yelled ""who turned off the heat?!"""
Yo mamma so drunk,1,"She's almost half as drunk as mine.

\**sob**"
Yo mamma's so stupid,1,She threw a rock at the ground and missed.
Your momma so stupid,1,She sits on the T.V and watches the couch 
Yo mom is so big that...,1,She uses a ten-foot-pole for a selfie stick!
Your momma is so fat,1,That she has 85% blockage in her arteries and diabetes.
Your mom is so fat....,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so stupid...,1,That she pronounces Nigeria wrong all the damn time.
Yo momma is so fat,1,She jumped up into the air and got stuck!
Yo Mama so Po',1,She can't afford the other o an r!
my mom is like a supper mom,1,[deleted]
yo momma so stupid,1,she strangled herself with a cordless phone
Your mommas so ugly,1,She has to sneak up on a glass of water
Yo mama so fat,1,"When she wears a Malcolm X shirt, helicopters try to land on her."
Your mommas so old,1,She farts dust
Yo mama is so hairy....,1,She speaks wookie.
yo momma's so poor,1,"the welcome mat just says ""wel...."""
yo momma's so stupid.,1,she tried waking up a sleeping bag.
Yo Momma's so bald...,1,"When she takes a shower, she gets brain washed."
Yo mama so ugly...,1,Yo mama so ugly when Santa came down the chimney he said ho! ho! hoooollly shit!
Next Generation,1,
Yo momma is so ugly..,1,"She practices birth control by leaving the lights on

Her dentist treats her by mail

Her parents had to tie a porkchop around her neck so the dog would play with her. "
Your momma is so short...,1,she can't even get high.
Yo Momma so hairy..,1,[deleted]
Your mother is so stupid,1,"That she can't comprehend basic arithmetic!


Burn🔥🔥🔥"
Yo momma so ugly,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so poor,1,[deleted]
Yo mamma is so fat,1,"When she jumps off a ship people scream ""LAND HO!"""
Yo mama's so old..,1,She has a separate entrance for black dicks.
Yo momma's teeth are so yellow,1,"When she walks down the sidewalk and smiles at someone, traffic begins to slow."
Yo mama soooo black...,1,She sweats motor oil.
Yo momma so fat,1,Her nickname is DAAAMN!
Yo mama so dumb,1,"it takes her 3 hours to watch ""60 Minutes"""
Yo momma so fat,1,her yearbook picture is still printing
Your mum is so fat,1,It takes 2 loading screens to see all of her
Your momma's so fat,1,"if you throw something at her, it'll go into orbit."
Youy momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo mamas like PepBoys....,1,Does everything for less
Yo mama so fat,1,it takes an archeologist to find her asshole
Home is Where…,1,
Yo momma is so poor,1,you had to eat your cereal with a fork so you saved on milk.
Yo' Mama is so fat her cereal bowl comes with a lifeguard,1,
Yo mama is so ugly,1,"Yo mama is so ugly, when she steps into the bathtub all the water jumps out "
Yo mama so ugly,1,she gives mirrors nightmares. 
Yo momma is...,1,"So old she farts dust and she has Jesus's beeper number

So dumb she thought a quarterback was a refund

So ugly she hangs meat around her neck the dog will play with her"
Yo momma so fat,1,The bitch broke her leg and gravy poured out
Candy Blast Saga Check out this game!,1,
Yo mama,1,Yo mama so hairy mosquitoes need lawn mowers! 
Yo momma so black,1,She sweats coffee 
Yo mama so fat..,1,She sat on her iPhone and Siri said bitch get the fuck off me I can't breath
Yo momma so stupid,1,Even Jon Snow says that bitch knows nothing 
Yo momma is so black,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so FAT.,1,That her neck has more rolls than Olive Garden.
Yo mama so old....,1,..[her breastmilk turned to dust](http://i.imgur.com/RYXZP5S.gif)
"Yo mama is soooo ugly, that Tiger Woods wouldn't ""Cheetah"", but instead commit suicide...",1,[deleted]
"Yo mama so fat, that she uses the equator as her belt...",1,
Yo Momma is so blonde...,1,"Yo Momma is so blonde that they made up jokes about her.
(Yeah, that's my ""Yo Momma Joke."")"
Yo mama so fat,1,She made pizza hut the #1 seller in the USA
R/funny traffic PSA,1,"I want to say thank you for taking the time to check out yo momma. All these jokes would not be possible with out you filthy sons and daughters. Feel free to post as many high quality momma jokes as possible. Once again, thank you for the support. We need a lot of it to keep yo momma off the ground!"
Yo Mama...,1,Is so poor and fat that she goes to her email account just to eat the spam.
"Yo momma""s feet so big...",1,"Her Nike shoes have ""Nikelodeon"" written on the side."
"Yo mama's so old, she has a separate entrance for black dicks.",1,[deleted]
Yo mamas like a bowling ball...,1,"She gets fingered, thrown in the gutter, and keeps coming back."
"Welp, guess I'm not drying my hands.",1,
"Yo momma so fat, her alarm clock has a catapult.",1,[deleted]
Yo mama so fat when she sat on my iPad she made a flat screen tv!,1,[removed]
Yo mama so fat that her Polo shirt had a real horse on it.,1,
When you are smaller than your food,1,
"Your mama so fat, when she twerk, she became a wrecking ball.",1,[deleted]
"Yo Mama so fat, that she gets free WiFi. Because she's already world wide",1,
Yo Momma so fat...,1,...that even Dora can't exlpore her. 
Yo momma's teef so yellow...,1,When she drinks water it turns into lemonade
Yo momma so ugly...,1,"When she applied for a job at the haunted house they said, ""sorry, no professionals."""
Yo Mama so fat that she gave dracula diabetes.,1,[removed]
Bicycle,1,[deleted]
Freebase,1,[removed]
Yo momma is like this yo,1,
Yo Momma So Fat,1,She broke y'alls family tree
Yo momma so poor...,1,[deleted]
yo momma so fat,1,"her nickname is ""damn!"""
Yo mamas like a shotgun...,1,Two cocks and she blows
Your mother is so fat,1,scientists refer to the outside of her anus an Event Horizon.
Your mother is so fat,1,she is quite unhealthy and will probably die soon.
Your mother is so fat,1,"When she dressed as a penguin for Halloween, PETA tried to throw her in the whale tank at Sea World."
Yo momma so fat...,1,....other fat people jog around her to lose weight.
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo mommy so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so fat...,1,"that when she jumps for joy, she get stuck."
What's the difference between your momma and a washing machine?,1,the washing machine doesn't keep calling me after I drop a load in it
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so fat...,1,[deleted]
Yo mama so poor,1,"I saw her kicking a can, and when I asked her what she was doing she said, ""Moving"""
Your momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo momma's so ugly,1,"Well, look at you."
yo momma's rated e for everyone,1,
Yo momma so dumb,1,She was staring at OJ for an hour. I asked her why; she told me it said concentrate.
Yo momma so skinny,1,She can hula hoop with a cheerio
Yo momma so meta,1,She told me this joke.
"Yo momma so ugly,",1,"that her stripper name is, ""STOP!"""
Your mother is so black...,1,"She had to get her tattoos with White-Out,"
Yo mama so nasty,1,"that mike rowe took a look at her and went ""no."""
Help My Stepmom,1,
you momma is so fat and stupid,1,"when she first heard of the super bowl, she said: ""finally, a toilet that fits!"""
Yo momma's so fat...,1,She thought the Power Rangers were skittles
Your momma is so poor,1,"I spit out my gum in her yard and the cockroaches came out dancing and singing, ""clap your hands, stomp your feet, praise the lord we got something to eat!"" "
Yo momma got no arms,1,And she still be trying to give a round of applause 
Yo momma so fat,1,[deleted]
Yo momma so poor,1,She eats her coco puffs with a fork to save milk
Yo momma so dumb,1,Yo momma so dumb she tried to buy tickets to Xbox live
Yo momma is like a bowling ball...,1,"She gets picked up, fingered, thrown in the gutter and then comes back for more."
Yo Momma such a anorexic crack ho,1,The free clinic stands her by the window for a chest X-ray
Yo mamma's so fat,1,that when I saw her in the street and swerved to avoid her I ran out of gas.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,http://a.easyfile.ga/frgsra.jpg
Yo momma so skinny,1,she can hang glide on a Dorito.
Yo momma so old,1,she can remember when the dead sea was just sick.
Nailed!!,1,[deleted]
YO Moma so fat and old when the God said...,1,"YO Moma so fat and old that when the God said ""Let there be light""; he asked your mom to move away."
Yo mamma so fat (math),1,"Yo mamma's so fat, she's 123 pounds...factorial!"
"Yo mommaJokes are getting so old, and overused by a bunch of teenage boys",1,Just like yo mamma
Yo momma has...,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma So Nasty,1,She Sucked Your Daddy's Dick Then Kissed You Goodnight
Yo momma's so stupid...,1,...she put two quarters in her ears and thought she was listening to 50 Cent.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,They gonna have Ronald McDonald identify the body.
Yo mama is so poor...,1,she went to the dollar store and asked if they had layaway. 
Yo momma so fat..,1,She wears three different watches for each time zone she's in.
Yo momma so fat...,1,"When she went into space, she didn't float"
Yo momma such a ho...,1,
Yo momma so fat...,1,She has poor health and low self-esteem.
Yo Momma So Black...,1,..That No light Can Escape From Her
Yo Momma is so poor...,1,she can´t even pay attention 
YO MOMMA got a glass eye...,1,...with a fish in it. 
Yo' Mamma such a ho....,1,She got fired from the sperm bank for drinking on the job
Yo momma so dumb,1,She sold her car for gas money
Yo momma so short...,1,She hooks up with Legos.
Yo momma so fat...,1,We took a picture of her last Christmas and it's still printing. 
Yo momma so old...,1,"When she went to an antique shop, she found her phone."
Yo momma so fat...,1,She went to Hogwarts and the Sorting Hat assigned her to the WAFFLE HOUSE.
Yo momma so fat,1,I missed three episode when she passed by the T.V
Yo momma so Dark,1,[deleted]
@@## W.A.T.C.H @@## Argentina vs Tonga live stream online RWC FOX TV Coverage,1,[removed]
Yo momma so fat,1,She sank in the Dead sea. 
@@## FOX TV LIVE @@## North Queensland Cowboys vs Brisbane Broncos live stream online,1,[removed]
@#$%% CBS TV @#$$% NRC National Rugby Championship live stream online,1,[removed]
Yo mamma so ugly...,1,people use pictures of her to ward off evil spirits
Best Funny Videos 2015 Try Not To Laugh,1,
YO MOMA SO FAT...,1,"That when she went to the store to get some stuff, she couldn't get through the door"
You momma so ugly,1,"She looks like her face caught fire and someone tried to put it out with a chain.   

My GRANDMA said this to me 20 years ago. Damn Gramma!!!!"
Yo momma so fat..,1,She doesn't even need internet; she's already WORLD WIDE.
YO MOMMA so TALL...,1,...she did a back flip and kicked Jesus.
Yo Mamma is so fat,1,the back of her neck looks like a pack of hot dogs!
"Yo momma so fat,",1,She buys her medication at McDonalds
Yo momma is fat,1,[deleted]
How To Backup Android Phones Using 4 Easy Methods,1,
Yo momma so nasty...,1,that flesh eating bacteria won't even eat her pussy.
Yo momma so FAT,1,She's been replaced by NTFS
Yo momma so fat...,1,"The sign on the wall at the local Denny's says ""Maximum Occupancy : 267 or Yo Momma"""
Yo momma so dumb...,1,She thought a quarterback was a refund
your momma is so stupid..,1,she returned a doughnut back to the store because it had a hole in the middle.
Yo mama is so fat,1,"When she was on the beach, Greenpeace wanted to push her into the sea."
How badly do you want it?,1,[deleted]
You Momma So Fat....,1,[deleted]
Yo Momma so stupid,1,someone said its chilly out so she grabbed a bowl.
yo Momma so old,1,Her first child was a dinosaur.
Yo Momma so old...,1,"When she told me her age I said, 'Should I call an ambulance?' "
Yo Momma so fat...,1,She can't buy cars in Japan.
Match preview: Grand Final - Hawks vs Eagles live Stream. online.. Way2Watch.. AFL.. Grand.. Final.. 2015.. Game....,1,[removed]
Yo mamma is so old,1,She has a Jesus Christ Starter jacket.
Yo mama so fat,1,She joined MySpace and took up the whole space.
Yo momma is so dumb..,1,She tried to steal a free sample.
Yo Momma so fat,1,Cannibals have an orgasm when they see her rolls
kek,1,[removed]
Your mother is so corpulent...,1,"When she dines at the club, she can often be heard requesting additional helpings of Bœuf bourguignon, Oeufs en meurette, and Croquembouche!"
Yo Momma so cross-eyed,1,"When she cries, tears run down her back."
Yo momma so fat,1,"When she jumped in the pool, NASA found water on Mars."
Yo Momma so ugly,1,"When she walked in to a haunted house, she walked out a job."
Yo Momma is so fat,1,"that she ran after the bus down the road, setting off car alarms in her wake, yelling, ""Twinkie, come back!"""
Yo Momma only has one toe and one knee,1,[deleted]
TELL ME WHY I SAW YOUR MOMMA,1,"In my backyard with a bucket on her head, tryna tell me she was Megatron?"
Yo momma so fat,1,Her splash attack actually does damage
Yo momma so fat,1,the only belt that fits her is the asteroid belt!
Yo momma so stupid,1,She insulted her kids with yo momma jokes
Your momma is so ugly,1,Your momma is so ugly she has to sneak up on a glass of water.
Yo momma so dank,1,She can't melt steel beams 
Yo momma so stupid,1,When she fell out a window she fell up.
Yo mama is so ugly,1,that she scared the crap out of the toilet.
Yo mama smell so bad,1,The French eat her with crackers
Your momma has,1,Four teeth and keeps three in her back pocket
Yo momma so dark,1,"When she gets in the car, the change oil light comes on."
Yo momma so fat...,1,A polaroid of her weighs eight pounds.
Yo Momma..,1,swims out to meet the troop ships
Yo momma so dead...,1,"she said ""use the force, luke.""

So I'm playing D&amp;D last night with my friends when, for no obvious reason, everyone starts flinging ""yo momma"" jokes around. This is mildly amusing until someone says to my friend Matt, ""Yo Momma so stupid..."" at which point Matt interrupts the person and says, ""My mom is dead."" in a very serious, This Is NO JOKING MATTER kind of tone. At this point, everyone falls into an awkward silence except for me. Without missing a beat, i respond with ""Yo momma so dead she said 'use the force, Luke.'""
Ten minutes later, Matt was still laughing."
Yo momma so old,1,"When I told her to act her age, she died."
Yo mamma so stupid,1,She's not sure you're hers!
Yo mamma so fat,1,She lives in two postcodes
Yo mama so fat,1,
"Yo momma's so fat she was born on the 4th, 5th, and 6th of July.",1,
Yo mama so fat,1,She still can't get up from the bed on the moon. 
Yo Momma so Fat,1,Yo momma so fat she needs cheat codes for the Wii Fit
Yo mama is like a brick...,1,She's constantly getting laid by Mexicans.
Yo momma is like a bowling ball..,1,"She gets picked up,fingered, and thrown back into the gutter"
Yo Momma so fat,1,"if you fuck her on an airplane, 

you join the Mile Wide Club."
"Every ""yo momma"" joke has been done 1000's of times, by 1000's of different people. Kinda like yo momma...",1,"Happy 1,000 subscribers!!!"
yo momma wastes so much time on reddit,1,"she even went to AdviceAnimals once

by accident"
"Yo momma is so fat, I took a picture of her last Christmas and it's still printing.",1,
Your momma is so hot and willing..,1,[removed]
Your Momma So Hairy,1,When she gave birth the baby had carpet burn.
yo mama so fat,1,"when they photoshopped her, she still fat"
Your Mom is like a laundromat...,1,25 cents per load.
Your Mom is like a carpenter...,1,She spends all day plugging up holes with caulk.
[MommaJokes] I am Taylor I wait U! Fck me now! My id: 6937753536112081,1,
MIL cuts cake hours before we can sing to my daughter,1,[deleted]
"NOT A YO MOMMA JOKE, But i'd like to ask this to admins :",1,
"Seriously, your mum is so wide...",1,She let me fist and I felt someone shake my hand from the inside
Your mum's so wide...,1,I can't even refer to it as a place where the sun don't shine
(Warning do not click this if you don't like sexual jokes) Yomama so nasty that...,1,she sucks your dad's dick before kissing you goodnight.
Yomama so nasty...,1,that she won the grand final in hell
Mom,1,
Yo Momma is so hairy,1,When she lifts her arms you would see armpit hairs on dreadlocks up to her waist.
Yo momma's house is so dusty,1,the cockroaches ride around in dune buggies.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,"A bit is a character which is either a 1 or a 0. There are 8 bits to a byte and each byte is used to represent a character. A Gigabyte is a billion bytes which is a representation of a billion characters. USB sizes come in 8, 16, 32 and 64 of these Gigabytes. Computer Hard disks (and solid state drives) range from 124, 256, 500 and 1000 Gigabytes. That last figure is also known as a terabyte. It is a trillion bytes. There is a bigger figure known as a Tebibyte which is  approximately 1.1 Terabytes. It is more accurately 1024^4 bytes. The fastest super computer in the world, the [Tianhe-2](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tianhe-2) has 1,375 Tebibytes or 1,511,828,488,192,000 roughly a Quintilian characters. If someone wanted to weigh your mom, not even the Tianhe-2 would have enough space to record her weight."
Yo momma so fat...,1,Even *JESUS* can't lift her soul
Yo mama so ugly...,1,That she gave Freddy Kruger nightmares. 
Yo momma so fat...,1,"I printed a picture of her, five years ago, and it's still printing."
Yo momma is so fat...,1,This subreddit would be dark even if it didn't go to private
r/MommaJokes hits 937 subscribers! This is an all time high. We did it guys!,1,"In honor of this occasion, I would like to make a toast to your fat, stupid, and otherwise useless mother."
r/MommaJokes has now hit 937 subscribers! This is an all time high. We did it guys!,1,"In honor, I would like to make a toast to your fat, stupid and ugly momma!"
YO MAMMA SO MOTHFUCKIN' OLD,1,She sucked Adam's dick
Yo momma so fat,1,when she bends over and scientists discover a Supermassive Black Hole
The mother of all Momma jokes,1,
Yo momma so fat...,1,the last time she saw 90210 was on the scale!
A helpful infrographic,1,
Yo Momma's so fat...,1,when she wears high heels she strike oil.
Your mom’s neck is so saggy that she has to tack and jibe on windy days.,1,
Yo Momma washed her linens in fresh linen-scented detergent and now her bed smells recursive.,1,
Your mom pulls more dong than Quasimodo at Pentecost.,1,
Yo mama sweatpants more sweat than pants.,1,
Yo momma so hairy....,1,You got carpet burn when you were born!
Your mom is like a brick,1,"She's heavy, flat on all sides, and gets laid by Mexicans."
Your Momma is so hairy...,1,Sasquatch took a picture of her.
/u/YoMammaBot has been banned,1,May we now rest in peace. 
Yo mamma so ugly,1,They put her face on dream catchers to scare away the nightmares
Yo mamma...,1,"...so dumb, when she saw the sign that said""Airport Left"", she turned around and went back home!"
Yo mamma,1,...so stupid she thought Taco Bell was a phone company out of Mexico!
Yo moma is such a good detective,1,She found herself in this sub-reddit 
Yo mama so fat,1,Her footprints are circles
Yo Mama so stupid,1,"When she tried to solve an IQ test online, it bluescreened"
Yo momma's so fat...,1,Yo momma's so fat..she sat on the iPod and made the iPad!
Yo momma so lovely,1,That my uncle wants to marry her.
Yo mama so slutty,1,she got fired from the sperm bank for drinking on the job
Yo momma's so poor,1,She can't afford to fly off the handle so she has to greyhound off the handle.
Yo momma is so stupid..,1,She couldn't finger her butt hole if you gave her a funnel!
Your mom's so fat...,1,"that's why everyone calls her a ""broad."""
Your mom is so fat,1,...you're gay.
Mothernity clothes,1,
Yo Mama's so stupid...,1,She failed the blood test.
Yo Momma's so fat...,1,that you or your family should step up to the plate and have a heart to heart with her. Her weight is starting to take its toll on her body in more ways than you know. FAT!
Yo momma so fat...,1,"Yo momma so fat that when she jumped into the ocean, she said ""EUREKA!"", but all the water had fallen out!"
Why Every Mother Is The Deadliest Doctor We Have Ever Seen In The World.,1,
"Yo momma's so skinny,",1,she needs to run around in the shower to get wet. 
Yo momma's so fat...,1,"Her high school year book photo was on page 34, 35, AND 36!"
Yo mama so fat...,1,"When God said, ""Let there be light!"" He told her to move."
Yo mama so ugly...,1,"That when she faceplanted in Freddy Fazbear's pizza, she got kicked out for breaking Rule 4"
Your mama is sooooo FAT,1,She got arrested... for carrying 10 pounds of crack!!!
"Yo momma so stupid, when she went to the superbowl she brought a spoon",1,
Yo Momma so slutty the next dude who fucks her will be Eskimo brothers with the whole world.,1,
"I was gonna make a Yo Momma joke, but you'd see it coming from a mile away.",1,Which is about as far away as I can see yo mamma.
Yo momma so fat,1,that her blood type's Ragu
Yo Momma Is So fat,1,Yo Momma Is So fat her shadow weighs 50 pounds
Yo momma so dumb,1,she wants to take a vacation to Mountain Dew.
Yo momma is so hairy...,1,You almost died of rug burn when she gave birth to you!
Yo momma so hairy...,1,furries dress like her at cons!
Yo momma is like a bowling ball...,1,"People put three fingers in her, throw her away and she keeps coming back for more. "
Yo Momma's so stupid...,1,"She told this joke to you!
"
Yo momma's so fat . . .,1,that when she leans to sides you can actually feel earth reposition.
Yo mama's so fat that...,1,... they had to call google earth to take her drivers license photo.
"I've never met your mother (I don't frequent brothels), but I'm sure that if I did meet her she would be so fat and ugly that I'd mistake her for you.",1,
Yo mama so uncoordinated,1,"When she threw a rock at the ground, IT MISSED"
Yo momma is so unfamiliar with the gym...,1,...she calls it James
You momma so stupid,1,She was locked in safeway overnight and starved to death.
Your momma is so fat,1,When she sits around the house. She sits around the house.
Yo momma so fat. . .,1,". . .her clothing comes in three sizes - jumbo, extra-jumbo and OH-MY-GOD-IT'S-COMING-TOWARDS-ME!!"
Yo mamma's so mean,1,She has no standard deviation
Yo Mama so old...,1,"she had to chisel her homework into a rock.

Story behind that is when my kids were little they asked how old their mom was. I told them that about the homework, it was funny until they asked her if it was hard to do that.

EDIT: I don't see an option to flair, just comment|share|save|hide|delete|nsfw"
Your mamma so short,1,"that when she sits on the curb, her feet swing."
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her measurements are 36-24-30 and thats just for her left arm
Yo momma's so fat...,1,...she got kicked out of Planet Fitness for grunting too loudly in exertion before she even got on a machine.
yo mama so old,1,jesus knew her when she was in high school 
Yo momma is so old,1,She new the burger King when he was a prince
Yo mama so fat,1,"That when she was born, she was the ninth planet."
My friend snapped this photo of me in the throes of motherhood today.,1,
I saw yo mama yesterday.,1,"She was asleep on Kanto Route 12.
(In Pokémon Red/Blue/Green (is not a creative color)/Yellow, there was a Snorlax on route 12 that the player had to capture)"
Yo mama so stupid...,1,That she tried to teach a hot dog how to play fetch.
moms reaction to new hair,1,
Yo mommas so fat,1,She sweats mayonnaise
Yo Momma So Fat...,1,Her blood type is Gravy
Yo mama's so fat,1,She took a spoon to the Super Bowl
Yo momma is so fat,1,The only letters she knows in the alphabet are KFC
Starting to scrape the bottom of the barrel on my snaps...,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,The only reason i'm attracted to her is her gravitational field..
Yo momma's house is so dirty,1,She wipes her feet before she goes outside
yo mama is soo fat...,1,...she irons her clothes on the driveway!
Yo Mommas got a peg leg...,1,...With a kick stand.
How I feel as a newly single mother.,1,
"Yo Momma so ugly,",1,She made One Direction go the other way!
"Fact is, typing ""yo mama"" in Super Scribblenauts gives you a zombie.",1,Nothing needed to say in here.
Yo momma so fat,1,I took a picture of her last Christmas and it is still printing.
Yo mama is so fat,1,when she walked past the tv I missed three seasons of Seinfeld.
Your mamma's so hairy,1,People couldn't tell the difference between her and godzilla
Yo Momma so fat...,1,Her baby pictures are still printing!
Your momma's do fat....,1,"When she takes a selfie, she has to use panorama view."
Yo mamma so classless,1,She's a Marxist utopia
Yo Momma so ugly,1,A black hole rejected her
Yo momma is soooo fat.....,1,A vampire would have to eat her blood with a fork 
Yo momma's sooooo fat.....,1,"Every time she turns around, there's a new season of Sherlock"
"Yo Momma's so hairy,",1,She has to ride the fastest roller-coaster in the world to dry her hair. 
Yo Momma so hairy,1,when you were born you almost died of rug-burn.
Your mama is so fat...,1,... her blood type is nutella
Yo mamma like a vacuum cleaner,1,"She sucks, blows, and gets laid in the closet."
Yo momma so ugly,1,"that when she walks down the street in September, people say ""Wow, is it Halloween already?"" 
"
yo momma so fat,1,she has her own gravitational pull
your momma's so fat,1,"her nickname is ""damn!"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,Light bends around her
yo momma is so fat...,1,every relationship she gets into is long distance.
Yo Momma's so Plain...,1,She taps for white mana.
Yo momma so fat,1,"she dont need the internet, she's already world wide. 
"
Difference between yo momma and a washing machine,1,When I put a load in the washing machine it doesn't follow me around for a week.
Yo momma's so old,1,In history class she was just writing down what she was doing! 
Yo momma so fat,1,It's take a train and 2 buses to get around that bitch's good side.
Yo momma so hairy...,1,Bigfoot takes pictures of HER.
Ideas?,1,"The moderators of /r/MommaJokes would like your opinion. 

What would you like us to add/remove from /r/MommaJokes? We are open to new ideas, and the removal of bad ones implemented at this moment. More link flairs? More user flairs? Let us know!

"
Yo momma's so fat...,1,...she can't make small talk.
Yo momma is so hairy...,1,... she's got afros on her nipples.
Yo momma's so old,1,She was in Grade 6 with Jesus.
Yo momma so fat,1,she was floating in the ocean and Spain claimed her for the new world.
Difference between yo momma and a bowling ball...,1,...you could eat a bowling ball if you had to.
Yo mama so hairy,1,Even French guys think she nasty
Yo mama so ugly,1,Even Photoshop can't help
A comeback for when people call you fat,1,"Person: ""Your fat! Hahahahahah!""

You: ""Yeah, because every time I bang your mom she makes me a sandwich.""
"
You momma like a bag of chips,1,Lay's 89 cents.
Yo mamma like a shotgun,1,two cocks she blows
Went to your momma's funeral. RIP,1,
Please. Your Momma jokes are old and tired.,1,Just like your Momma.
Yo mamma is so fat,1,She jumped up in the air and got stuck
Went to your mommas funeral. RIP,1,
This subreddit is going to die due to lack of activity.,1,
Yo momma so black,1,When I come to your place I bring a flashlight.
Yo momma so black,1,When I come to your place I bring a flashlight.
Yo momma so stupid..,1,She was locked inside a grocery store and died of starvation
Your momma so fat,1,Her blood type is Ragu
This puts things into perspective,1,
Yo momma so dumb,1,she tried to get radio play in sign language.
Yo momma so stupid,1,that when she hears it's chilly outside she gets a bowl.
Yo mamma is so stupid,1,"She sits on the TV and watches the couch

Edit: spelling to make sense"
Yo momma so fat,1,She needs cheats to play wii fit
Yo momma is so black,1,she has to wear white gloves when she eats Tootsie Rolls to keep from eating her fingers.
Yo momma is so black,1,Her blood type is burnt
Yo momma is like a hockey player,1,She only showers after three periods
Yo momma so tall...,1,She did a backflip and kicked Jesus in the face.
Yo momma is so nasty,1,She goes to the sperm bank to get her mouth cleaned. 
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her water heater needs a nuclear reactor.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,"She came up to me with a pile of dog crap in her hand and said, ""Hey, look what I almost stepped in!"""
Yo momma so stupid,1,"that when she got locked inside a mattress store, she slept on the floor."
Yo momma so fat,1,"If you tried to represent her mass with a float, it would sink."
Yo Mama is so ugly,1,she gave birth to YOU!
Yo momma is so fat,1,She needs a boomerang to put on her belt.
Yo momma so black,1,that every time she gets in the car the check oil light comes on.
Yo momma is so fat,1,"When she talks to herself, she has to pay for a long distance call."
Yo momma so tall,1,she climbed Mt. Fuji with one step.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,She couldn't pour water out of a boot with instructions on the heel.
"Welcome to the new subreddit, /r/MommaJokes!",1,"Welcome! Help grow our community by posting your favorite Momma jokes that are thrown at you day and night! Together, we can grow /r/MommaJokes to the top of the joking subreddits. 

Please remember to add a flair to your posts. This will make browsing this subreddit much easier in the long run if you go to the Jokes Sections on the sidebar.

Joke away!"
Return to the Homepage!,1,
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her BMI is measured in acres
Yo momma so stupid,1,It took her 2 hours to watch 60 minutes 
Yo momma so fat,1,She eats a lot and stuff 
Yo momma so poor,1,she can't afford to pay attention.
Yo momma is so fat,1,For Halloween she threw a sheet over herself and went as Antarctica.
Yo momma so short,1,she models for trophies. 
Yo momma is so stupid,1,she took a ruler to bed to see how long she slept.
Yo momma is so fat,1,"she got hit by a bus and said, ""Who threw that rock?"" "
Yo momma is so ugly,1,she makes blind kids cry.
Yo momma's so fat,1,that the rainbow shits itself in fear just from looking at her thinking she'll sit on it.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,"she asked me what kind of jeans I was wearing and I said, ""Guess."" and she said ""Levi's?  Jordache?"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her belly gets home 15 minutes before she does
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she went out side in a red dress, everyone yelled, ""HEY, KOOL-AID!"""
Yo momma so stupid,1,She sits on the TV and watches the couch
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she walked in front of the TV, I missed three episodes. "
Yo momma is so fat,1,I need an oxygen tank just to climb on top of her
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she walked in front of the Kinect the Xbox one said, ""Hello World"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,"When she goes to the beach, the tide comes in"
Yo mama so stupid,1,"that when she got locked inside a grocery store, she starved to death."
Yo momma is so ugly,1,Ripley cant believe it
Yo Mama So Stupid..,1,That she sold her car for petrol money.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,She tried to climb Mt. Dew
Yo momma is so fat,1,I had to take a bus and two trains to get on her good side
Yo momma's teeth are so yellow,1,She slows traffic when she smiles
[MommaJokes] I am Taylor I wait U! Fck me now! My id: 6937753536112081,1,
MIL cuts cake hours before we can sing to my daughter,1,[deleted]
"NOT A YO MOMMA JOKE, But i'd like to ask this to admins :",1,
"Seriously, your mum is so wide...",1,She let me fist and I felt someone shake my hand from the inside
Your mum's so wide...,1,I can't even refer to it as a place where the sun don't shine
(Warning do not click this if you don't like sexual jokes) Yomama so nasty that...,1,she sucks your dad's dick before kissing you goodnight.
Yomama so nasty...,1,that she won the grand final in hell
Mom,1,
Yo Momma is so hairy,1,When she lifts her arms you would see armpit hairs on dreadlocks up to her waist.
Yo momma's house is so dusty,1,the cockroaches ride around in dune buggies.
Yo mamma so fat...,1,"A bit is a character which is either a 1 or a 0. There are 8 bits to a byte and each byte is used to represent a character. A Gigabyte is a billion bytes which is a representation of a billion characters. USB sizes come in 8, 16, 32 and 64 of these Gigabytes. Computer Hard disks (and solid state drives) range from 124, 256, 500 and 1000 Gigabytes. That last figure is also known as a terabyte. It is a trillion bytes. There is a bigger figure known as a Tebibyte which is  approximately 1.1 Terabytes. It is more accurately 1024^4 bytes. The fastest super computer in the world, the [Tianhe-2](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tianhe-2) has 1,375 Tebibytes or 1,511,828,488,192,000 roughly a Quintilian characters. If someone wanted to weigh your mom, not even the Tianhe-2 would have enough space to record her weight."
Yo momma so fat...,1,Even *JESUS* can't lift her soul
Yo mama so ugly...,1,That she gave Freddy Kruger nightmares. 
Yo momma so fat...,1,"I printed a picture of her, five years ago, and it's still printing."
Yo momma is so fat...,1,This subreddit would be dark even if it didn't go to private
r/MommaJokes hits 937 subscribers! This is an all time high. We did it guys!,1,"In honor of this occasion, I would like to make a toast to your fat, stupid, and otherwise useless mother."
r/MommaJokes has now hit 937 subscribers! This is an all time high. We did it guys!,1,"In honor, I would like to make a toast to your fat, stupid and ugly momma!"
YO MAMMA SO MOTHFUCKIN' OLD,1,She sucked Adam's dick
Yo momma so fat,1,when she bends over and scientists discover a Supermassive Black Hole
The mother of all Momma jokes,1,
Yo momma so fat...,1,the last time she saw 90210 was on the scale!
A helpful infrographic,1,
Yo Momma's so fat...,1,when she wears high heels she strike oil.
Your mom’s neck is so saggy that she has to tack and jibe on windy days.,1,
Yo Momma washed her linens in fresh linen-scented detergent and now her bed smells recursive.,1,
Your mom pulls more dong than Quasimodo at Pentecost.,1,
Yo mama sweatpants more sweat than pants.,1,
Yo momma so hairy....,1,You got carpet burn when you were born!
Your mom is like a brick,1,"She's heavy, flat on all sides, and gets laid by Mexicans."
Your Momma is so hairy...,1,Sasquatch took a picture of her.
/u/YoMammaBot has been banned,1,May we now rest in peace. 
Yo mamma so ugly,1,They put her face on dream catchers to scare away the nightmares
Yo mamma...,1,"...so dumb, when she saw the sign that said""Airport Left"", she turned around and went back home!"
Yo mamma,1,...so stupid she thought Taco Bell was a phone company out of Mexico!
Yo moma is such a good detective,1,She found herself in this sub-reddit 
Yo mama so fat,1,Her footprints are circles
Yo Mama so stupid,1,"When she tried to solve an IQ test online, it bluescreened"
Yo momma's so fat...,1,Yo momma's so fat..she sat on the iPod and made the iPad!
Yo momma so lovely,1,That my uncle wants to marry her.
Yo mama so slutty,1,she got fired from the sperm bank for drinking on the job
Yo momma's so poor,1,She can't afford to fly off the handle so she has to greyhound off the handle.
Yo momma is so stupid..,1,She couldn't finger her butt hole if you gave her a funnel!
Your mom's so fat...,1,"that's why everyone calls her a ""broad."""
Your mom is so fat,1,...you're gay.
Mothernity clothes,1,
Yo Mama's so stupid...,1,She failed the blood test.
Yo Momma's so fat...,1,that you or your family should step up to the plate and have a heart to heart with her. Her weight is starting to take its toll on her body in more ways than you know. FAT!
Yo momma so fat...,1,"Yo momma so fat that when she jumped into the ocean, she said ""EUREKA!"", but all the water had fallen out!"
Why Every Mother Is The Deadliest Doctor We Have Ever Seen In The World.,1,
"Yo momma's so skinny,",1,she needs to run around in the shower to get wet. 
Yo momma's so fat...,1,"Her high school year book photo was on page 34, 35, AND 36!"
Yo mama so fat...,1,"When God said, ""Let there be light!"" He told her to move."
Yo mama so ugly...,1,"That when she faceplanted in Freddy Fazbear's pizza, she got kicked out for breaking Rule 4"
Your mama is sooooo FAT,1,She got arrested... for carrying 10 pounds of crack!!!
"Yo momma so stupid, when she went to the superbowl she brought a spoon",1,
Yo Momma so slutty the next dude who fucks her will be Eskimo brothers with the whole world.,1,
"I was gonna make a Yo Momma joke, but you'd see it coming from a mile away.",1,Which is about as far away as I can see yo mamma.
Yo momma so fat,1,that her blood type's Ragu
Yo Momma Is So fat,1,Yo Momma Is So fat her shadow weighs 50 pounds
Yo momma so dumb,1,she wants to take a vacation to Mountain Dew.
Yo momma is so hairy...,1,You almost died of rug burn when she gave birth to you!
Yo momma so hairy...,1,furries dress like her at cons!
Yo momma is like a bowling ball...,1,"People put three fingers in her, throw her away and she keeps coming back for more. "
Yo Momma's so stupid...,1,"She told this joke to you!
"
Yo momma's so fat . . .,1,that when she leans to sides you can actually feel earth reposition.
Yo mama's so fat that...,1,... they had to call google earth to take her drivers license photo.
"I've never met your mother (I don't frequent brothels), but I'm sure that if I did meet her she would be so fat and ugly that I'd mistake her for you.",1,
Yo mama so uncoordinated,1,"When she threw a rock at the ground, IT MISSED"
Yo momma is so unfamiliar with the gym...,1,...she calls it James
You momma so stupid,1,She was locked in safeway overnight and starved to death.
Your momma is so fat,1,When she sits around the house. She sits around the house.
Yo momma so fat. . .,1,". . .her clothing comes in three sizes - jumbo, extra-jumbo and OH-MY-GOD-IT'S-COMING-TOWARDS-ME!!"
Yo mamma's so mean,1,She has no standard deviation
Yo Mama so old...,1,"she had to chisel her homework into a rock.

Story behind that is when my kids were little they asked how old their mom was. I told them that about the homework, it was funny until they asked her if it was hard to do that.

EDIT: I don't see an option to flair, just comment|share|save|hide|delete|nsfw"
Your mamma so short,1,"that when she sits on the curb, her feet swing."
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her measurements are 36-24-30 and thats just for her left arm
Yo momma's so fat...,1,...she got kicked out of Planet Fitness for grunting too loudly in exertion before she even got on a machine.
yo mama so old,1,jesus knew her when she was in high school 
Yo momma is so old,1,She new the burger King when he was a prince
Yo mama so fat,1,"That when she was born, she was the ninth planet."
My friend snapped this photo of me in the throes of motherhood today.,1,
I saw yo mama yesterday.,1,"She was asleep on Kanto Route 12.
(In Pokémon Red/Blue/Green (is not a creative color)/Yellow, there was a Snorlax on route 12 that the player had to capture)"
Yo mama so stupid...,1,That she tried to teach a hot dog how to play fetch.
moms reaction to new hair,1,
Yo mommas so fat,1,She sweats mayonnaise
Yo Momma So Fat...,1,Her blood type is Gravy
Yo mama's so fat,1,She took a spoon to the Super Bowl
Yo momma is so fat,1,The only letters she knows in the alphabet are KFC
Starting to scrape the bottom of the barrel on my snaps...,1,
Yo mama so fat,1,The only reason i'm attracted to her is her gravitational field..
Yo momma's house is so dirty,1,She wipes her feet before she goes outside
yo mama is soo fat...,1,...she irons her clothes on the driveway!
Yo Mommas got a peg leg...,1,...With a kick stand.
How I feel as a newly single mother.,1,
"Yo Momma so ugly,",1,She made One Direction go the other way!
"Fact is, typing ""yo mama"" in Super Scribblenauts gives you a zombie.",1,Nothing needed to say in here.
Yo momma so fat,1,I took a picture of her last Christmas and it is still printing.
Yo mama is so fat,1,when she walked past the tv I missed three seasons of Seinfeld.
Your mamma's so hairy,1,People couldn't tell the difference between her and godzilla
Yo Momma so fat...,1,Her baby pictures are still printing!
Your momma's do fat....,1,"When she takes a selfie, she has to use panorama view."
Yo mamma so classless,1,She's a Marxist utopia
Yo Momma so ugly,1,A black hole rejected her
Yo momma is soooo fat.....,1,A vampire would have to eat her blood with a fork 
Yo momma's sooooo fat.....,1,"Every time she turns around, there's a new season of Sherlock"
"Yo Momma's so hairy,",1,She has to ride the fastest roller-coaster in the world to dry her hair. 
Yo Momma so hairy,1,when you were born you almost died of rug-burn.
Your mama is so fat...,1,... her blood type is nutella
Yo mamma like a vacuum cleaner,1,"She sucks, blows, and gets laid in the closet."
Yo momma so ugly,1,"that when she walks down the street in September, people say ""Wow, is it Halloween already?"" 
"
yo momma so fat,1,she has her own gravitational pull
your momma's so fat,1,"her nickname is ""damn!"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,Light bends around her
yo momma is so fat...,1,every relationship she gets into is long distance.
Yo Momma's so Plain...,1,She taps for white mana.
Yo momma so fat,1,"she dont need the internet, she's already world wide. 
"
Difference between yo momma and a washing machine,1,When I put a load in the washing machine it doesn't follow me around for a week.
Yo momma's so old,1,In history class she was just writing down what she was doing! 
Yo momma so fat,1,It's take a train and 2 buses to get around that bitch's good side.
Yo momma so hairy...,1,Bigfoot takes pictures of HER.
Ideas?,1,"The moderators of /r/MommaJokes would like your opinion. 

What would you like us to add/remove from /r/MommaJokes? We are open to new ideas, and the removal of bad ones implemented at this moment. More link flairs? More user flairs? Let us know!

"
Yo momma's so fat...,1,...she can't make small talk.
Yo momma is so hairy...,1,... she's got afros on her nipples.
Yo momma's so old,1,She was in Grade 6 with Jesus.
Yo momma so fat,1,she was floating in the ocean and Spain claimed her for the new world.
Difference between yo momma and a bowling ball...,1,...you could eat a bowling ball if you had to.
Yo mama so hairy,1,Even French guys think she nasty
Yo mama so ugly,1,Even Photoshop can't help
A comeback for when people call you fat,1,"Person: ""Your fat! Hahahahahah!""

You: ""Yeah, because every time I bang your mom she makes me a sandwich.""
"
You momma like a bag of chips,1,Lay's 89 cents.
Yo mamma like a shotgun,1,two cocks she blows
Went to your momma's funeral. RIP,1,
Please. Your Momma jokes are old and tired.,1,Just like your Momma.
Yo mamma is so fat,1,She jumped up in the air and got stuck
Went to your mommas funeral. RIP,1,
This subreddit is going to die due to lack of activity.,1,
Yo momma so black,1,When I come to your place I bring a flashlight.
Yo momma so black,1,When I come to your place I bring a flashlight.
Yo momma so stupid..,1,She was locked inside a grocery store and died of starvation
Your momma so fat,1,Her blood type is Ragu
This puts things into perspective,1,
Yo momma so dumb,1,she tried to get radio play in sign language.
Yo momma so stupid,1,that when she hears it's chilly outside she gets a bowl.
Yo mamma is so stupid,1,"She sits on the TV and watches the couch

Edit: spelling to make sense"
Yo momma so fat,1,She needs cheats to play wii fit
Yo momma is so black,1,she has to wear white gloves when she eats Tootsie Rolls to keep from eating her fingers.
Yo momma is so black,1,Her blood type is burnt
Yo momma is like a hockey player,1,She only showers after three periods
Yo momma so tall...,1,She did a backflip and kicked Jesus in the face.
Yo momma is so nasty,1,She goes to the sperm bank to get her mouth cleaned. 
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her water heater needs a nuclear reactor.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,"She came up to me with a pile of dog crap in her hand and said, ""Hey, look what I almost stepped in!"""
Yo momma so stupid,1,"that when she got locked inside a mattress store, she slept on the floor."
Yo momma so fat,1,"If you tried to represent her mass with a float, it would sink."
Yo Mama is so ugly,1,she gave birth to YOU!
Yo momma is so fat,1,She needs a boomerang to put on her belt.
Yo momma so black,1,that every time she gets in the car the check oil light comes on.
Yo momma is so fat,1,"When she talks to herself, she has to pay for a long distance call."
Yo momma so tall,1,she climbed Mt. Fuji with one step.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,She couldn't pour water out of a boot with instructions on the heel.
"Welcome to the new subreddit, /r/MommaJokes!",1,"Welcome! Help grow our community by posting your favorite Momma jokes that are thrown at you day and night! Together, we can grow /r/MommaJokes to the top of the joking subreddits. 

Please remember to add a flair to your posts. This will make browsing this subreddit much easier in the long run if you go to the Jokes Sections on the sidebar.

Joke away!"
Return to the Homepage!,1,
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her BMI is measured in acres
Yo momma so stupid,1,It took her 2 hours to watch 60 minutes 
Yo momma so fat,1,She eats a lot and stuff 
Yo momma so poor,1,she can't afford to pay attention.
Yo momma is so fat,1,For Halloween she threw a sheet over herself and went as Antarctica.
Yo momma so short,1,she models for trophies. 
Yo momma is so stupid,1,she took a ruler to bed to see how long she slept.
Yo momma is so fat,1,"she got hit by a bus and said, ""Who threw that rock?"" "
Yo momma is so ugly,1,she makes blind kids cry.
Yo momma's so fat,1,that the rainbow shits itself in fear just from looking at her thinking she'll sit on it.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,"she asked me what kind of jeans I was wearing and I said, ""Guess."" and she said ""Levi's?  Jordache?"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,Her belly gets home 15 minutes before she does
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she went out side in a red dress, everyone yelled, ""HEY, KOOL-AID!"""
Yo momma so stupid,1,She sits on the TV and watches the couch
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she walked in front of the TV, I missed three episodes. "
Yo momma is so fat,1,I need an oxygen tank just to climb on top of her
Yo momma so fat,1,"that when she walked in front of the Kinect the Xbox one said, ""Hello World"""
Yo momma is so fat,1,"When she goes to the beach, the tide comes in"
Yo mama so stupid,1,"that when she got locked inside a grocery store, she starved to death."
Yo momma is so ugly,1,Ripley cant believe it
Yo Mama So Stupid..,1,That she sold her car for petrol money.
Yo momma is so stupid,1,She tried to climb Mt. Dew
Yo momma is so fat,1,I had to take a bus and two trains to get on her good side
Yo momma's teeth are so yellow,1,She slows traffic when she smiles
